Authors
Michael Redman
Number of Reviews
229

Title
Review for Volcano (1997)
When an earthquake opens up a fissure under Los Angeles and a volcano
erupts in the La Brea Tar Pits, red-hot strawberry jam oozes through the
streets of tinsel town creating havoc =97 and big bucks for the film
studio.
Tommy Lee Jones is Mike Roark, head of the Office Of Emergency
Management and is charged with fixing this inconvenience. It's an
emergency that he hasn't had to manage before, but he has help from a
seismologist Amy Barnes (Anne Heche). The two of them against furious
flaming nature forms the central story line in the latest disaster film
to level major US cities.
As much fun as it is to watch LA melt down, there's...
There's really no use in discussing the plot of this film. It's exactly
the same as every other disaster film of the last 20 years. An
overwhelming force destroys a bunch of stuff. Our hero and his new love
interest try to convince the officials that there is a greater danger
but they won't listen so the team goes off on their own. There are kids
and dogs in danger who are saved at the last minute. In this one,
there's even __two__ dogs.
Some of the effects are spectacular, especially the lava bombs, but
what's new? Every disaster film has wonderful visuals. There's such a
plot formula that the only enjoyment anyone can get from these movies
anymore is by watching while turning off your brain.
Jones and Heche are more than adequate in their roles, but, again, so
what? They and the millions of dollars that went into this virtual
re-make of dozens of movies could have been better utilized.
Although the burning and devastation are entertaining, this is one of
those movies where the story couldn't happen unless there are some
remarkably stupid characters and the laws of nature are ignored. Most of
the film is taken up by firemen spraying water on the
thousands-of-degrees lava. In the real world, this would be like
attacking a charging lion with a fly swatter.
Not a horrible film to waste an afternoon away with, but you're not
going to experience much new. If you do plan on seeing it, make sure you
do at a theater. On video, there will be nothing at all.
[This appeared in the 5/2/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Cradle Will Rock (1999)
Whose whore are you? How far are you willing to prostitute yourself in
exchange for comfort?
In one way or another, we all pay for it. "It" in this case being social
and economic security. We work boring dead-end jobs so we can pay the
rent. We attend meaningless vacuous classes so we can get our degrees.
Worst of all, sometimes we compromise our values for financial gain.
In the desperate times of depression-era America, many people were
forced into prostitution of one type or another. With starvation just
around the next corner, we'd be surprised just what we'd be willing to
do for a meal.
Out of work actors were standing in long lines to sign up for the
federal WPA theater projects. Most of the WPA workers were out building
dams, ponds and sidewalks, but thousands were putting on plays to
entertain the masses.
"Cradle Will Rock" follows several plot lines that intersect at various
points. Orson Welles (Angus MacFadyen) and John Houseman (Cary Elwes)
are producing a pro-union musical by Marc Blitzstein (Hank Azaria).
Nelson Rockefeller (John Cusack) hires radical artist Diego Rivera
(Ruben Blades) to paint a mural at the Rockefeller Center. Congress is
investigating Communists within the theater project. Industrialists are
throwing parties and being wooed by the fascists. People are falling in
love and babies, being born.
Amazingly the numerous tales flow seamlessly into one another. As the
camera zooms in on a piece of background and then pulls back out, you
are in a different place with different characters, but there's never a
moment of confusion about what is going on.
When the opening credits roll with name after name of renowned actors,
you will wonder how they can all fit into one film. Vanessa Redgrave,
Joan Cusack, Bill Murray, Susan Sarandon, John Turturro, Emily Watson:
the list goes on and on. And they're all great -- not a weak link in the bunch.
The underlying question of the film is the wisdom of public and
corporate funding of the arts. It's one big party at the beginning as
everyone focuses on their work. Then the modern Golden Rule ("He who has
the gold makes the rules") raises its ugly head. Rockefeller wants
Rivera to eliminate Lenin from his painting. Congress cuts financing to
the pinko plays. Mussolini's beautiful mistress trades old master
paintings to the Philistines for contributions to the war effort. Even
the actors union, formed to protect its members, gets in the way.
Yet it's all a joy to watch. There are heroes and villains, lovers and
enemies, disasters and triumphs. All against the frantic backdrop of
prima donas vying for position. It's like a Robert Altman film done by
the Coen brothers.
Director and writer Tim Robbins is rapidly becoming a major force in
Hollywood. With this, "Bob Roberts" and "Dead Man Walking" to his
directoral credit, and a number of wonderful acting roles, he's one to watch.
His brushstrokes are brilliant but a little broad here. The sets are
magnificent, the costumes authentic and the color schemes, inviting.
Some of the characters are charactures, but perhaps that's inevitable.
With so many things going on, the audience needs some shortcuts.
Some of the scenes are grand. The long single-shot opener follows
doe-eyed street singer Olive Stanton (Watson) from sleeping behind a
movie screen, down an alley out to the street where she washes up from a
dripping hydrant oblivious to pedestrians. Like a deer in the urban
forest, she's poor but free. The camera then moves up to Blitzstein's
apartment. Over five minutes of unedited uncut luxurious filming, it's a pleasure.
The questions the film asks don't belong only in the past. Federal arts
funding are currently under attack. Maplethorpe may not have been a
Commie but he sure was pink. Workers are being thrown out of jobs,
sweatshop conditions abound in other countries, unions are loosing power.
Welcome to the brave new world, same as the old one.
(Michael Redman has been writing this column for a long time, but his
memories of the thirties are a little foggy. He's considering taking up
selling apples on the street corner as a new career. Email your tales of
prostitution to redman@bluemarble.net.)
[This appeared in the 1/272000 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bluemarble.net.]
-- 
mailto:redman@bluemarble.net
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Cable Guy, The (1996)
First of all, let's get one thing straight. This is not the movie you 
think it is going to be. It's not another "Ace Ventura" and it's not 
very much at all what you would expect from Jim Carrey.
Matthew Broderick is Steven Kovacs, a white collar everyman who has just 
moved out from the apartment that he and his girlfriend shared. His 
eviction came at her suggestion following his marriage proposal. Not 
feeling all that great about his life and attempting to set up 
housekeeping, one of his initial orders of business is to order cable. 
His first mistake.
In a situation everyone can sympathize with, Kovacs waits and waits for 
his cable guy to appear. When Carrey finally shows up to deliver the 
electronic babysitter, he seems a bit off, but gives Kovacs free cable 
and the two lonely guys agree to hang out.
Carrey, who says his name is "Ernie Douglas, but my friends call me 
Chip" (ring any bells?), turns out to be a psychopathic emotional 
vampire who latches on to Broderick like a leech. In the Cable Guy's 
mind they have instantaneously become best buds.
The film has more in common with "Single White Female" and other stalker 
movies than it does with "Dumb And Dumber". It is certainly not for the 
kids (The most humorous event was the loud question from the 
four-year-old girl in the row behind me, "Daddy, what=B9s a prostitute?") 
nor is it overflowing with the typical Carrey stupid physical comedy, 
although it does feature some of that. Can you imagine a Carrey film 
that wouldn't?
For some reason unfathomable to me, audiences at most Jim Carrey films 
are rolling in the aisles in laughter. At this one they'll spend more 
time squirming in their seats. While there are a few funny bits, the 
uncomfortable ones are more plentiful.
Why uncomfortable? Probably because we all have had a "friend" that the 
Cable Guy reminds us of. Someone who has more invested in the 
relationship than we do. Someone who would do anything for us, except 
leave us alone. This film shoves the possibilities in our faces. 
Carrey's character takes his position to the extreme: beating up Kovacs' 
girlfriend's date in a restroom, playing "Porno Password" with Kovacs' 
parents, giving Kovacs thousands of dollars worth of video equipment. 
The Cable Guy (we never learn his real name) doesn't have a life so he 
takes over Kovacs'. It's difficult to even write a sentence about him 
without using the word "Kovacs".
Carrey is passable in this role: certainly more of an actor and funnier 
than in his previous attempts. Broderick is always charming, but here he 
seems to concentrate on getting out of Carrey's way. The rest of the 
cast are minor roles that run the range from adequate to almost 
inspired.
There are a few plot problems and some shoddy editing, but it's a 
beginning for Carrey. If, that is, anything could be a beginning for a 
man that makes $20 million.
[Note: This originally appeared in The Bloomington Voice, Bloomington, 
Indiana, 6/20/96. Michael Redman can be found at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for City of Angels (1998)
        As we approach the new Millennium, things are looking scary. There's a
possibility that everything's going to fall apart and if it doesn't, all those
frightening zeroes still loom on the horizon.
        Even now there's too much to do.  No one can get it all done. Although the
DOW keeps peaking, the man on the street's finances looks worse every day.
These are hard times. Change is accelerating and it's difficult to cope.
        That may explain the growing search for a new faith. The twin churches of
Science and Economics haven't done such a good job and even UFOs coming to
whisk us away to a better existence are starting to look good. It might also
account for the fascination with angels.
        For the past few years angels have been appearing wherever you turn. They are
in Hallmark stores, staring down at you from living room walls, in numerous
books and on television. Hollywood, not being an industry to ignore trends has
given us "Michael" and "The Preacher's Wife" among others and now we have an
entire city of the heavenly beings.
        Seth (Nicolas Cage) hangs out in Los Angeles with his fellow invisible
spirits escorting the recently departed to their just rewards. In a hospital
to gather the soul of a patient who died on the operating table, he encounters
heart surgeon Maggie Rice (Meg Ryan). Not even the saintly can resist the
heavenly charms of Ms Ryan and he is smitten.
        Eventually he allows Maggie to see him and she is drawn to the tall brooding
man in a black trench coat. They have problems besides the inter-species
dating situation. Seth can't touch or taste anything.
        Nathaniel Messinger ("NYPD Blue"'s Denis Franz), a heart patient in the
hospital, shocks Seth one day when he starts talking to him. Messinger is
himself a former heavenly spirit and tells him that he can become human. To do
so, he must give up everything that he is. For Seth, being in love is
literally taking the great fall.
        I have a major prejudice against remakes of European films for the American
audience especially reconstructions of truly phenomenal movies. This is a redo
of Wim Wenders' masterpiece "Wings Of Desire" and remarkably enough is a fine
film in its own right. There's none of the dumbing-down that usually takes
place to make the product palatable to the public. It's is different but it's moving.
        The ethereal existence of the angels is beautiful and eternal, but
oxymoronically lacks soul. Dozens of them stand on the beach at sunrise
listening to the heavenly music. They watch from on high but they can't feel. 
        Messinger on the other hand is a self-described hedonist and loving every
minute of it. He may be only human now, but he's digging every minute of it.
He loves his wife and kids, body surfing and earthly delights. The scene where
he sneaks out of the hospital for a multi-course breakfast and stuffs every
goopy syrupy thing that he can find into his mouth is a delight.
        That's what this film is about. The story of angels and their interaction
with people is engaging, but the theme is the choice between observing and
being. When Seth takes the leap of faith, he must abandon everything that he
has ever known to become real. He's leaving a safe place for a risky uncertain
future, but it's a future where he will be engaged with the energy of being.
He's risking it all to gain it all.
        Director Brad Silberling (who surprisingly also directed "Casper") pulls out
the best from the actors. Cage does fine as the somber angel aching to cut
loose. Ryan is nearly always a delight, and here she demonstrates a wide
emotional range. Her desperation when her patient dies and her elation at
being in love are both convincing. The chemistry between the two is obvious.
When they look into each other's eyes, the attraction is undeniable. Their
first touch and kiss is the stuff of memories.
        Franz steals every scene that he's in and is fascinating to watch. Sitting
back at a cook-out in his blue-collar back yard, he's having the time of his
life. He's thoroughly a human being with all the passionate sloppiness that entails.
        The star of the film is the moody cinematography. John Seale ("The English
Patient") perfectly captures the otherworldliness of the angels. The _feel_ of
this film will stay with you for quite a while.
        As many people are facing their own unpredictable futures, it might serve us
to realize that "safe" often is "sorry". The question of where to place our
faith is a puzzling one but, as Seth tells Maggie, "Some things are true
whether you believe in them or not."
(Michael Redman has written this column for well over 23 years and sometimes
he thinks his guardian angel is taking a nap. Statements of theology can go to redman@bvoice.com)
[This appeared in the 4/16/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for She's So Lovely (1997)
Occasionally I will use a film as self-administered mood altering therapy.
When I feel uncomfortable with my current emotions sometimes a movie will
allow me to jump into another world and when I return to the mundane, will
arrive changed.
Perhaps Graham Greene said it best in an episode of "Northern Exposure" when
his Inuit shaman character called cinema the "white man's healing stories." It
often works for me.
Such was the situation a few days ago when, feeling ungrounded and
disconnected, I decided to see a romantic comedy. My usual policy is to know
very little about a film before I walk into the theater so that I can approach
the experience unbiased. Based on what I had heard about "She's So Lovely"
(woman has to choose between her husband and lover), it looked as it fit the bill.
>From a screenplay by the late John Cassavetes and directed by his son Nick
("Unhook The Stars"), the film looks at lives that exist in a nightmare world
of alcoholic haze and insanity. Maureen (Robin Wright Penn) is a pregnant
bleached blonde who spends her days drinking herself into a stupor and falling
down. Her realm is one where when she is beaten and raped by a neighbor, the
event is almost lost in the daze.
When her husband Eddie (Sean Penn) returns from one of his frequent several
days away without a phone call and learns of the assault, he has a major break
with reality and goes after the culprit. The rampage ends with Eddie shooting
a mental health worker and being institutionalized for an indeterminate time.
When he is released 10 years later and pronounced "cured" (although he
believes that he was only in for three months), the world is a different
place. Maureen has divorced him and married Joey (John Travolta), a well off
businessman and is raising her three daughters (one is Eddie's) with him in suburbia.
Although Eddie can't quite understand what is going on, he heads to the better
side of town to take his love back. The civilized veneer of the people who
live in the little pink houses of Pleasant Valley proves thin indeed when the
three meet face-to-face.
The actors are top rate. Wright Penn especially deserves admiration for her
depiction of the "lovely" as a particularly unattractive seedy woman. It's
certainly not a "babe" role and is a courageous one. Penn digs deep inside to
come up with a angry deranged maniac who is still capable of feelings of love.
Travolta with limited screen time does well as the only semi-sane member of
the cast.
Harry Dean Stanton and Debi Mazar are entertaining as Eddie and Maureen's
friends and could have used a bit more exposure. You can hear the audience
breath a sigh of relief when they appear. Their lives are spent in a seedy
bar, but they seem normal compared to the rest.
It's useless to complain that many of the characters' actions don't make
sense. These people are so separated from any semblance of reasonableness that
they could do _anything_ and it would fit in the film. Minutes after stating
that she doesn't drink or smoke, Maureen shows up with whiskey and a
cigarette. She never visits, calls or writes Eddie during the 10 years yet she
considers leaving her husband and children when he is released. 
Their relationship is summed up when she tells him "I want to smash beer
bottles over people's heads. I just want to smash them cause I love you so
much." These are not people that you want to know.
When we left the theater, we walked to get ice cream to shake the movie out of
our heads. The shop was closed and we ended up standing in front of the movie
house staring down the street wet with rain for several minutes. The world
seemed an ugly place. It's a powerful film but not an uplifting one.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 22 years and is still looking
for a quality feel-good film. Email suggestions to mredman@bvoice.com)
[This appeared in the 9/11/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Blade (1998)
Occasionally I'm in the mood to forget about art, story, characterization and
everything that makes a film worthwhile. During those times, I'm content to
just sit in a dark room watching glitzy pictures flash by on the big white
wall. Fortunately this was my state of mind while viewing "Blade".
Blade (Wesley Snipes) is one tough SOB. Half-vampire, half-human, he has all
the strength and speed of the bloodsuckers and none of their weaknesses to
garlic, sunlight or silver. He's armed with silver stakes, big guns with
silver bullets and a huge sword. Revenge for the death of his mother is his
motivation for turning the world's fiends into dust.
The film's opening scenes follow a woman leading her male friend into a
secret hip disco. (You can tell that it's hip because there are lesbian
couples dancing and a threesome making out on a couch in the corner.)  The man
is digging the techno beat, flashing lights and overt sexuality until blood
starts raining down from the sprinkler system. Then he realizes that he's been
brought to the rave by his vamp paramour as prey.
Enter Blade. Single-handedly he starts wiping out the dancers. One after
another, they are blasted by his shotgun and dissolve into sparkling
ectoplasmic powder.
Later he rescues Karen (N'Bushe Wright), a hematologist who has been bitten.
She is what passes for the love interest in the movie, with the exception of a
subsequent episode that would make Oedipus blush. His only other human contact
is crotchety urban hermit Whistler (Kris Kristofferson) who rescued the young
Blade and makes his weapons for him.
Deacon Frost (Stephen Dorff), the leader of the angry young vampire Turks, is
Blade's nemesis. Turned into an undead by a bite, Frost also opposes the staid
older vampires-from-birth international cartel who meet in a boardroom like
the suits that run IBM. Commenting on their secret negotiations with humans,
he asks why they make deals with their food.
He isn't content to coexist with what he considers lower life forms. He wants
to rule them. The Goth Generation X vampires are like decedent spoiled
children of the rich, dancing and feasting the night away.
Frost has secretly been translating ancient writings that describe how to
summon the Blood God who will bring about the vampire jyhad. Blade finds out
and realizes that this could put a crimp in his plan to destroy the evil
vermin. They eventually meet at an inevitable brutal Hong Kong style showdown
in an enormous underground ancient-future cathedral.
The acting is nothing to write home about, but fitting to the film. Snipes is
as wooden and emotionless as you might expect an obsessive killer to be. Dorff
is snappy as he sneers his lines reminiscent of Keifer Sutherland in Lost
Boys. Rhodes scholar-turned songwriter-turned rock star-turned actor
Kristofferson, a personal favorite, is always entertaining but under-used
here. His eccentric character provides some of the humor especially in a scene
where he slops gasoline around while lighting his cigarette.
Director Stephen Norrington's filmmaking is stylish to the extreme and it
works in this film. Extremely short cuts of vampires snarling and glimpsed
beings scurrying around are like things seen out of the corner of the eye. The
jerky super-speed moments are surprisingly effective.
The sexual aspects of vampirism are used well. There's a lot of licking and
messy wet sliding around. One particularly eroticized incident features the
female victim gasping in ecstasy as her blood is drained away. Her seducer
howls in gratification when he finishes.
The movie has more than its share of faults. Seemingly every object in every
set is made of glass just waiting to be shattered. None of the characters are
real. The underground vampire structure is centuries old and looks cool, but
it just happens to exist in the same US city as the rest of the story? 
There are scenes lifted completely from "Raiders Of The Lost Ark" and other
films. The computer effects occasionally look poor and are redundant. Seen one
exploding head, seen 'em all. There's a huge hole in Frost's plan. If everyone
is transformed into vampires, what do they eat? The Blood God is a disappointment.
The biggest disappointment is the climax of Blade and Frost's battle. After
all of the high energy action during the movie, the last minute or so of that
are a letdown. It was so low-key that I kept waiting for more.
There is an interesting subtext of elite groups engaging in war while
regarding the rest of the world as inferiors. The vampires see everyone as
blood machines. Blade regards most other humans as ignorant and beneath his
attention. He savagely beats a vampire-collaborator cop in the middle of a
busy street without the least thought to on-lookers. He's in a secret war zone
and the mundanes don't matter.
His attitude is what terrorists must feel. Their cause is righteous and if
innocents get in the way, too bad. Hidden wars have a long history: the CIA
vs. the KGB, the Tong and Mafia wars, the struggle between criminals and law
enforcement. It's interesting to get an inside look at what goes on around us.
This is a poorly plotted ridiculous film, but it's a well made poorly plotted
ridiculous film. Sometimes on these blistering dog days, that and air
conditioning are enough.
(Michael Redman has scrawled these words of wisdom for over 23 years and seems
to have emoved with the paper's name change. Point your electrons to redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 8/26/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Drop Dead Gorgeous (1999)
Back in prehistoric times, somewhere in the seventies, battles raged over
beauty contests. Opponents accused the pageants of objectifying women. They
said that parading the contestants in bathing suits like so many sides of beef
lowered women to "sex objects".
Putting aside the discussion of whether being seen as sex object occasionally
is a necessarily bad thing, the critics scored at least minor victories. The
contests became more focused on talent and poise and less on the swimsuit competition.
Of course it is just a coincidence that the most talented women with the most
poise always turn out to be hot babes.
Especially debatable are the teenage contests that encourage young women to
engage in cut-throat competition with their friends to win the coveted title
of "Miss Porkbelly".
Are the high school girls in Mount Rose, Minnesota eager to become "Miss Teen
Princess America"? Are they willing to do almost anything necessary to win?
Former winner Gladys Leeman (Kirstie Ally) has raised her daughter Becky
(Denise Richards) from birth to win this contest. Conveniently Gladys is the
head of the local pageant committee. Some might say this gives Becky a head
start, but it doesn't matter much. The Leemans are what passes for wealthy in
the small town and always get what they want.
Becky's main competition is Amber Atkins (Kirsten Dunst), a talented ambitious
girl from the wrong side of town. Her trailer-trash mother Annette (Ellen
Barkin) wants her to win, but only because it would provide Amber a ticket out
of Smallville.
When the contestants start getting knocked off, the competition takes a deadly
turn. Not only are the girls putting Vaseline on their teeth to look good, but
they're keeping a close watch on falling stage lights.
The film is presented in the increasing popular "mockumentary" format. A film
crew is supposedly sent to Mount Rose to do a documentary on the event and we
are watching the result.
While this concept worked well for "Spinal Tap" and others, here it's a bust.
Not for minute do we believe this is a documentary. The production values are
too high, improbable scenes are included and it looks exactly like what it is.
Beauty contests would seem the perfect fodder for comedy. The subject was
treated well in the 1975 "Smile". Holly Hunter was hilarious in the 1989 "Miss Firecracker".
I laughed out loud about four times during this film -- a major accomplishment
for any movie. Some of the lowest common denominator humor is undeniably funny.
But more often, the comedy falls flat. Taking a cue from "Fargo", director
Michael Patrick Jann plays the blandness of Mount Rose's culture for laughs.
They talk with accents, eat a lot of jello salads and hotdishes, collect balls
of twine and brag about being the home of Minnesota's Oldest Living Lutheran
(now deceased). Cigarettes dangle from most mouths. It's entertaining the
first time, but repeated over and over, they lose whatever charm they
originally possessed.
Many of the bits are aimed at easy targets. The hefty brother of one of the
judges is mentally challenged and often runs into windows and loses his pants.
He's even referred to as the "mental retard" several times.
The "slut" bits are mildly amusing at first, but also grow old rapidly. The
white trash jokes wear just as badly.
Annette is burned in an explosion and has a beer can welded to her hand. Amber
practices her tap dancing while applying makeup to stiffs in a mortuary. An
important school function is the Lutheran Sisterhood Gun Club.
Far be it from me to say that there isn't room in the world for politically
incorrect humor. But if it's going to be crass, it had better be funny. Some
of the most hilarious films are decided non-pc and even resort to remarkably
stupid jokes.
"Drop Dead Gorgeous" certainly has those two elements, it's just missing the
comedy most of the time. The real beauty contests are much more hilarious.
(Michael Redman has written this column for somewhere around 24 years. He
caught wind of a conspiracy at the "Bloomington Independent" to have only
female writers in this women's issue, but was able to sneak this in. For the
record, he is not a woman, but he likes them.)
[This appeared in the 7/29/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for O Brother, Where Art Thou? (2000)
After such a dismal year that "Castaway" is considered one of its best
films, the release of a Coen Brothers film is certainly cause for
celebration. Luckily for us, this one is near perfect.
No deep messages here, just a collection of hilarious episodes as Homer's
"Odyssey" is overlaid on a tale of a thirties prison break in the deep
south. Exactly what we need during the chilling gray days of January.
With a collection of actors including Holly Hunter, John Turturro, Charles
Durning and John Goodman, it's surprising that George Clooney emerges as the
stand-out. His comedic bits are masterful and his face so rubberized that at
times he appears to be an animated character. This could be Clooney's
break-out film.
There are so many surrealistic scenes (the Klan rally, the sirens, the
Soggybottom Boys and more) that you'll sit slack-jawed during the entire
film amazed that anyone would put these on the screen. And even more amazed
that they work so spectacularly.
[This appeared in the 1/18/2001 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bluemarble.net.]
-- 
mailto:redman@bluemarble.net
Film reviews archive: 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Michael+Redman

Title
Review for Nothing to Lose (1997)
Successful LA advertising executive Nick Beam (Tim Robbins) has lost the most
important thing in his life. Upon a surprise early visit home, he discovers
his wife in bed with his boss. In shock, he drives aimlessly.
In an undesirable section of the city, carjacker "T" (Martin Lawrence) jumps
into the passenger's seat and demands his wallet and keys. Beam explains
"You've picked the wrong person on the wrong day," and heads out into the
Arizona desert with T, a captive.
As you might expect in this salt and pepper comedy, the two become good
buddies and go on a crime spree. It turns out the T is highly skilled but
can't get a job because he has no legitimate experience and has to support his
family somehow. Hatching a plot to get revenge on his boss, the two plan a big
buck heist.
Occasionally there are bits that are almost humorous, but they seem played
wrong. The timing is off, the delivery is off and the story is just plain
stupid. Every plot turn is telegraphed long in advance. The team steals
flashlights to use in their robbery. Quiet and stealth are of the utmost
importance in the operation. The flashlights have built-in radios. Can you see
it coming?
The worst give-away has to do with the pivotal scene that changes Beam's life.
Anyone who pays the least attention to the events before he walks in on his
wife's indiscretion can see what's coming an hour later.
Robbins does a credible job with a very limited role and Lawrence adds some
spice to the film although neither are very funny. This seems a fatal mistake
in what is supposed to be a comedy.
With very few exceptions, the audience will discover that in "Nothing To
Lose", there is really nothing to gain.
(Michael Redman, after over 21 years of writing this column, is currently
holed up in an air-conditioned room making only rare sojourns out into the
sweltering day. mredman@bvoice.com are the magical letters.)
[This appeared in the 7/24/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Independence Day (1996)
First of all, there are several different things going on here, all 
separate but connected parts of the whole. There is "ID4: The Movie", 
"ID4: The Ride", and lest we forget, "ID4: The Hype And Cash Machine".
Unless you've been in a coma for the past few months or don't have cable 
and watch only PBS, you've been exposed to the unprecedented advertising 
campaign. When you heard the words "Independence Day", it was a safe bet 
they weren't talking about the holiday. Rarely has any film aroused such 
pre-release excitement.
So exciting that it generated over $94 million during its first 5 1/2 
days of release. So exciting that dozens of theaters around the country 
were showing 24 hour screenings for the first few days: shows at 1:30am, 
4:00am, 6:30am. So exciting that tickets were sold out hours before the 
shows to people camping in line with big coolers and sleeping bags. No 
matter how good the movie turned out to be, the hype was a work of art 
itself.
Somehow Fox even arranged for a massive power black-out up and down the 
west coast on opening night.
"ID4: The Ride"? It's phenomenal! Some films are more like amusement 
park thrillers than cinema and this is one of the best of that genre. 
Just take your seat, strap in and hold on. Monitor your cola consumption 
because the roller coaster doesn't provide many breaks. One of the marks 
of audience involvement is their relationship with their bladders: how 
casually they take their trips to the restroom. Here, people are 
__sprinting__ to and from the john so as not to miss anything.
There's enough stuff blown up and smashed and burned to a crisp to 
satisfy any summer action junkie. Jet fighters zooming here and there, 
alien death rays trashing all the world's major cities, massive 
devastation on a global scale! It's perfect! The best science fiction 
ride since the "Star Wars" films.
And then there's that pesky "ID4: The Movie" thing. There are a few 
problems. There's nothing new here. The producers have ripped off dozens 
of films ("Close Encounters", "Star Wars", "War Of The Worlds", "The 
Right Stuff", "Dr. Strangelove", "Jurassic Park", "The Day The Earth 
Stood Still" and on and on and on), word for word, scene for scene. 
During one dogfight scene with Will Smith being chased through canyons 
by an alien ship, I was sure I was about to hear "Use the Force, Will. 
Use the Force!"
I believe that kinder reviewers call these scenes "homages", but it's an 
odd film that can succeed with nothing but homages.
Fortunately "ID4" is that odd film. All of the pieces are well crafted 
into a quilt that, while it isn't original, sure does its job.
The casting is top-notch in most cases. The Fresh Prince is surprisingly 
refreshing as the wise-cracking jet pilot who becomes earth's last hope. 
Jeff Goldblum as the computer wiz who figures it all out works well with 
Judd Hirsch, his kibitzing dad. Randy Quaid, Harvey Fierstein and Harry 
Connick, Jr., among dozens of others, are grand. Bill Pullman as the 
Clintonesque president is something of a dead fish (or is that lame 
duck?), but then, we expect most of our politicians to behave that way.
See it. You'll have to forget about any attempt to look at the film 
intellectually, but let it possess your body and take over. You'll love 
it!
[This originally appeared in "The Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, 
Indiana, 7/11/96. Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Ice Storm, The (1997)
There's something resplendent about a winter ice storm that few people ever
experience as they huddle inside awaiting the thaw. Viewing from safety
through the glazed glass gives a distorted view of the beauty and the danger
outside in the extremes.
During the early seventies the suburbs were a questionable refuge from the
whirlwind of change sweeping through the country. As the trappings of the
cultural and sexual revolution became mainstream and seeped into those
shelters, it happened without much of its soul. The exploration of the sixties
turned into the "Me Decade" in a few short years.
In 1973 Ben Hood (Kevin Kline) is doing everything right. Married to a
beautiful woman, he has a successful career, two kids and a modern house in
the hamlet of New Canaan, Connecticut. It should be enough, but his life feels
empty. His loveless affair with neighbor Janey Carver (Sigourney Weaver) isn't
helping much. When he wants to talk, she responds "You're boring me. I have a
husband. I don't have a need for another one."
Ben and Janey are indeed bored, not just with their spouses and each other,
but with everything they do. Like the rest of their friends, they are grasping
at straws searching for something to make them feel alive. They want to live
on the edge from the comfort of their living rooms.
In direct contrast, the children are embracing life, fumbling though they may
be. Paul Hood (Tobey Maguire) is away at boarding school and coming to grips
with his own sexuality attempting to get the attention of an attractive girl
before his Don Juan roommate gets to her first.
His younger sister Wendy tests her own sexual power with Janey's sons Duckie
(Adam Hann-Byrd) and Mikey (Elijah Wood). There's a great scene where she's
wearing a grotesque Nixon mask while Mikey lies on top of her in a basement
family room. "Take down your pants and I'll touch it, but that's all," she
tempts him. When Ben walks in on them after being abandoned in Janey's bed
upstairs, it's a snapshot of seventies suburban life.
Painfully shy Duckie spends most of his time attaching M-80s to model planes
and blowing them up in flight. His response to Wendy's propositions is fright.
He's outgrown his toys but can't quite figure out what to do about it.
All of this sexual tension comes to a head the day after Thanksgiving. The
adults of the neighborhood attend a "key party" where the men put their car
keys in a bowl and the women pick out a set to determine their partner for the
night. While the joyless wife-swapping party takes place, an ice storm rages outside.
The kids head out to partake of the tempest while their parents nervously
banter with each other. It's hazardous out there, but that's where life is.
It's only by venturing into the unknown that anything meaningful happens as
they will all discover. The only way to navigate the alien are with your eyes
wide open -- something no one in the film does. The children are too
inexperienced and the adults, too filled with ennui.
Surprisingly director Ang Lee ("Sense And Sensibility") does a good job
representing the era since he didn't move to the US from Taiwan until 1978. As
with many period pieces, there's a bit too many in-your-face artifacts. During
the first half you'll grow tired of waterbeds, ugly hairstyles and those
atrocious fashions, but they aren't shoved down your throat in the same manner
that they were in "Boogie Nights".
Stepping out of the theater on a crisp winter's night with ice crunching
beneath your feet, you'll realize that we are all slipping around out there in
the wilderness in one way or another. About the most we can hope for is that
we make it through with some measure of grace.
(Michael Redman has celebrated over 22 winter holiday seasons while writing
these columns. He's still awaiting the Christmas spirit.)
[This appeared in the 12/18/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at redman@bvoice.com ]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Pi (1998)
It is the hope of every man, woman and child on the face of the planet that
there is something out there, somewhere, that makes sense of life. If we could
only discover the secret of the universe, everything would fall into place.
Shamen throughout the ages have searched for that arcane answer in varied
places: drugs, alcohol, religion, the occult, sex, isolation. Those who are
afraid of learning the truth use the same methods to hide from it.
Maximillian Cohen (Sean Gullette) has been looking for a way to put chaos into
order all of his life. Now he may have found it.
Pi is the number that represents the ratio of a circle's circumference to its
diameter. 3.14... and on into infinity, the number has no end. Just like the
circle itself, just like the universe. It's connected to the never-ending
golden spiral: the pattern of shells, fingerprints, sunflowers and the our
galaxy itself.
When Max was a child his mother told him not to stare into the sun. Of course
he did. When his vision returned he was a changed person. He has devoted his
existence to staring into his sun: mathematics. Forsaking virtually all human
contact and every other aspect of his life, he's looking for the numerical
formula that explains everything. He even ignores an apparent invitation from
the attractive woman next door for more intimate contact.
This film's mad scientist lives completely surrounded by his computer. Not
just any computer, this machine is an entity unto itself. Pieces of it are
everywhere. Ribbon cables snake up the walls to shelves on the other side of
the room. Stacks of electronic stuff reach the ceiling. Max's claustrophobic
apartment is like a scene out of "Brazil" with an amphetamine drip.
When a bug -- the machine is infested with ants -- causes a chip meltdown, the
printer spits out a 216-digit number. At first Max dismisses it as garbage.
Then he becomes involved with a group of Hasidic Jews who are using Kabalistic
mathematics to decode the Torah trying to discover the true name of God which
happens to be a 216-digit number. Vicious Wall Street businessmen are after
him because this number can predict the stock market. His mentor mentions a
216-digit number that he found while investigating the nature of pi.
Max's obsession seems to have lead him to the truth and now everyone wants
what's inside his head.
"Pi" is a difficult to watch. The frantic pace of the grainy high contrast
overly-exposed black and white visuals is hard on the eyes. The harsh
electronic score sets the audience on edge. It all works perfectly to
illustrate Max's slide into insanity.
Director Darren Aronofsky has achieved a miracle. With a budget of a mere
$60,000 raised by asking friends for $100 each, he created a singular vision
of obsession that won the Sundance Best Director award.
Obsession may be one way to truth, but staring into the face of god can also
burn out your vision. As the film demonstrates, there are some secrets that
most of us would rather not know.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and, if you excuse
him, he's going out to stare into the sun for a while. You can stare into the
electrons at Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 10/15/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for U Turn (1997)
Oliver Stone. Let's get it right up front and out of the way. That's what this
film is about. Oh, it may pretend that it has something to do with a
down-on-his-luck small time gambler running into the weirdest characters this
side of the Pecos, but this is the director's film. It says more about him
than it says about anyone on screen.
Bobby Cooper (Sean Penn) is driving through the Arizona wastelands with a bag
full of $30,000 to repay his gambling debt to Russian mobsters who have
already expressed their displeasure at his tardiness by cutting off two of his
fingers. A blown radiator hose lands him in the town of Superior, a lost
civilization that time forgot and peopled with an grotesque cast of rednecks,
Indians, millionaires and babes.
Pulling into a junkyard masquerading as a gas station, Cooper encounters
proprietor Darrell (Billy Bob Thornton) who reckons that he can fix the
vintage 1964 1/2 Mustang convertible. One look at Darrell's grease-covered
exposed pot belly, coke-bottle glasses and teeth that look as if they belong
in a medical specimen museum convinces you that he's going to fix something,
but it's more likely to be Bobby's wagon than his car. Things aren't made any
better when Cooper makes it clear who belongs where in the hierarchy of hicks
and city slickers.
At this point the gambler's fate is sealed, he just doesn't know it yet. To
kill time he decides to take in the town. When he meets Grace McKenna
(Jennifer Lopez), a sultry femme fatale whose body and lips promise anything
and everything -- but first the price, he quickly accepts her invitation to
come home to help her with some things.
Just as they are about to "hang drapes", Grace's husband Jake (a virtually
unrecognizable Nick Nolte) bursts into the bedroom. After knocking Cooper
around, he offers him a ride back to town.
When he asks him to kill his wife, Cooper replies "I'm not a murderer."
"How do ya know if you haven't tried it?" questions the grizzled millionaire.
His hunger is to do is leave town, but all he gets is trouble. Jake wants him
to kill Grace. Grace wants him to kill Jake. While in a grocery store, he
witnesses a robbery that results in two graphic shotgun killings. His money is
destroyed. A fifties-inspired bimbo (Clare Danes) wants to have his love child
and her equally anachronistic slick cowboy boyfriend TNT (Joaquin Phoenix)
would rather let his fists do the talking. Billy Bob Darrell thinks that a
radiator hose is worth a couple of hundred bucks. The hard-drinkin' sheriff
(Powers Boothe) keeps an open eye on the stranger.
It's not a pleasant community. In a town that looks to have about 500 people,
there are more hidden agendas than in the naked city.
The only almost friendly, albeit no less bizarre, face belongs to a blind
Vietnam vet Native American shaman (an even more unrecognizable Jon Voight)
who hauls around his dead dog and demands Dr. Peppers.
Based on John Ridley's "Stray Dogs", the most obvious aspect of the film is
Robert Richardson's cinematography. Jerky fast zooms and pans combined with
over-exposed grainy film stock work well to create an edgy uncomfortable
feeling in the audience. Although a bit too MTVesque for my tastes, it
certainly does what it is designed to do. It puts you into Cooper's frame of
mind: stark, frantic and desperate for the experience to end.
And that's one of the problems with the movie. It may be art, but it's often
not enjoyable. The quirky filming gets old after a while. There's not one
likable character in the story. The dark violent humor is uncomfortable;
you're unsure if you want to laugh or be disgusted. It's a bloody car wreck
with clowns strewn on the highway.
Stone has been on an eccentric road himself. From his marvelous "Platoon" and
"JFK" to the brutal "Natural Born Killers" and now to this, it's obvious that
he's looking for something. What it is, we can only guess. "U-Turn" is a
sideroad to excess, but hopefully he's gone to the extreme, found his muse and
is on his way back.
With Stone, even the mis-fires are worth experiencing and all we can do is
strap on our seatbelts and brace ourselves for the ride.
(Michael Redman, after over 22 years of writing this column, is probably going
to do it again next week. Email to mredman@bvoice.com will probably find him eventually.)
[This appeared in the 10/9/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Muse, The (1999)
Those damn Muses. The children of Zeus and Mnemosyne are some of the most
infuriating of the gods. They are supposed to provide artistic inspiration but
they're so demanding and just when you need them, they are busy elsewhere.
You sit in front of a glowing computer screen or stand at your easel and
there's nothing there. No words. No brushstrokes. You dig deep inside and come
up empty. You can't hit the zone that disengages your mind and allows your
hands to take on a life of their own.
The Muses require a heavy toll. Artists, writers and musicians have varied and
often opposing methods of paying tribute: drugs, alcohol, sex, abstinence,
solitude, nature, meditation. Many of these are played to the extreme and are
often self-destructive, but the Muses demand the artist leave the realm of
everyday to receive their messages.
Once you get into contact with them, you're on fire. Everything flows.
Manuscripts are written, pictures painted, poems composed. You don't even
notice hours have passed and the morning birds are singing. The gods are in
their universe and all's right with the world.
Steven Phillips (Albert Brooks) is a lucky man. He's dealing with Sarah
(Sharon Stone), a living breathing real-life Muse who is helping him with his
screenwriting slump. Well, maybe he's not so fortunate: Sarah is something of
a bitch goddess.
Steven is a successful writer. He has 17 screenplays to his credit, one an
Oscar nominee. But the day after receiving a Humanitarian award, the studio
dumps him. His work has lost its edge. He's past his prime.
Desperate for help, he visits his buddy Jack Warrick (Jeff Bridges) who
reluctantly turns him on to Sarah. She has helped him before and is quite the
Hollywood deity about town.
Steven is overjoyed to work with the Muse until he discovers her requirements.
He must bring gifts -- jewelry from Tiffany's. When she gets it, she casually
tosses it into a large pile of other boxes in the same pale blue wrapping
paper. Homage from other clients. She insists he put her up in a $1,700 a day
suite in the Four Seasons. She calls in the middle of the night with a yen for
Waldorf Salad. He brings it to her, but she's fallen asleep and doesn't want
it anymore.
He's willing to put up with all of this because he can write again. When he
stalls, she's too busy helping his wife Laura (Andie MacDowell) start a cookie
business to give him much attention.
It gets worse as directors parade to her looking for help. She advises
"Titanic" director James Cameron not to do a sequel ("Stay away from the
water"). Martin Scorsese needs to talk to her about a re-make of "Raging Bull"
with a thin guy ("Not just a thin guy, but a _really_ thin guy"). Steven can't
get any time.
Surprisingly, Sharon Stone is the hit of the film. Sarah is a perfect
combination of sex goddess and artistic inspiration who arrives at just the
right time to save Steven's sanity. Stone has a comedic flare and perfectly
captures the flighty irresistible Muse used to having men cater to her every
whim. She abuses them and they come back for more because she has what they want.
Brooks also directed the film and mostly hits the target. He does miss
occasionally and this gives the movie an odd pacing. Just when everything is
going fine and the audience is captured, an ill-conceived scene brings it all
down. Then he salvages with another hilarious bit. Perhaps he should have hung
out with Sarah a bit more.
Bridges is outstanding in his small but pivotal role. His natural assumption
of the character makes you wish he were around for more screen time. MacDowell
is a charmer, but her performance seems flat.
The ending is a bit out of left field and undermines the charm of rest of the
film. Perhaps because I fell under Sarah's spell, I have to wonder if the
gray-bearded doctor is exactly who he says he is. The Greek gods are often tricksters.
This isn't a blockbuster and won't pull in the big bucks, but it's an
enchanting fairy tale and Sarah is enthralling.
(Michael Redman has written this column for 'bout 24 years. Muses can email
tales of inspiration to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 9/2/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
When the perception of America's downtowns became one of fear and
inconvenience, we decided that we'd rather shop in Disneyland. Thus began the
malling of the nation. Although it never happened, the original concept of
shopping malls was that they would become miniature towns.
What they've turned into are sanitized homogenous Everywheres. Walk into any
mall in any city and it doesn't matter where you are, you're in "The Mall".
You can buy the same pair of jeans from the same Gap in the same mall in
nearly every city in the country. The malls are safe and easy shopping but
they're remarkably boring.
Even worse they've resulted in the deaths of uncountable enchanting small
shops. As the managers of the mall stores are packing up the day's money and
shipping it off to the home office thousands of miles away, the owners of the
small shops are staying awake nights trying to figure out how to pay bills.
Eventually they can't.
Now that downtowns are regaining some of their appeal and becoming gentrified,
it's happening there also. Stick a Starbucks on every corner, an Old Navy and
Barnes and Noble down every block and soon we'll have one city multiplied many
times over across the continent.
Kathleen Kelly (Meg Ryan) is the owner of The Shop Around The Corner, a small
children's bookshop and she's just received terrible news. A Fox Books
Superstore is opening in her neighborhood and she knows that means the end of
the business that her mother started decades ago.
When she runs into Joe Fox (Tom Ryan), the youngest of the Fox Books
patriarchy, at a social gathering, they take an instant dislike to each other.
Joe is the ultimate businessman delighting in running competitors out of
business. ("It's not personal, it's business.")
At their homes they both wait for their lovers to leave each morning before
logging onto AOL to check emails. Booting up her Mac Powerbook  and signing in
as "Shopgirl", Kathleen has lost her cyber-heart to "NY152" whom she met in an
over-30 chatroom. They've never met and don't know each other's actual
identities, but exchange poetic messages across the ethers.
Since this is a movie, NY152 is Joe. In a real chat room Shopgirl would be a
13 year-old girl pretending to be a sex goddess and NY152 would be a German Shepherd.
A remake of the 1940's "The Shop Around The Corner", the film is a return to
light romantic comedies of bygone days. Reuniting Hanks, Ryan and director
Nora Ephron from "Sleepless In Seattle", this proves that you can use the same
actors, virtually the same plot and still produce an enjoyable film.
"Mail" has about a thousand things going for it. It's a feel-good film with
phenomenally likable actors. It's a Christmas release: just the time when
people need a break in their frantic schedule. It's about finding the true
love everyone searches for.
Tom Hanks is the all-American guy. His roles are generally those of highly
principled courageous men. He's easy to trust. He begins this film as a
hard-nosed businessman, but you just know he's going to warm up.
Meg Ryan is the closest thing to being America's sweetheart that the cynical
nineties can allow. Every single thing about her is perky and she brightens up
the screen whenever she's on. For the males in the audience she could probably
carry a film by just showing up.
These two are people that we'd like to have as friends or lovers and
desperately want to cling to the illusion (or reality) that they are the same
people offscreen as they are in the films. We want them in our lives even if
only for two hours. They are what makes the film work although their chemistry
is Love-Lite. There is a spark there, but no fire.
The supporting cast is fairly strong. Greg Kinnear is Frank, Kathleen's
Luddite boyfriend who is passionate about everything except her. Parker Posey,
the queen of independent films, plays Patricia, Joe's live-in. Patricia is a
hyper career woman who as Joe says, "makes coffee nervous." You get the
feeling that both couples lead such busy lives they haven't noticed that they
have fallen out of love. Until the chatroom.
The film is not completely wonderful. It's acceptable that everyone
anticipates the ending in advance, after all this is a romantic comedy. What's
not quite so agreeable is that everything is so damned cute.
Meg Ryan is adorable. We don't have to be reminded of that over and over.
Yeah, she looks good even in flannel PJs, but showing her prance around to a
cartoon music soundtrack is banging us over the head with the obvious. When
the two internet lovers pass on the street without realizing who each other
is, it's amusing. The second and third times add nothing.
Joe makes major changes through the film, but once he discovers who Shopgirl
is, he is still manipulative, always with the upper hand. There is a lack of
honesty in the character that is troubling.
Kathleen's struggling shopkeeper role is compromised by the fact that she has
far too many employees in a small store and towards the end seems able to live
comfortably without the shop's income. Her and Frank's breakup is the stuff of
fantasy, never to occur in the real world. But maybe it's looking too deep to
notice these things. This is a fairy tale. 
Some of the film rings true especially for those of us who check email before
that first cigarette or cup of coffee. The comment that closing the shop would
be the "brave thing to do" because it would give her the chance to imagine her
life some other way is an intriguing idea.
Although I enjoy both actors, "Sleepless In Seattle" was not my favorite film,
suffering as it did from the same terminal cuteness. This one is better but it
could have done with some judicious editing. It's not a masterpiece, but it is
nice. I can live with that.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and in the current
spirit of confessing affairs that might result in a conflict of interests, has
to state for the record that he has never had an affair with Meg Ryan -- at
least not in the physical world. Email anonymous musings to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 12/23/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas (1998)
"Moderation In All Things" is the unofficial motto of the United States. From
our Puritan founding to the doorway of the 21st century, virtue is to be found
through clear thinking and clean living. Extravagance is not only imprudent,
it's a sin.
There's a different opinion held by some seekers for truth. They believe that
to truly see, you must escape the consensus reality overlay imposed by
society. They point to the theory that reaching altered states of
consciousness is a need hard-wired in the human biology. One of the first
inventions of the early nomadic tribes was the discovery that drinking
fermented honey resulted in a different reality. Around the same time, they
found that ingesting certain plants revealed a new point of view. Children
achieve the change by twirling rapidly in circles. Even animals indulge in
alcoholic rotten fruit.
Mankind has a long history of shamanistic oracles leading their people
through insights gained from drug-induced journeys. Poets, artists and others
given to intemperance live on the fringes on society, often shunned by the
mainstream, but just as often looked to as a source of insight. Frequently
these people are demented, occasionally enlightened and sometimes both.
"The road of excess leads to the palace of wisdom," writes William Blake.
Journalistic shaman Hunter S. Thompson puts it another way: "When the going
gets weird, the weird turn pro." It doesn't get any weirder than Las Vegas in
the early seventies.
The film is based on his 1971 classic novel of gonzo journalism. Supposedly
reporting on an off-road race, Raoul Duke (Johnny Depp) and his attorney Dr.
Gonzo (Benicio Del Toro) -- thinly disguised Thompson and associate Oscar
"Zeta" Acosta, a noted Chicano lawyer -- are actually in search of the
American dream. Loading the trunk of their rented Caddy convertible with every
known (and some unknown) drug, they head through the desert for the city of dreams.
Discussing the plot of this movie is pointless. In fact the plot itself is
pointless. Thompson's style of writing was to ingest as many mind-altering
substances as possible and write about his experiences. That many of those
experiences existed only in his head makes it impossible to tell what really
happened. And it doesn't matter. This is one man's extremely unique point of
view. If you're looking for a coherent storyline, this isn't it.
As Duke and Gonzo stumble through Las Vegas, their vision is wild and
incoherent. Lounge lizards morph into real reptiles. The carpet melts and
flows up the wall. The noted attorney sits fully clothed in a bathtub filled
with water, grapefruit rinds and assorted garbage and waving a 10-inch hunting
knife at his friend who is defending himself with a shower curtain.
The film is certainly not for everyone. It's bound for many Worst Of 98 lists
and just as likely to turn up on Bests inventories. For the first several
minutes, I thought it was remarkably insipid, but then either the film or I
changed and it became a ride through the absurd. For the first time in a long
while, I found myself laughing out loud in a movie theater. But my companion
hated the film.
This may be the most authentic depiction of the hallucinogenic drug
experience ever captured on film...or so I've been told. Several of the scenes
are accurate and hilarious at the same time. When Gonzo is trapped on a
revolving bar moving about one mile per hour and afraid to step off, some of
the audience was rolling in laughter while others were walking out.
There is a poignant moment when Thompson gazes west out of his hotel window
and talks about the hopes of the hippies who were sure that they could
transform America into a land of peace and freedom. He explains that if you
look hard enough you can see the high water mark where the wave crested and
rolled back. If there is a time of lucid truth in the film, this is it.
It's always a delight when one of Hollywood's pretty boys transforms into a
talented actor. Depp is marvelous as Thompson, reeling and darting from wall
to wall attempting to escape killer bats. Although he is smaller than the real
journalist and comes across as considerably less dangerous than the hulking
gun-toting out of control writer, his depiction works.
The other actors are equally up to task. Peppered with cameos by the real
Thompson, Ellen Barkin (in a disturbing diner scene), Penn Jillette and many
others, the film is a "spot the actor" game. A few episodes don't work. Gary
Busey as the cop who pulls Duke over is unimpressive and the scene (one of the
few not from the book) turns into a waste of time. The two-hour length could
do with a bit of trimming.
The weakest link among the actors is Del Toro. As frantic and irrational as
he is, my memory of the book's Dr. Gonzo is as even more menacing and over the
top. He's not bad, just not as on-target as possible.
Thompson is the anti-Nancy Reagan: his attitude towards drugs is obviously
"Just say yes". It's amazing that this film got made in today's social climate
and may die a rapid death at the boxoffice.
When we look back at our historic forefathers, it's tempting to remember them
as questing for freedom and forget that they were mostly criminals and
outcasts. While I'm not sure I would want Hunter Thompson as a neighbor, he
has something to say. If only we could figure out what it is.
(Michael Redman has written this column for 23 years and has seldom had a more
disorienting cinematic experience than seeing both "Fear And Loathing" and
"Godzilla" in the same evening.)
[This appeared in the 5/28/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Misrables, Les (1998)
        Can a person fundamentally change? This is a question that has been plaguing
philosophers ever since our ancestors sat around their campfires discussing
the nature of things. Is there such a such a state as redemption?
        French convict Jean Valjean (Liam Neeson) and Inspector Javert (Geoffrey
Rush) are at opposite ends of the spectrum when answering this conundrum. In
this version of Victor Hugo's classic novel - there have been at least 15
others - their interactions are at the core of the film.
        Valjean skips out on his parole after serving 19 years in an early 19th
century prison for the crime of stealing bread to eat. Encountering a kind
monsignor who forgives him after the criminal steals, Valjean turns his life
around. Years later he has somehow become wealthy, owns a factory and is mayor
of the small town of Vigau.
        When Javert arrives as the new prefect of police, he believes that he
recognizes Valjean from the days when he was a prison guard. Because once a
man is a criminal, he's always a criminal ("Reform is a discarded fantasy"),
he sets out to expose the mayor's past.
        Valjean's factory is a tight ship. He demands clean living from his workers,
going as far as separating the sexes in the work place. When Fantine (Uma
Thurman) is found to be an unwed mother, she is dismissed. Without an income,
she is forced into prostitution to make money to support her daughter.
        Later Valjean saves her from brutality and jail time at the hands of Javert.
Incarceration turns out to be the least of Fantine's worries: she is dying of
tuberculosis. Her last wish is for her benefactor to care for her daughter.
         He decides to flee when his history is brought to light, either by Javert's
scheming or Valjean's morality. The film doesn't make it clear. Gathering up
Fantine's daughter Cosette, they sneak into the heavily guarded city of Paris.
They live in a convent shut off from the outside world for 10 years until the
now-grown girl (Claire Danes) decides that she doesn't want to take vows.
        The two set up a soup kitchen to feed Paris' teeming poor and who should show
up but Javert. He is able to track Valjean down by following Marius (Hans
Matheson), a revolutionary leader who has fallen in love with Cosette. Amidst
the backdrop of one of several French revolts in the early 1800s, the final
showdown between the two life-long rivals is played out.
        The film is epic in scope with impressive sets and costuming, but there are
some major flaws. It is difficult, perhaps impossible, to translate Hugo's
1,000-plus page book into a two-hour film. The story encompasses 20 years,
dozens of characters and is heavy on internal dialogue. Not the stuff of
successful films.
        Screenwriter Rafael Yglesias took the impossible task and cut the novel to
the core out of necessity. He concentrates on struggle between Valjean and
Javert, eliminating many characters and sub-plots. While he had no choice but
to drop most of the book, some of his other choices are dubious. In the book
Valjean is not violent but in the film, he often uses his fists to prove his point.
        Neeson is his usual grand brooding self and portrays the reformed brute with
a quiet passion. Thurman eats up the screen as the dying whore providing the
most lively character in the film. Rush's obsessed cop who lives in fear of
breaking a rule is interesting, but there isn't much range in the character.
None of the rest of the actors are anything more than adequate and some not
quite so.
        The love stories between Valjean and Fantine and between Cosette and Marius
are not believable. We are never shown a motivation for Valjean's attraction
to her (except perhaps for her beauty) unless it's his guilt from putting her
into dire circumstances. The only possible reason for Cosette's falling in
love with the bland lifeless boy is that he's the first male she met. Neither
of these relationships are convincing although it is amusing to see Marius
begging for "just an hour" off from revolutionary fighting to visit his lover.
        The biggest problem with the film is its lack of grandeur. Epic scale films
call for epic scale scenes and emotional responses from the audience on the
same level. The scenes here are small, mostly involving only a few people.
With the climate of post-revolutionary Paris, the possibilities for
magnificent vignettes on a large scale are endless, but we get only a few
minutes. The film lacks energy and power. It never reaches the heights it
might have.
        It's difficult to care about most of the characters. With the exception of
Valjean and Fantine, the film is filled with cold one-dimensional people.
Perhaps that's why Cosette and Marius' affair is so difficult to grasp.
Neither of them are humans, only cardboard cut-outs. When the audience isn't
involved with the players, there is no epic. Swedish director Bille August
("The Best Intentions", "Pelle The Conqueror") gives us very little to work with.
        The immense popularity of the musical that has been selling out for years
almost guarantees this film's success no matter it's quality. In the future
producers would do well to look for 50-page short stories to adapt to film or
plan for five-hour films. The "Reader's Digest" versions don't do justice to
the originals and even worse, they don't work.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years right here in
beautiful southern Indiana and is grateful for the new green. Email fan
letters and evil comments to redman@bvoice.com.)
[This appeared in the 5/7/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Liar Liar (1997)
For such an over-the-edge actor, Jim Carrey has had a career of
"almosts". The witty television series "The Duck Factory" almost had an
audience. "Ace Ventura" parts One and B were almost funny. "The Cable
Guy" was almost a good film.
In "Liar Liar", the rubber-faced one is hilarious and he almost raises
the film above its terminally saccharine plot.
Fletcher Reid (Carrey) is a fast-talking lawyer with his occupation's
stereotypical lack of regard for the truth. On the fast track towards
partnership in his firm, Reid doesn't have much time for his five year
old son. He continually disappoints the kid by promising to spend time
with him and not showing up. =
Young Max is growing tired of the lies. Explaining to his class what his
father does for a living, he calls him a "liar". His teacher corrects
him, reminding him that he must mean "lawyer". Yeah, maybe.
On Max's birthday party (sans dad of course), his wish is that Fletcher
should go through one day telling only the truth. Luckily his wish comes
true =97 otherwise we wouldn't have much of a film. For a man who lives o=
n
little white lies, and a few enormous black ones, this is not an easy
task.
After spending an evening making a partner so that he could make
partner, he tells her "I've had better." In one of the movie's several
low neckline cleavage-heavy scenes, he tells a new resident in the
building exactly why men are so helpful to her. And on it goes.
The main storyline concerns a new, very important client. A young ditzy
blonde with the all important plunging neckline and ample bosom is
divorcing her zillionaire husband and Reid wants to take him for all
he's worth. If he does well with this trial, his partnership is in the
bag.
The problem is that with their pre-nup and her infidelity (seven lovers
at last count), there really isn't much of a case=85unless he plays fast
and lose with the truth. Now he can't lie.
The story is much the same as the other half dozen over-worked absent
father films that have graced us during the past few months. Nice young
boy, attractive divorced wife who still loves him, too much work: you
know the drill. Everyone's cute, cute, cute and I, for one, hate "cute".
When the plot's not cute, it's insipid. When it's cute, it's even worse.
The good news is that Carrey is a slapstick genius. Some of his bits
where he explodes onto the screen are inspired. A scene where Reid mugs
himself in a restroom, slamming himself into a wall, smashing his own
head with a toilet seat and punching himself out demonstrates his skill
as a physical comedian. His struggle with a pen is as classic as any
spit-take.
Unfortunately this doesn't mean that he's much of an actor here.
Obviously the film was constructed around his ad libs and antics, many
of which are great. The mistake happens when the movie turns to his
relationship with his son and even worse, with his wife. While the love
between father and son is believable, it never takes the film anywhere.
Without Carrey, the film would be unwatchable. As it is, it's only
unwatchable part of the time.
The best bits -- and this will tell you a lot -- are the outtakes shown
as the credits run. Director Tom Shadyac has the good taste to let
Carrey run wild most of the time, falling apart only when he attempts to
do something with a plot. Perhaps they should have made a movie entirely
of the film on the cutting room floor.
[This appeared in the 3/27/97 issue of the "Bloomington Voice",
Bloomington, Indiana. Michael Redman can be reached at
mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Bounce (2000)
Paltrow, Affleck bounce...but not very high
A majority of people probably begin affairs with little white lies. Their
personal history ("I've never done this before") and current status ("Of
course they're real") are exaggerated slightly to create a more positive
face. Praise ("You're the best I've ever been with") tends towards the hyperbolic.
Some falsehoods are more serious ("That was someone else with the same name
in the newspaper") and some downright dangerous ("No, I'm not psychotic").
If the relationship progresses there comes a time when the honesty must out
and intense back-peddling takes place ("Well, yes, I am sorta married, but
I'm getting divorced soon, I promise"). The more monumental the deception,
the higher the level of guilt and the greater the risk in both telling the
truth and keeping the secret. Explaining that "I'm the man who caused your
husband's death and I've been lying to you ever since we met" is probably a
potential deal-breaker.
Buddy (Ben Affleck) faces such a dilemma when he falls for the widow of the
man he unintentionally doomed.
In a snowed-in airport bar, the ad exec sits with two strangers awaiting
news of their delayed flights. Greg (Tony Goldwyn) wants to get home to his
family. Buddy wants to score a homer with Mimi (Natasha Henstridge), their
attractive companion. When Mimi hints heavily that she wouldn't be opposed
to sharing her hotel room, Buddy gives his rescheduled flight ticket to Greg.
Sex with a perfect stranger saves Buddy's life. The plane crashes with no survivors.
Understandably shaken by his close brush, Buddy hits the bottle for a year.
As part of the 12-step recovery program, he has to make amends to people he
has wronged and looks up Greg's widow Abby (Gwyneth Paltrow).
He is unable to admit who he is and lies to her, tossing a big real estate
deal her way trying to relieve some of his guilt for destroying her life.
She lies to him ("I'm divorced") so she doesn't appear pathetic.
Ignoring all the danger signs (guilt-ridden man wants to rescue wounded
woman so he can make himself feel better) and this being a movie, their lies
lead to -- you guessed it -- true love. The film follows the tried but true
formula. He falls for her and can't bring himself to confess because it
would destroy their relationship. Does she find out? Do they break up? Can
they get back together? You've seen this all before.
It takes forever for Abby learn the truth. Since you know it's going to
happen, every scene poses the question. Is he going to tell her now? How
about now? Maybe now? Better to get it done with and on with the story.
Just because the outcome of every plot element is known after the first five
minutes doesn't necessarily mean you won't enjoy the film. But it does mean
that characterization and chemistry have to work overtime. Here there is
good news and bad news.
Paltrow does a credible job portraying a real woman with real concerns:
single motherhood, guilt over dishonoring her dead husband's memory.
Affleck's journey from wise-cracking rogue to caring lover and father figure
by way of demon rum and AA is an interesting premise but not very
convincing. His character is too over-romanticized to be very believable.
The sparks between them are the linchpin of the film but there is no blazing
fire. The audience's investment in Abby's decision whether she can spend the
rest of her life with a man who reminds her of her dead husband every time
she looks at him requires that we understand her overwhelming desire to do
so. That passion is never on the screen. The two feel shielded from letting
us see any deep emotions.
A different relationship that gets very little screen time is much more
engaging. Buddy's caustic gay assistant  and fellow AA member (Johnny
Galecki) is the liveliest character in the film and has the best lines. A
more interesting story would have been about those two. Instead they go from
enemies to friends invisibly.
Director Don Roos scored a major hit with his quirky "The Opposite Of Sex"
but this mainstream attempt is just so-so. The final few minutes are
absolutely atrocious.
My biggest gripe with this film is product placement. A couple of IMacs in
the background are acceptable, but six-foot tall Coke cans (regular, diet,
caffeine-free -- take your choice) repeatedly shoved in our faces is an
insult. One also has to wonder how much Paltrow's breasts paid for their
prominent screen placement.
(Michael Redman has written this column for a very long time but he has
never lied to make himself look better at the beginning of a relationship.
To the best of his knowledge. Probably. Email entertaining falsehoods to redman@bluemarble.net.)
[This appeared in the 11/23/2000 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bluemarble.net.]

Title
Review for Picture Perfect (1997)
So here's the deal: Kate (Jennifer Aniston) is hungry for advancement in her
advertising career but can't get ahead. The owner of the agency tells her that
he's reluctant to put her in charge of a major campaign because she still has
a college lifestyle, isn't head-over-heels in debt and doesn't owe her soul to
the company store.
To look more traditional she fabricates a fiance by claiming that the stranger
with her in a photo is her intended. As the lie becomes more complex, she is
forced to produce him at a company dinner. Locating Nick (Jay Mohr), she
entices him to pretend that they are involved.
The romantic comedy is predictable which is to be expected, but the surprise
is that our star is so cold and unfeeling. Nick is obviously taken with her,
but she treats him like dirt, preferring Sam (Kevin Bacon) who is only
attracted because she is promised to someone else. Nick's naive love in the
face of her manipulations is embarrassing and difficult to watch.
Aniston (from television's "Friends") is fetching, has some almost-humanizing
mannerisms and does a fine job of almost falling out of her clothes, but is an
unsympathetic heroine. Along with the rest of the cast, her character is just
a step above one-dimensional.
As with "My Best Friend's Wedding", the gentlewoman is conniving and hatches
her schemes to get what she wants without regard to the feelings of others.
Then everyone lives happily ever after. Let's hope this model of womanhood
dies a deservedly early death.
(Michael Redman has written this column for a long time and will spend Monday,
the night of the shooting stars, lying on a remote beach under the open skies
awaiting the cosmic skyshow.)
[This appeared in the 8/7/97 "Bloomington Voice" Bloomington, Indiana. Michael
Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Devil's Own, The (1997)
The situation in Ireland often reminds me of the old Buffalo Springfield
song "For What It's Worth": "There's something happening here, What it
is ain't exactly clear, There's a man with a gun over there, Telling me
I got to beware...There's battle lines being drawn, Nobody's right if
everybody's wrong." 
Whether you favor the wearing of the green or the orange, it's difficult
to uphold your side's atrocities as morally justified or as anything
other than politically justified.
As IRA hero (or terrorist depending upon your political leanings)
Frankie McGuire says "If you're not confused, you don't understand." 
McGuire (Brad Pitt) may recognize that the situation is  foggy, but out
of the necessity of being a soldier at war, he must be single-mindedly
dedicated to his job. Friends may fall by the wayside, he may endanger
innocents, but for the warrior, the goals always justify the means.
Across the ocean, New York Irish cop Tom O'Meara (Harrison Ford) is a
bird of a completely different color. For him, the law is the prize his
eye is on. He plays only by the rules and refuses to lie or cheat in
order to punish the wrong-doers. Of course men not being perfect and
this being a movie, O'Meara faces his personal dark night of the soul
where he must decide which is more important: truth or loyalty.
Make no mistake. There is no doubting who the film says has the better
life. O'Meara's reward is a lovely family in a safe friendly
neighborhood; McGuire's is friends with bullet holes in their foreheads.
When McGuire (traveling as Rory Devaney) is placed in the O'Meara home
by a friend of the family who is a secret IRA fundraiser, the two form
an instant attachment. The cop has three daughters and is grateful that
there is someone else in the house who "pees standing up". The
fugitive's fisherman father was killed in front of him for being a
suspected Republican sympathizer by a hooded gunman when
Devaney...err...McGuire was a young child. The son and da each never
had, it's a match made in a star-crossed heaven.
Pitt's character is posing as an Irish immigrant working on a
construction site, but in reality he's working on a boat that he'll take
across the Atlantic loaded with stinger missiles to even the fight in
Northern Ireland.
The two actors reportedly didn't get along on the set, but that doesn't
show up on the screen. Ford, one of the finest actors of our time, and
Pitt, who can no longer be dismissed as just another pretty boy, have a
dynamic chemistry together.  When they're together in a scene, you can
feel the forceful tension.
The minor downfall of the film is in its lengthy but essential
characterizations of the secondary characters. Far too much time is
spent in demonstrating O'Meara's idyllic family life in Brooklyn. We get
the concept about a half hour before director thinks we do.
Once this is out of the way, the movie takes off. There are very few
black and white ways of looking at the Irish situation and there is an
equal scarcity of good guys and bad guys (except for a particularly
sadistic arms dealer and, of course the British government) in the film.
On opposite sides of the fence, O'Meara and McGuire are both heroic
figures willing to make personal sacrifices for their cause. There's no
way to root for only one and they can't both triumph.
As Frankie McGuire explains "Don't look for a happy ending. It's not an
American story. It's an Irish one."
[This appeared in the 4/3/97 issue of the "Bloomington Voice",
Bloomington, Indiana. Michael Redman can be reached at
mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for If Lucy Fell (1996)
Sarah Jessica Parker and Eric Schaeffer renew a suicide pact to jump off the
Brooklyn Bridge together if they are not involved in fulfilling relationships
by the time she turns 30. There's a heavy deadline because her birthday is in
a month so they are both out there looking for the loves of their lives and
hot to find them in four weeks.
If you can accept the premise, and that's a difficult task, there are a few
decent scenes and a couple of great lines. Besides swallowing the outrageous
concept ("We believe in reincarnation, so if we're not happy and in love in a
few days, we'll kill ourselves."), you have to immerse yourself in the
Generation X world (although at 30, the characters must be elder
statespersons) where serious conversations are about spit and "Whatever" is a
complete sentence.
There's not much interesting about the two main characters. They both seem
superficial and the actors don't go very far towards livening them up. The two
objects of their affections -- an inarticulate artist and the beautiful woman
next door (Elle Macpherson) -- are infinitely more faceted.
The theme of the film, people stuck in the same ole same ole get on with
their lives when they set a deadline, holds some universal appeal. Parker
moves on a career plan, dumps her sorta boyfriend and starts dating. Schaeffer
has an art show of his paintings and finally approaches the woman he has
admired for year.
Unfortunately the film is filled with cliches (two long-time friends go
looking for love, guess who they end up with) and long periods of time where
nothing happens. Some nice music though.
[This appeared in the 3/14/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
Virtually every man and woman snaps awake at least once in their life to hear
the words "This is not my beautiful house. This is not my beautiful life" -
even if they aren't listening to a Talking Heads song.
Call it middle-age crisis or spiritual awakening, suddenly there is a
realization that they've been the walking undead for a l-o-o-o-n-g time and
they want to do something about it. For women it's often triggered by the
biological alarm clock ringing or perhaps the emptying of their nest. For men,
the catalyst is often not so defined, but it usually hits people sometime
after about age 35.
For everyone the change has them looking around at their life and identifying
their lack of fulfillment. Have they really been working at that dead-end job
for 20 years? Have they really forgotten to be alive for decades?
Lester Burnham (Kevin Spacey), 42 year old suburban family man, gets his
wake-up call from God in a time-honored male holy tradition. He falls in lust
with a high school cheerleader.
Lester's fed up with his job. His family hates him and he returns the emotion.
His life is going to hell in a handbasket on the express lane. He is sure that
everything is wrong, "I've lost something. I didn't always feel so sedated."
And he is powerless to do anything about it.
Until, that is, he encounters his daughter Jane's (Thora Birch) seductive
teenage friend Angela (Mena Suvari). That night Angela's image comes to him,
projected on his bedroom ceiling covered in rose petals. Suddenly Lester pump
iron, quits his job and cruises around town smoking dope in his newly-acquired
seventies Firebird with "American Woman" at full blast.
He's become a poster boy for a bad male mid-life crisis: the kind you see in
cartoons of an old guy in a sports car with a blonde babe next to him. The
kind you cringe when someone you know falls into it.
But from the inside it's something entirely different. Lester has opened his
eyes to the truth and is trying every way possible to recapture some of his
enthusiasm for life. Sure he does some stupid things and makes some bad
choices, but at least he's trying. He thinks he's doing it all to get Angela,
but actually he's engaged in a holy war for his soul.
The new boy next door, Ricky Fitts (Wes Bentley), dresses like a Mormon on a
bicycle mission and is obsessed with videotaping Jane. At first she is
grossed-out, but comes to appreciate his artistic soul. When he shows her the
most beautiful thing he has ever taped, it is an empty plastic bag dancing in
the wind. The visual with his voice explaining his feelings is mesmerizing.
Like everyone else in the film, Ricky is an odd internal mix. He finds beauty
in everything, even a dead bird. He's independent, but lets his ex-Marine
father beat him. He won't leave home until his father gives him permission.
Ricky has a moment of exquisite truth when he tells Jane they all live in deep
denial. Everyone in the film is living a lie. Lester's wife Carolyn (Annette
Benning) thinks she'll finally be happy if she can sell more houses. Jane is
saving her money for a "boob job", but when she undresses in front of her
window for Ricky's camera, it's apparent that's the last thing she needs.
In the fifties, living in the suburbs became the holy grail for the middle
class. If they could move out to the land of white picket fences, every day
would be a Pleasant Valley Sunday. In later decades, Ozzie and Harriet were
revealed to be merely masks for the quietly desperate.
The film gradually grows darker as the truths become revealed. When the
characters began to see their wretched lives, it remains hilarious, but with a
much sharper edge.
The greatest strength of "American Beauty" is its actors, followed closely by
the cinematography. There's hardly a mis-step anywhere. If there's any
justice, look for nominations when awards time comes around.
Perhaps the most amazing aspect for me is that the theater was packed. Do this
many people want to see a very dark comedy about how dead they are. Watch for Firebirds.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 24 years or so. He's had
about a dozen mid-life crises and looks forward to many more. Email your tales
of inappropriate lust to redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 10/7/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
This week's Y2K article: http://www.indepen.com/
Y2K archives: http://www.indepen.com/y2k.html

Title
Review for Breakdown (1997)
My favorite scene in this film comes near the end. A huge vehicle
crashes through a bridge, falling to the rocks below. And it doesn't
explode into a fireball! That episode is so satisfying that it more than
makes up for an earlier conflagration.
Bostonian Yups Jeff (Kurt Russell) and Amy Taylor (Kathleen Quinlan) are
heading to new jobs in San Diego. Driving across America in their new
Jeep Grand Cherokee loaded down with all their worldly possessions, they
stand out like the city dwellers that they are in the Arizona
wastelands. The contrast between the clean cuts with their cell phone
(which doesn't work in the isolated wilderness) and the rugged rednecks
in their dirty beat-up pick-ups is one of the less than subtle aspects
of the movie.
When their car breaks down on a deserted highway under the blazing sun,
the Taylors are overjoyed to see good Samaritan trucker Red Barr (the
ominous J.T. Walsh) who offers Amy a ride to the nearest diner. Soon
after she leaves, Jeff reconnects two loose wires and solves the
problem. Everything seems to be working out well until he walks into the
cowboy bar where his wife supposedly awaits him only to discover that
she's not there and probably never has been.
Panicking, he roars down the road and conveniently for the film, finds
Red. Mysteriously the trucker claims not to have ever seen the couple.
Later, back at the bar, everyone seems to be a part of the conspiracy:
the cops, the uncaring cafe country boys, the surly owner and even the
simple-minded kid washing a car in the parking lot.
About half way through, the movie changes it's approach and moves from
mystery to action as Jeff takes on the bad guys. Both portions of the
story work well and fit together fairly seemlessly. The first pulls you
in and the second gives you a chance to cheer for the hero.
Russell has played two very different roles in recent years. Sometimes
he's Snake Plissken ("Escape From This City Or That One"), but here, as
in "Executive Decision", he's Everyman. Jeff becomes something other
than who he has been as he  bulls and blunders his way into becoming a
warrior. There are a few unbelievable bits, but even they are relatively
acceptable. After all, we bought Harrison Ford's stunts in the Indiana
Jones movies. 
Ordinary people forced into heroics by extraordinary situations is a
tried but true theme. It's much easier for the audience to relate to
their next door neighbor than to Rambo. That it could happen to you
makes the film even more suspenseful.
The film "borrows" from a number of others. The story comes from "The
Vanishing", the class conflict from "Deliverance", the mood from
Hitchcock and the truck menace in the beautiful but bleak southwest from
the very early Spielberg "Duel". But, as has been noted often before,
there's not much new under the sun and "Breakdown" does well with the
recycled ideas.
More disturbing is the apparent underlying theme of "us versus them"
where us are the wealthy well educated and them are the blue collar
ne'er do wells. Nearly everyone except our friends from Massachusetts is
evil, scowling, suspicious or a combination of all the above. Even the
one heroic Arizona hick is decidedly unfriendly. This geocentric view of
society seems like a cheap shot.
[This appeared in the 5/12/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Jackal, The (1997)
GERE, WILLIS, POITIER CHASE EACH OTHER AROUND THE WORLD
When the Soviet Union imploded, the western countries lost their shadow. With
the United States friendly with the Russians, we no longer had an entity to
blame for the world's problems. This showed up in Hollywood films as the
communist government was no longer the easy bad guy.
It's time to rejoice because we've found our new villain. Now it's no longer
the Russian government who sends killers out into foreign lands, it's the
Russian _Mafia_. A perfect solution, it combines the dread of organized crime
and the still-present uneasiness with the former Eastern Block countries. Best
of all, the villains are still foreigners: fear of the other always plays best.
So it is a crime lord in Moscow that sends legendary hitman the Jackal (Bruce
Willis) to assassinate a highly placed US government figure in retaliation for
the death of his brother during a nightclub raid. The FBI is at a loss as to
how to protect the target from someone they're not sure even exists.
Coming to their rescue is former IRA operative Declan Mulqueen (Richard Gere)
who is temporarily released from prison to assist FBI agent Carter Preston
(Sidney Poitier) and Russian  Major Valentina Koslova (Diane Venora).
Mulqueen's ex-girlfriend Basque terrorist Isabella (Mathilda May) is the only
person who has seen the elusive Jackal. (Presumably there is an exclusive
international terrorist club somewhere where the three met.)
The film follows two parallel tracks as the Jackal prepares for his $70
million hit and Mulqueen attempts to locate him while Preston makes sure that
the Irishman doesn't slip away. Crossing numerous borders and donning various
disguises for both himself and his mini-van, the killer is always one step
ahead of his pursuers.
Being very loosely based on the same book the 1973 thriller "The Day Of The
Jackal", comparison between the two films is inevitable. There is no doubt
that the original is the better movie, playing the story for suspense rather
than the current action/adventure. As a mystery, "The Jackal" has enough holes
in it to ruin the tale, but if you can accept it for what it is, there's
entertainment to be had.
Holes?  Let's seeA pivotal clue for Mulqueen is so obscure that he must
possess psychic powers to pick it up. For a 20-year veteran that can command
the big bucks, the Jackal is an incredibly poor shot. The final scene between
Gere and Willis occurs in a location that should be mobbed with police, but
it's just the two of them. Willis' disguises usually look like Bruce Willis
and are just as interesting as Val Kilmer's in "The Saint". (And lest you
misunderstand, that's not a compliment.)
But the three stars are fun to watch. It's good to see Gere in something other
than a business suit. Willis has a mixed history in picking projects, but his
characters are always watchable. Poitier is by far the superior actor, but has
limited screen time.
The problems in logic are flaws, but don't ruin the experience. Occasionally
there are movies that transcend their blemishes. This is one of them.
[The appeared in the 11/20/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana]

Title
Review for Fallen (1998)
There are some concepts so deeply hard-wired into the human psyche that they
appear in nearly every culture on the planet. The horror of demons loose on
the earth wreaking havoc and spreading evil is one of these. Films that deal
with universal subjects have an advantage before they even begin: they have
already connected intimately.
Unfortunately "Fallen" doesn't go much further. It does feature an impressive
cast and some cool flash, but those searching for substance will go hungry.
Police Detective John Hobbes (Denzel Washington) has finally caught the serial
killer he's been after and drops in on the execution to bring closure to that 
search. He stops by to visit the killer, Edgar Reese (Elias Koteas) before the
long walk and is greeted by the manic dancing man yelling at him in Aramaic,
an ancient language. Reese meets his doom singing the Stones' "Time is on my side".
Add as that is, Hobbes believes the string of killings is over. Then more
deaths crop up with exactly the same M.O. He and his partner Jonesy (John
Goodman) are mystified, especially so when the first murderer becomes the
second victim. Their superior Lieutenant Stanton (Donald Sutherland) suspects
a cop copy-cat killer.
Solving a riddle left at the scenes of the murders leads Hobbes to the case of
a detective who 30 years ago committed suicide when the department thought he
was dirty. This in turn sends him to Gretta Milano (Embeth Davidtz), the
policeman's daughter who is now a theology professor.
At first she is reluctant to tell him anything about her father's death. When
evidence mounts that Hobbes himself is the new killer, he goes on the run and
shows up at her apartment. She is then a bit more forthcoming.
When the fallen angels were cast out of heaven, their punishment was that they
became formless. Without a body of their own, they could possess a living
being, passing their essence from one to another effortlessly. Milano explains
the demon Azazel that her father battled is what Hobbes faces now. He left
Reese at the moment of death and is currently moving through the population of
the city.
Azazel enjoys playing with the detective. Possessing one after another of
Hobbes' fellow cops, the evil is passed along like a satanic game of tag.
"Time, time, time..." sings one to him. "...is on my side" chimes in the next.
"...Yes it is," finishes a third. The song is repeated effectively throughout
the film. He sees a young girl on the street and hears "Time, time, time..."
The film starts out with a promises, but they turn out to be mostly empty
ones. The death of Reese is well executed. High-contrast grainy film shows the
killers point of view as he sings and dances his way to the gas chamber. The
incident is unsettling and sets the stage for what turns out to be undelivered.
The plot plods along unremarkably to its "shock" ending that is telegraphed in
a major scene long before. You have to wonder how the highly intelligent
detective could be so un-thinking. While there are some impressive bits (the
chase as Azazel flows through a crowd of people is outstanding), the parts in
between these pull the movie down.
Washington is his usual cool self and never a disappointment. He's always
entertaining to watch, but whoever is responsible for deciding to use his
voice as a narrative made an error. The voice-over isn't interesting in tonal
quality and the words are just plain goofy.
Goodman is continuously a joy although in a minor role. His screen time could
have been increased to the benefit of the film. Koteas is also a lively addition.
Sutherland, a wonderful actor, is wasted in his role. Stanton is an
interesting guy and the audience keeps waiting for him to do something. He
never does. The character has no character.
The relationship between the cops rings true. Director Gregory Hoblit ("Primal
Fear" and Emmys for "Hill Street Blues", "LA Law" and "NYPD Blues") has it
down. Even the "Seven"-inspired scenes also work well. The primary problem is
that the entire film is a build-up to an ending that lets down.
Philosophically there's a difficulty. With all these fallen angels inhabiting
people and attempting to destroy mankind, who's around to battle them? A
couple of lowly humans? Where's the divine help? Are we to believe that
whoever's in charge tossed these almost all-powerful destructive fiends on
earth and told us to have a go at 'em. Scary thought.
"Fallen" is engaging enough to watch, but within a few days it'll fade from
your memory like most other could-have-beens. Maybe it should have been titled "Forgotten".
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 22 years and believes that,
while it makes for juicy gossip, the reality of Bill Clinton and Monica
Lewinsky's interaction is not much of our business and is probably just a
publicity stunt for "Wag The Dog". But then, he also believes that "Time,
time, time...is on our side.")
[This appeared in the 1/29/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Elizabeth (1998)
Modern cynical observers maintain that it's virtually impossible for a
virtuous person to enter politics and retain their morals. They say that the
backroom wheeling, dealing and backstabbing will corrupt anyone. Secrecy and
treachery in government are the norm according to the jaded.
As "Elizabeth" demonstrates, this is nothing new. But in the 16th century the
backstabbing was literal. If they were lucky, political enemies were tossed
into prison without a trial. Others were beheaded or burned at the stake. How
long could a newcomer survive without making shady deals?
Elizabeth (Cate Blanchett), daughter of Henry VIII and Anne Boleyn, is living
in the country at her step-parents' house as her half-sister Queen ("Bloody
Mary") Mary (Kathy Bates) rules England. Elizabeth is a delicate pale beauty
with ginger hair frolicking in the fields. Mary is an unpleasant crass monarch
lurking in the shadows while she burns heretics. It's not difficult to decide
who the film wants us to like.
In a Britain that is torn apart by religious wars, Catholic Mary is afraid of
Protestant Elizabeth but won't sign the execution orders. She has her thrown
in the Tower Of London. Elizabeth survives and when Mary dies in 1558, she is
crowned Queen of England 
She is immediately faced with bad news. The army is in shambles; the treasury,
empty and they face danger from domestic and foreign enemies on every side.
Her court is filled with conspirators and there are very few people she can
believe. One trusted advisor, Sir William Cecil (Richard Attenborough) tells
her that she is in mortal danger until she produces an heir. Assassination
attempts prove him correct.
Cutting ties with Rome, she creates another powerful foe. The Pope release
English Catholics from allegiance to her and suggests that her death would be
a good thing for the church. A priest with that messages is dispatched to key
English families.
Pressured to marry either a French duke or Spanish king to forge political
alliances, Elizabeth shows that she is headstrong and refuses either. She
prefers the companionship of Robert Dudley (Joseph Fiennes). According to the
film, the Virgin Queen was certainly not one in the modern sense of the word.
Her bedroom scenes with Dudley demonstrate the hotblood that goes along with
her hothead.
Elizabeth's master spy Sir Francis Walsingham (Geoffrey Rush) does her dirty
work, eliminating foes by one means or another. Especially impressive is his
meeting with Mary of Guise (Fanny Ardant), the French Queen of Scotland, who
is amassing French troops on the English border.
The film looks great. As with other period dramas, the settings and costumes
are wondrous on the screen. A problem that I have with most such stories is
that it is difficult to tell what is fact and what is made up for the film.
There are historical inaccuracies here, but none that get in the way of the story.
Much of the movie's strength is in its actors. Blanchett is captivating as the
fragile young woman who grows into strength. Fiennes is adequate although
nothing special. Ardant is a breath of fresh air although she is given little
screen time. Although an enemy, she is the warmest character. Outstanding is
Rush as Elizabeth's icy enforcer. More of Walsingham's exploits would have
been appreciated.
The film's major flaw is that the numerous plots and maneuverings are
difficult to follow. Fifteen years of history are compressed into a couple. As
conspirators move in the shadows, many look alike and it would be difficult to
tell the players even with a scorecard. Although the general plot is
understandable, individual scenes are confusing. Without a strong background
in English history, it's often difficult to tell what is going on. After the
film was over, I understood what happened, but I wasn't sure exactly who did
what or even who was who.
[This appeared in the 12/3/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Mary Reilly (1996)
The Jekyll and Hyde story told from his maid's point of view is, in a word,
"Dark". You wouldn't expect something bright and cheery based on Robert Louis
Stevenson's novel, but the film is surprisingly dreary and dismal.
Jekyll/Hyde (John Malkovich) is terminally depressed and desperate. Mary
Reilly (Julia Roberts) is a victim of monstrous child abuse and the anti-woman
sentiment of the times. Director Stephen Fears' version of the London slums
makes us marvel that anyone survived them. The lighting level is exceedingly
low throughout the movie: it almost appears to be filmed in black and white.
The direction and cinematography are brilliant and liquid. Scenes flow into
the next scene like honey oozing off a strawberry. (Except there's no red, of
course.) The look is so moody and melodramatic that you'll be shocked when you
leave the theater. I saw it at a matinee and took quite a while to adjust to
the sunny skies afterward.
Often the Jekyll and Hyde archetypes are viewed as splitting a whole person
into components of good and evil or perhaps cerebral and emotional parts. Here
the doctor is intellectual and perhaps good, but certainly powerless. His
alter ego is forceful and totally without conscience. Two parts that make up a
whole. Neither are capable of functioning without the other and once
separated, disaster is inevitable.
The differences between the two characters would be more effective if it were
accomplished by demeanor and attitude.  When we finally see the
transformation, the special effects thrust the story into the realm of science
fiction, not the psychological horror that the tale demands.
Roberts and Malkovich are skillful in their roles. Both are suitably
melancholy, fitting in with the rest of the film. The only flash of life and
color comes from Glenn Close (and her lips) as the madam of a whorehouse where
Hyde lives, and surprisingly, Jekyll apparently frequents. Life and color
maybe, but this is not Close's best role. She seems little more than a
cardboard cutout character.
A beautiful film in its own dreary way. You'll appreciate the filmmaking
craft, but don't expect to leave in an upbeat mood.
[This appeared in the 2/25 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana. Michael
Redman can be contacted a redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
This mummy should have stayed under wraps
Ancient Egypt has been a source of fascination for the western world for
centuries. Mysteries surrounding the construction and meaning of the pyramids
have given rise to numerous theories: some outlandish, others difficult to
believe and none proven.
Most information concerning the arcane secrets of the gigantic structures has
been lost to vandals and the ravages of time. Were they built using science
that we no longer know about? By ancient astronauts from Sirius? By engineers
from legendary Atlantis? Or is there a more mundane answer that, for some
reason, we've been unable to discover?
Recent discoveries that the pyramids might be much older than previously
thought, that they are accurate astronomical indicators and that they might
not have been built as burial chambers verify how little we know.
The lack of facts only adds to the allure of the lost civilization. In the
early 1900s, occult groups dressed in Egyptian garb. There's even a pyramid
with a floating eye on the back of U.S. currency.
The film is loosely based on the 1932 classic which spawned at least seven
sequels and the Universal Films series of monster films. If we're lucky, this
version will die without any descendants.
In 1719 BC, Egyptian high priest Imhotep (Arnold Vosloo) is caught with his
hands on the Pharaoh's mistress. Not living in a particularly forgiving
culture, he is mummified alive, doomed to spend all eternity in torment with
flesh-eating bugs for company.
Soldier of fortune Rick O'Connell (Brendan Fraser) stumbles across the hidden
ruins of the lost city of Hamunaptra in 1923. A few years later he returns
with librarian and Egyptologist Evelyn (Rachel Weisz) looking for gold and
archeological treasure.
Unwittingly they unleash Imhotep, who now has almost unlimited powers although
he's not likely to show up in People's most beautiful people issue. His
wrappings eaten by the insects, the priest has decomposed and is...gooey.
Grabbing various organs from available humans, he rebuilds himself so he can
resurrect his long-dead lover.
The movie is filled with special effects designed to awe and frighten the
audience, but the most horrifying aspect of the film is that it is a comedy.
The original featured atmospheric lighting and smart directing to create
tension. The 1999 version is more like a high budget "The Three Stooges Meet
Indiana Jones And The Mummy".
The attraction that fills the seats is the anticipation of magnificent
effects. The previews are a masterpiece of promises that don't deliver. Some
of the effects are impressive, but others are surprisingly lame. The early
sequences in ancient Egypt are majestic, but the computerized scenery features
that too-smooth look that plagues recent films. It looks like the background
is filmed through a thick layer of Vaseline. Later, the re-animated bodyguards
aren't much better than the monsters in "Jason And The Argonauts".
There are missed opportunities galore. Director Stephen Sommers wastes time
showing Evelyn knocking over bookcases while virtually ignoring the mysterious
guardians of Hamunaptra.
Details of the plot are troublesome. Why would the Egyptians construct a
creature who would destroy the country if discovered? The other group of
treasure hunters racing to the lost city adds nothing to the story.
The cast is a mixed blessing. Fraser never connects with his character and
Weisz's damsel in distress is too goofy. The second bananas fare better. John
Hannah as Evelyn's scheming brother is a perfect foil for the adventurers.
Kevin O'Connor plays sniveling Beni with a presence that does Peter Lorre
proud. Oded Fehr as Ardeth Bay, leader of the guardians, is intriguing but
barely on-screen.
The film is less reminiscent of the original than it is of "Allan Quatermain
and the Lost City of Gold", a feeble "Raiders Of The Lost Ark" rip-off.
Producer James Jacks admits "Indiana Jones" was a role model.
Maybe they should have looked a bit more carefully at what made that movie
work. "The Mummy" is a farce masquerading as an adventure film based on a
classic horror film. It succeeds at none of the above.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and has decided that
mummification may not be his choice for eternity after all. Email random words
to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 5/13/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for First Wives Club, The (1996)
You know, this is a film that must have sounded like a no-brainer in the
meetings. Mix equal portions of two financial and critical successes,
"The Big Chill" and "9 To 5" and  toss in three of the best female
comedians in the business today. Shake vigorously and serve.
Brenda (Bette Midler), Elise (Goldie Hawn) and Annie (Diane Keaton) were
best friends in their college years but havent kept in touch since
then. Brought together by the suicide of the fourth in their group, they
discover that they have all reached "that" age. All have been dumped by
their husbands of decades for a younger, newer and more pert model.
As the three bond, they become more empowered and plot to get even via
their exs billfolds. Using a group of enjoyable cronies including
Maggie Smith, Bronson Pinchot, Jennifer Dundas and Philip Bosco; they
get the goods on the guys and begin to blackmail them.
The subjects of "Trophy Wives" and womens worth as they age, the
possibilities for cutting satire and any opportunity for engaging the
audience disappear out the window as the film never tackles any of these
head-on and doesnt rise above a television movie of the week level.
Every moment I was waiting for the three stars to explode out of the
plodding doldrums.
Part of the problem is that director Hugh Wilson comes from a television
and "Police Academy" background. Hardly cutting-edge stuff and little
experience available as to how to handle this type of film.
Hawn and Keaton are two long-time personal faves and both give as much
as possible to the film, but get dragged into the mire. Midler often
turns in dynamic performances although here she is the least of the
three.
The husbands and their bimbo girlfriends are icons of people as opposed
to real humans. The only sincerely likable character in the film is
Dundas as Annies lesbian daughter.
The movie attempts to deal with a number of stories. It takes a very
extended amount of time in the beginning to even tie together the lives
of the women, giving us a slow start. Something that this film does not
need.
The dumped wives are difficult to relate to on a personal level. They
are all wealthy, even though they're no longer remarkably rich. With the
exception of Midler, they live in spacious Manhattan apartments, run
with the society set and appear to be extremely financially comfortable.
Their ex-husbands are writing checks to them with amounts close to a
quarter million dollars.
The women were injured in psychologically and it would have made the
film much more interesting if they had gone after the men in the same
way. Instead we get to watch money exchange hands from one person who
has tons of it to another person who doesnt have quite as many tons.
There are so many other problems with the movie, but there are equal
numbers of bright spots. You cant put this cast into a film without
coming up with some comical scenes, even if just by dumb luck.
The film isn't atrocious. In fact, it's pleasant, but cant we expect
something better than just __pleasant__?
[This appeared in the "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana,
9/26/96. Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible (1996)
[Note: This appeared in The Bloomington Voice (Bloomington, IN) May
30, 1996]
     Supposedly based on the television series from the late sixties
and early seventies, this film directed by Brian De Palma is only
barely. It does have the series title, a character's name (although
certainly not the *same* character) and some hi-tech gobligoop, but
that's all that connects it to the original.
     The series featured a team that pulled off a complex operation
each episode that featured disguises, split-second timing and usually
completed its task without anyone from the outside knowing what had
happened.
     The movie gives us a 'James Bond-Lite' lone agent (Tom Cruise) who
blows up a bunch of stuff.  The first few minutes lull the audience
into a false sense of a Mission: Impossible film with a group assigned
to catch the thief of a NOC list naming undercover agents.
Unfortunately for the team and the film, most of them shortly meet an
untimely demise including Emilio Estevez, easily the most interesting
Mission member.
     The only survivors are Cruise and Emmanuelle Beart ("Manon Of The
Spring"), an actress of skill but in a fairly worthless role here.  The
spy bosses have known for some time that there was a mole on the team
and since Cruise survived, decide that it is him.  Cruise and Beart
have to go after the bad guys while ducking the good guys. Any of this
sound familiar?
     The film is an action movie disguised as a mystery in the guise of
Mission: Impossible. And not a very good one of any of them.  The few
action scenes are physically impossible although well paced.  The
mystery is easily solved moments after it is posed.  The one remaining
M:I character, Jim Phelps (Jon Voight, originally Peter Graves) has
nothing in common with the original. Fans of the series will not
recognize much.
     Cruise's boyish appeal complete with trademarked grins doesn't
play very well. Bond he ain't. Besides the disappearing and uncredited
Estevez, there are only two actors with much charisma.  Veteran actress
Vanessa Redgrave shines in what is an unusual role in films:  an
extremely sexual older woman. Oddly cast, big tough-looking Ving Rhames
("Pulp Fiction") is fascinating as the kind-hearted but devious
computer hacker.
     Selling out even at mid-afternoon matinees, the movie has enough
explosions to rake in the big bucks for Paramount and make it  a summer
blockbuster. If you're looking for quality though, you might want to
save your money.

Title
Review for Green Fire (1999)
During the late December holiday time, when we aren't too emerged in the
pre-holiday panic, occasionally thoughts will turn to the original
meaning of the holy-days. You don't have to be a Christian to appreciate
the sentiments. Nearly all current and ancient religions celebrate the
re-emerging of the sun with birth festivals, from Mithra to Jesus.
It's a time of miracles and compassion for fellow beings. It's a time of
connecting with the supernatural. It's a time of reflection.
And it's the perfect time for director Frank Darabont to release "The
Green Mile". Jesus Christ has returned. He's a big black man and we're
going to kill him again -- this time in the electric chair.
In a 1935 Louisiana prison, the guards on death row are used to dealing
with a variety of prisoners. Repentant, insane, guilty, innocent; they
all meet their final fate at the end of the "green mile," so-named
because of the floor color where the condemned walk their final mile.
Then one day, John Coffey (Michael Clarke Duncan) arrives and changes
their lives forever. Coffey is a seven-foot tall giant of a man
convicted of cruelly murdering two young girls. He has to duck to walk
through doorways. The guards give him plenty of room.
The new inmate turns out to be something different that his appearance
would suggest. He's afraid of the dark, gentle as a lamb and quite
probably innocent. He's also a miracle worker capable of healing the
sick and raising the dead.
Head guard Paul Edgecomb (Tom Hanks) slowly discovers Coffey's true
nature and isn't quite sure what to do about it. He becomes a disciple
but is powerless to prevent the crucifixion...err, electrocution.
At over three hours, the film has time to explore the characterization
of the death row community. Edgecomb and his fellow guards Brutus (David
Morse), Dean (Barry Pepper) and Harry (Jeffrey DeMunn) treat the
prisoners with an aspect of respect. The new guard Percy (Doug
Hutchison) is a sadist, delighting in tormenting the condemned and only
has his job because of relatives in high places.
The two convicts awaiting execution before Coffey arrives are Arlen
(Graham Greene), a Native American sorry for his crimes and Del (Michael
Jeter), a Cajun with a gentle streak. Before Wild Bill (Sam Rockwell)
arrives, it looks as though Louisiana only condemned minorities to death.
There has rarely been a film that pulls at every emotional string as
effectively as does this one. An absolutely abominable electrocution has
the audience gripping their armrests in horror. Tears flow freely during
several scenes. Even the brief bits of humor are touching.
The acting is first-rate. Hanks turns in an admirable performance and
has top billing, but Duncan is the real star. He is astonishing in his
role and deserves a nod come Oscar time.
Darabont has a feel for his characters. His first film was the
highly-acclaimed "Shawshank Redemption". Now five years later, he takes
on another Steven King prison tale and gives us another unforgettable move.
Although the luxurious pacing gives him time to explore the people,
there are a few moments where the film drags. Surprisingly for a film of
this length, these times are scarce.
There are a few other minor problems. Most of the characters are
designed as extremes: you either love or hate them. Subtlety is not this
movie's strong point. It's no coincidence that John Coffey's initials
are what they are.
The one mystery is the inaction of the guards. They are about to execute
a supposedly-innocent man who can heal any illness. They know about this
for quite some time, but it is only shortly before his scheduled death
that Edgecomb agonizes over whether he should tell anyone?
None of these flaws are fatal. The story is honest and will crawl into
your heart. There's not a dry eye in the audience and in this case,
that's a good thing.
(Michael Redman has written this column for about 24 winters. He wishes
everyone a joyous season, whichever holiday they chose to observe. He
can be contacted at Redman@bluemarble.net if the gods of the internet
happen to be in a good mood.)
[This appeared in the 12/23/1999 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bluemarble.net.]
-- 
mailto:redman@bluemarble.net
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Soldier (1998)
Old soldiers never die, they just turn into cliches
The Warrior and the Lover are two personality aspects that find it difficult
to exist in the same body. Jungian archetypes, these two opposites need each
other to create a whole, but it's difficult to integrate both. 
Often we'll encounter Lovers who think everything is just wonderful and, with
the help of Jung's Magician, sit around imagining grand schemes. Without the
drive to manifest their plans, much less the wisdom to recognize the darkness,
all they have are dreams.
Warriors on the other hand, are ready to go to war at the drop of a hat, and
will do combat with every last bit of their energy.  They don't care enough
about anything to know what's worth fighting for: gladiators who live only for
the battle.
This dichotomy not only describes individuals that we all know, but can also
illustrate societies. America during the late sixties was a conflict between
old style Cold Warriors and the new hippie Lovers.
Todd 3465 (Kurt Russell) is a living, breathing archetype. Chosen from birth
as a soldier, he is raised by the government to be a killing machine. His
childhood is cruelty and competition. He is indoctrinated with the big rules.
Never question authority. Winning is everything. Strength beats knowledge.
A veteran of numerous intergalactic wars, Todd is 40 and he's obsolete. A new
generation of genetically engineered soldiers are faster and stronger. Left
for dead after a test battle with the best of the new killers, Caine 607
(Jason Scott Lee), he's unceremoniously dumped as trash on Arcadia 234, a
garbage world.
Obviously our hero is still alive. He finds a group of shipwrecked settlers
abandoned on the planet who nurse him back to health. When the peace-loving
colonists get a good look at who Todd is, they are afraid of him and he is
exiled to live by himself amid the junk on an environmentally hostile world.
They are the other good guys.
These Lovers find that they need a Warrior when the military coincidentally
chooses this world to conduct exercises for their improved human weapons. Todd
finds himself in the role of protector.
What could have been a fascinating look at the roles played in our culture and
the fears of an ultra-right wing future is ruined by turning the film into a
cartoon. The effects are mostly second-rate explosions or jerky slow motion.
The plot is old hat. We don't get even a glimpse at the society that created
the soldiers. Hardly anything makes sense.
The film's science fares badly. With all the remarkable advances we've made in
just 37 years (the film takes place in 2036), we're still stupid. After
conquering the stars, for some reason we use vast amounts of energy to load up
huge space ships with rubbish tote it to a landfill light years away. Even
stranger, the garbage barges appear to double as time machines. Virtually all
the trash is vintage 1960.
There is nothing in the story that is not predictable. The first thing that
Todd sees after coming back to life is Sandra (Connie Nielsen), the woman just
a little too beautiful to be living in such harsh conditions who is taking
care of him. It doesn't take a genius to foresee that her husband isn't going
to be around much longer. Is it a shock to find out that the film's climax is
an unarmed battle between Todd and Caine? Who would you guess wins?
Some of the scenes would work if this were a comedy. Todd's first awakening of
human emotion comes when he glimpses Connie's nipple poking through her thin
blouse. Later as he sits by his lonely campfire, a tear rolls down his
dramatically lighted cheek in slow motion. Supposedly this clich isn't meant
to be humorous. Dastardly Col. Mekum (Jason Isaacs) with a pencil-thin
mustache is as real as Snidley Whiplash.
Responsible for last year's quirky and visually enticing but problematic "The
Fifth Element", director Paul Anderson sees the film as "Shane" in outer
space. Maybe, if Shane were played by Sylvester Stallone in Rambo mode. The
movie doesn't even work as an action film. There is never a question as to the
outcome. Somehow the new superior soldiers don't prove much of a match for Todd.
The acting isn't anything to write home about. Nielsen almost comes across as
a real person but is soon relegated to a background victim. Russell is
buffed-up and does a credible job but it's not much of a challenge. Uttering
around 100 words during the film, mostly what Todd does is hit things and
stare grimly into space. Gary Busey as Todd's commanding officer is completely
wasted in his low-key role.
Everything blows up and occasionally it looks cool. Sometimes the sets are
impressive. Unfortunately "occasionally" and "sometimes" don't make a film.
Most disappointing is that the screenplay is by David Webb Peoples who wrote
"Blade Runner", possibly the best science fiction movie ever made. Sharp-eyed
viewers will notice a few obscure references to that film. Peoples says that
this is not a "Blade Runner" sequel, but a "sidequel" that takes place in the
same universe.
Although that may have been the intent in his original script, the result is
more like a bad television series that the "Blade Runner" replicants watch to
pass time. Perhaps those artificial humans would find this entertaining.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and wants to wish
everyone an appropriate Halloween...whatever you'd like it to be.)
[This appeared in the 10/29/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Fifth Element, The (1997)
Climb into the back seat and get ready as Bruce Willis takes us on one
hell of a cab ride. The first of the major science fiction films of the
summer hardly gives you a chance to breathe as the action keeps on
a-comin'.
In 1914 Egypt, archeologists are investigating a __major__ find when the
mother of all space ships pulls up outside the temple. Out of the
floating megalith waddle insectoid aliens in copper battlesuits. They've
come to retrieve the supreme weapon stored on Earth for 5,000 years in
the care of generations of priests. With the upcoming war, this planet
is no longer a safe haven for its own protector.
Three hundred years later, the ultimate evil in the guise of a flaming
planet is streaking its way towards its goal: destruction of just about
everything in the universe. Sensing that this may not be in the best
interest of said universe, our friendly aliens are returning the weapon
when they are ambushed by the not-so friendly droopy-eared dog soldier
aliens. When their ship crashes into the moon, there is only one
"survivor" on hand.
Through a high-tech cloning technique, the hand is reconstructed as the
consummate weapon which turns to be babe deluxe Milla Jovovich. A couple
of minutes later she takes a dive off a several hundred story NYC
building busting through the roof of Willis' floating taxi.
Willis, ever the die-hard, takes on the mission and goes up against
fascist industrialist Gary Oldman as well as the bizarros from outer
space and a huge fiery catastrophe. There's not a second to lose: the
end of the world is in a matter of hours and his driver's license has
been revoked.
The film is so dense with things to look at that you'll never catch them
all. The run-down city of the future owes much of its look to
"Bladerunner", from the vertigo-inspiring view down through the multiple
levels of air traffic to even a friendly Asian food vendor. There are a
million things going on in every scene and the effects are top rate.
Much of the design is by French illustrators Jean "Moebius" Giraud and
Jean-Claude Mezieres. Responsible for some of the most innovative early
"Heavy Metal" stories, Moebius' influence is apparent in some of the
more fantastic elements. The alien battlesuits are dazzling and the
blue-skinned alien diva is magnificent. Even the priest's goofy hats are
straight out of his graphic novels.
Willis is his usual hard-nosed rough and tumble kind of guy. When he
gets to Fhloston Paradise, a floating resort, you know to expect a big
shoot-out. The film doesn't disappoint. The lobby of the hotel turns
into one of the most explosive huge gun battles you've seen. Through all
the destruction, falls and bruises; the taxi driver maintains his sense
of humor, firing out wisecracks as often as bullets.
Jovovich is indeed the ultimate fantasy. A flaming red-head who moves
like a cat and fights like Bruce Lee, she speaks an unworldly language,
is powerful and independent yet vulnerable. Dressed in revealing thin
spandex bandages, the dazzling beauty is prone to dropping her clothes
at any given time. The archetypal male dream.
Oldman struts his stuff with a pronounced limp and his half-shaved head
covered in a plastic dome while holding court in a depraved southern
accent.
Possibly the most bizzare character in the film is Chris Tucker as radio
personality Ruby Rhod. A combination of Dennis Rodman and Little
Richard, Rhod's mouth runs a mile a minute. When he first enters the
movie, it's an unwelcome intrusion of camp, but as time goes on the DJ
develops into the perfect foil for Willis.
Like many recent filmmakers, Director Luc Besson ("La Femme Nikita") has
appropriated bits and pieces from other films. You'll see "Star Wars",
"Star Gate" and half a dozen other "Star" films as well as the obvious
"Die Hard" and "Bladerunner".
Although I'd have preferred a more original plot, this is the first film
in years that I wanted to see again just a few days later. It's
difficult to recommend an effects film much higher.
[This appeared in the 5/22/97 issue of the "Bloomington Voice",
Bloomington, Indiana. Michael Redman can be reached at
mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Phenomenon (1996)
In this unlikely combination of "It's A Wonderful Life" and "The 
Twilight Zone", John Travolta is Gomer Pyle turned super smart.
George Malley (Travolta) is celebrating his 37th birthday in a quiet 
little backwater in northern California by getting wasted with his 
buddies in the local bar. Wandering outside and looking up into the 
heavens, he is blasted with a white light from the sky (Shazam!) that 
knocks him off his feet and leaves him unconscious in the middle of the 
highway.
When he comes to and makes his way back inside the tavern, of course no 
one believes him. They catch on that something is different during the 
next few days as good ole boy George becomes a chess wiz, learns 
Portuguese in 20 minutes, invents a super-grow fertilizer, sets out to 
read virtually every book in the library and moves objects with his 
mind.
The townsfolk begin to fear the changed auto mechanic and he is shunned 
by everyone except his closest friends the town doctor (Robert Duvall) 
and Nate (an extremely likable Forest Whitaker). George's only bright 
spot in his social life is that his secret love, divorcee Lace (Kyra 
Sedgwick) is becoming more interested albeit still reluctant to jump 
back into the pond.
The first half of the film is enticing although remarkably laid-back 
(read "slow"), but then it drifts off into a dozen different directions 
-- none of which are very interesting or well explored. The military are 
after George because he has broken a secret code. George wants to help 
mankind with his new knowledge, but the scientists at the university 
ignore him. Doc is concerned about George's health. Lace may or may not 
want to become involved. There are a number of philosophical questions 
about knowledge. What's the meaning of the good life? 
When the reason for George's sudden increase in intelligence is 
revealed, I felt cheated. Although it was unclear what, up until that 
point, the movie had hints of talking about something greater than man. 
Then it becomes mundane and maudlin. Heading towards the end, the film 
begins to feel like a cheap tear-jerker with beautiful scenery.
First rate acting from the principals, but something feels strange about 
each of them. We are so used to Hollywood mega-productions that when 
something like this comes around, it's difficult to tell if the people 
seem weird because they're realistic or because they _are_ weird.
[This originally appeared in "The Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, 
Indiana, 7/18/96. Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Alien: Resurrection (1997)
"You're not Ellen Ripley. She died 200 years ago" accuses space pirate Call to
the newly cloned Ripley-8 in the fourth film of the Alien trilogy.
That's the primary defect with this movie: she's not the heroine of the first
films, but..."something else".
        A couple of centuries after the alien-fighter made her long beautiful dive
into molten metal to rid the universe of the dripping slimy killing machines,
scientists for a top secret military operation have succeeded in recreating
her from a blood sample found on the prison planet in "Aliens 3". Not only
that, but they've extracted the queen from her chest.
Working, as always, for the good of mankind, they allow the queen to hatch 12
new beasts. It's not ruining anything to reveal that the aliens escape their
prisons and destroy almost the entire crew: that's a given in any Alien movie.
The "heroes" this time around are a rag-tag group of rough space pirates who
deliver humans to the science ship to serve as hosts for the infant
monstrosities. The space-age highwaymen are a likable bunch for folks who sell
living people to be used as incubators. We grow to like them before most get snuffed.
Especially appealing in a humorously Rambo way is Johner (Ron Perlman). The
hyper-tough guy and Weaver bounce off each other admirably: "So. I hear you,
like, ran into these things before. "Yeah." "What did you do?" "I died."
Crippled Vriess (Dominique Pinon) is the realest member of the cast.
"Little girl playing pirate" Annalee Call (Winona Ryder) seems a bit too nice
to be mixed up with the rest. She and Ripley form a relationship reminiscent
of her  attachment to the little girl in "Aliens". One touch of love in an
otherwise detached film.
Due to the cloning process, Ripley (Sigourney Weaver) has a mix of Alien DNA
which gives her superhuman strength, acidic blood and a telepathic sense. She
has become something more - or less - than human. The queen mother has picked
up some Homo Sapiens DNA in the process and the creatures have become more man-like.
Easily the best scene in the film is when Ripley discovers the flawed previous
seven clones. Touching and grotesque at the same time, the moment allows her
to briefly touch her humanity and help her sisters in the only way that she can.
What constitutes humanity is a theme of the film. Our heroine is part alien.
One of the characters is unveiled as an android. Vriess is something of a
cyborg, attached to a high-tech wheelchair. The aliens have feelings. The
scientists are monsters.
There is a particularly interesting scene where the alienated Ripley is
talking to a very humanized android in the ship's chapel. The clone is aloof
and emotionless throughout almost the entire film. The android is sobbing
because it is only a machine. Which one has a soul?
The creatures are great for the most part. They have always been one of the
best-designed visuals in any film. Now that computer technology has advanced
further, they look even better, but it is disturbing that they sound and move
exactly like the raptors in "Jurassic Park". 
The new type of alien near the end of the film is disappointing and could have
been lifted out of "Seven Voyages Of Sinbad". H. R. Giger, designer of the
original film, should have been brought back for this rather than using a
rubber suit found in cinematic storage.
The transformation of Ripley ruins one of the most appealing aspects of the
previous films. As she is sniffing around for aliens (and everything seems to
be smelling everything else in the film -- there's even a breathalyzer as a
door lock) and ripping metal off the walls, she seems almost invulnerable. The
old Ripley was constantly in danger: one person against an unstoppable force.
This one is above that. There's no audience investment in her safety.
There are some intriguing aspects of director Jean-Pierre Jeunet's ("City Of
Lost Children") film. Ripley, reborn after dying for mankind's sins, relearns
of even more sacrifice. Witnessing unselfish actions by others, and although
she unplugs the high-tech Bible from the computer, the final scene is straight
from that book.
As the baby boomers age, older actresses have had the opportunity to be
leading women and with good reason.  At two years shy of 50, Weaver is an
accomplished performer and easily as sexy as anyone on "Bay Watch". Her
performance clearly overshadows the youthful Ryder's. She plays exactly who
she is supposed to be. It's just disappointing who that person is.
This is a difficult one to write. "Alien: Resurrection" was my most
anticipated film of the year and coming out of it, I was filled with very
mixed emotions. It's fun but not nearly as much as it should be. Weaver is
great in her role, but that role is disappointing. Asked numerous times, I've
responded with my three-word review: "good, not great".
Oh well. There's always the next one and trust me, there will be an "Alien 5".
Count on it.
(Michael Redman has written this column so long that this is his fourth
"Alien" review. He's overjoyed to announce that he is again one with the
electrons at redman@bvoice.com. Now if he'd only get something there.)
[This appeared in the 12/4/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com ]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Tin Cup (1996)
Kevin Costner and director Ron Shelton have achieved the impossible.
Although I have put in a bit of time chasing and losing the little white
ball, neither I nor any other inhabitant of this planet have ever
suggested that _observing_ golf is the slightest bit interesting.
Costner and Shelton have made the game of golf watchable...well, at
least one hole is.
Roy McAvoy (Costner) operates a run-down driving range in Salome, Texas
while dodging bill collectors. He spends his days drinking and hanging
out with his cronies as he shares a trashed-out Winnebago-turned-home
with buddy Romeo (Cheech Marin). Everything fell apart for McAvoy a few
years back when he went for the spectacular shot rather than the safe
win and lost the opportunity to become a big time golf pro. Nowadays
he's the Zen golf poet in the dusty backwaters of what might have been.
It's all comfortably downhill for the aging McAvoy.  Until, that is, the
new lady psychologist Molly Griswold (Rene Russo) drops by the range for
golf lessons. Our resident swing master falls for her, vowing to give up
strippers and biker chicks. She's not interested because she has a
boyfriend. Said boyfriend turns out to be McAvoy's lifetime golf rival
Dave Simms (Don Johnson).
In order to impress the new babe in town and love of his life, McAvoy
decides to qualify for and win the US Open. From then on, it's a race
between him and Simms for the golf championship and the heart of the
beautiful doctor.
Most of the film is predictable. You know who Griswold is going to end
up with. You know who is the better golfer. You know just about
everything that is going to happen. The ending is somewhat of surprise,
but nothing totally unexpected.
The scenes with Costner and Russo don't ring true. He does his best down
and out sports figure with a heart. She comes across as a ditzy Diane
Keaton, but not as charming. Their chemistry needs a catalyst that never
appears.
On the other hand, the Costner and Marin relationship is the best thing
in the film. Marin's Romeo is thankfully severely underplayed from what
you might expect from a survivor of Cheech & Chong craziness. The two
pals yell and scream at each other, but always return to their
friendship. Romeo might have been a little off target when he gets
McAvoy drunk the night before an important golf meet as a part of his
training, but he makes up for it later.
Like the best sports films, this is not about golf, but about the people
that surround the game. Very little in the plot department, although the
characters and their banter make it adequately entertaining.
[This review appeared in "The Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana,
9/3/96. Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Practical Magic (1998)
Witchy women have their enchanting charms
Witches? For many people, this word still conjures up images of either weird
hats and ugly, warted, old-woman masks for Halloween or devil-worshipers
sacrificing babies. I'm here to tell you that it ain't true.
How many Wiccans (modern witchcraft) or other practitioners of magick do you
think live within 10 miles of your house? Probably you've estimated in the
single digits; likely close to zero. Take your number and double it or
quadruple it or increase it tenfold. You're possibly still low. In a city like
Bloomington, multiplying your guess by 100 is more accurate.
Wicca is estimated by some to be the fastest growing religion in the country.
Although witches are slowly coming out of the broom closet, no one really
knows how many there are. According to the "Utne Reader", there may be as many
as 400,000 adherents in the United States alone and the practice is poised to
enter the mainstream. Witches are your doctors, nurses, bakers, bartenders,
business people, musicians and just about anyone else you could think of.
None are devil-worshippers: Wiccans don't believe in Satan. Although there are
dozens of denominations, mostly they honor in the sanctity and power of
nature. They're not out there summoning demons, but they are casting spells
and performing rituals. The tradition dates back at least to the occult
revival early in this century and some claim a lineage from the pre-patriarchy
Goddess religions.
Sisters Sally (Sandra Bullock) and Gillian (Nicole Kidman) Owens can date
their charming heritage back at least 200 years. Since the 1700s the family
women have all been witches. They've also all suffered the same curse: any man
who gets involved with an Owens woman is doomed to an early death.
When the orphaned young girls come to live with their maiden aunts Jet (Dianne
Wiest) and Frances (Stockard Channing), they are informed of their birthright
and schooled in the craft. Sally vows never to fall in love unless she meets
the impossible man of her spell. He must have one blue eye, one green eye,
ride a pony backwards and other odd attributes so designed that he will never
exist. Gillian on the other hand "can't wait to fall in love."
The girls grow in opposite directions. Although she is the more powerful,
brunette Sally isn't much interested in sorcery. Red-headed Gillian embraces
her skills and quickly leaves the Owens-hating small New England town to
discover the world.
Sally eventually mysteriously falls in love and settles into the quiet life of
wife and mother. Gillian dances poolside with a bottle in one hand, a vial of
belladonna in the other and following in love -- often and enthusiastically.
The death of Sally's husband and the cruelty of Gillian's current lover bring
the witchy siblings back together. After tearfully pledging their undying
fealty to each other, they must deal with Jimmy (Goran Visnjic), Gillian's
abusive "Dracula-cowboy" boyfriend, when he shows up on their doorstep.
Arizona policeman Gary Hallet (Aidan Quinn) also appears, investigating Jimmy.
It doesn't take a magic moment looking in his eyes to know that they don't match.
The film has several delightful scenes. When the sisters and aunts dance
around the kitchen table after doing tequila shots singing "You put the lime
in the coconut", it's a joy. They actually look like they're having a good
time and it translates to the audience.
The story is fairly successful in combining the esoteric life of witches and
the everyday. Like any mother warning her older relatives not to be too
permissive with her kids, Sally tells Jet and Frances not to let her daughters
dance naked at a Solstice celebration. When the little girls come back
exclaiming "Mommy, Mommy, we danced naked!" she cringes. Some of the
Hollywoodish effects are goofy though. Sally's coffee stirs itself though and
it's silly.
The comedic touches are hilarious at times. Looking for something white to
draw a pentagram, the witches reach for a can of whipped cream. As Gillian
brings her former lover back to life, she explains "but after this we're
breaking up."
There are several other notable aspects -- the set design is fascinating with
cryptic objects barely glimpsed -- but the film has a few problems. Director
Griffin Dunne ("Addicted To Love") gets off to a very slow start, includes too
many VH-1 moments and, worst of all, tries to be everything to all people. The
film shifts gears from romance novel to offbeat comedy to supernatural
thriller to family drama to horror faster than the viewer can keep up.
The "sisterhood is powerful" ending is touching and feel-good but comes out of
left field and doesn't make sense considering previous events. You'll somehow
feel energized and incredulous at the same time.
The strength of the movie lies in its casting. Bullock has never previously
impressed me with her acting talents, but she fills this role perfectly. 
Kidman's Gillian jumps off the screen and, if I can slip into the "Yeah, I'm a
guy and that's the way it is" mode, she's an absolute pleasure to watch as she
dances, prances and struts her wild woman stuff. Despite the vast differences
between the two, their chemistry makes it easy to believe their relationship.
Wiest and Channing are also looking good. The eccentric aunts feeding kids
chocolate cake for breakfast radiate power. Unfortunately they disappear for
half the film just when we want more.
The men don't fare so well. Quinn and Visnjic both are saddled with
one-dimensional characters and don't put much into their performances.
Although pivotal to the plot, they get in the way of the better stuff.
There's currently a media fascination with witches. "Sabrina" (from Archie
Comics of all places) and Charmed are both weekly television series.
1996's "The Craft" was a ground-breaker in presenting witches as everyday
people. "Practical Magic" for all its faults is entertaining in a lightweight
manner. I'm curious to see if we ever get a realistic look at Wicca on the screen.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 299 lunar cycles and has
never met a witch who could raise the dead or create explosions, but does know
a few just as bewitching as Sally and Gillian. Email your magickal tales to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 10/22/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for White Squall (1996)
Jeff Bridges commands a sailing ship as a school for troublesome teenage boys.
Using `tough love', Bridges molds the kids into a tight crew. Based on a true
story, there is enough high drama here that the film doesn't need to become
the mish-mash that it is.
The boys are sent (or sentenced) to the ship to build character and
self-discipline. As with all movies of this genre, they do change, if for no
other reason than self preservation. Without giving too much away, there is a
major disaster at sea which pulls them together even more.
Big adventure, but there are problems. There is a large cast of boys who
mostly look alike and act alike. It's not until late in the film that you can
even tell them apart. By that time, it's impossible to remember who did what
and which motivations belong to which person, except for just a few characters.
The film doesn't flow. There are a number of good, some even great, scenes,
but they jump from one to another without much connection. A few moments are
remarkably intense, but others are severely underplayed. A tropical island is
the scene of the crossing the equator rite of passage when the boys
demonstrate a new comprehension and a tribal identity. This should have marked
a turning point for the group. Instead it has all the emotion of a romp
through the meadow.
There are some nice bits, but in this case the whole is not greater than the
sum of the parts. The film, in the words of the bard, falls apart, the center
does not hold. Unfortunate.
[This appeared in the 2/8/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Empire Strikes Back, The (1980)
Oddly enough, I had forgotten much about this middle film of the Star
Wars trilogy so seeing it on the big screen again was an unexpected
treat. The darkest and arguably the best of the films suffered from the
second-act syndrome when you had to wait three years for the next movie.
It works much better as a part of the whole.
Everything goes wrong in this one. The rebels are on the run. Han Solo
is captured by the bad guys. Luke fails to complete his Jedi training,
loses a hand and gains a father (You already knew that, right? I'm not
ruining anything for you, right?) =97 none of which are good things. The
ending is just the opposite of the triumph of "Star Wars". The Dark Side
may just come out on top.
There aren't as many changes from the original as the Special Edition of
the first film featured. A few fixes here and there, short new scenes
and a punched-up soundtrack are fairly unobtrusive and make it easier to
watch the film rather than be pulled into the "What's New" game.
Now I'm looking forward to "Return Of The Jedi" even with those
terminally cute fuzzy things.
[This appeared in the 2/27/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Fierce Creatures (1997)
The characters from "A Fish Called Wanda" are back for another go at it.
They've changed their names and jobs, but with John Cleese, Kevin Kline,
Jamie Lee Curtis and Michael Palin returning, the comparison is
inevitable, although it is not actually a sequel.
Rupert Murdock clone Rod McCain (Kline) adds a British Zoo to his empire
and sets about turning it into a money-maker by requiring that it only
feature dangerous animals. With the Rambo mode in mind, he decides that
the public is in love with violence and orders the zoo to do away with
the cuter furry guys.
Rollo Lee (Cleese) is the zookeeper in charge of carrying out the orders
which result in an execution order for the less desirable critters. This
brings about the film's most humorous scenes as the animal handlers try
to convince him that their charges are indeed man-killers. With fake
blood and scrapes, they capture an escaped deadly anteater, "Watch out
for his tongue!"  The harmless mammals are disguised as bloodthirsty:
the cuddly meercat is portrayed as the piranha of the desert that can
strip a corpse in three minutes.
McCain sends his son Vince (Kline again) and newly hired Willa Weston
(Curtis) to England to make sure that his orders are carried out and the
operation shows a 20% profit. Weston is on the high speed career track
and wants to impress her new boss until she is charmed by the furry
ones. Vince is only interested in getting Weston and her well-displayed
ample cleavage into the sack.
Once there, McCain The Younger sets about turning the zoo into marketing
hell. Commercial sponsor banners are everywhere and the tortoise
compound becomes "Bruce Springstein Presents" The keepers' uniforms are
plastered with corporate patches like those of stock car drivers.
Like "Wanda", part of the success of this movie depends on juxtaposing
British and American sensibilities. And like its predecessor, there are
some hilarious scenes. The difference between the two films is that this
one doesn't work quite so well. The slapstick is occasionally clumsy and
mis-timed. There is little that goes over the top.
British humor sensibilities are different than what the people on this
continent are used to. Some of it is so dry that we might miss it unless
paying close attention. Other aspects are so goofy that they have to be
top notch in order not to just look moronic.
When the film was originally shown to test audiences last year, the
viewers hated the ending so much that a new director was called in to a
re-shoot.
The film does do well with a number of scenes. The sex farces (Cleese is
often mistaken as a sexual acrobat as he talks to animals in his bedroom
and is thought to be orgying with hot babes and is discovered innocently
half-dressed in a hotel room with two women) are comical, although they
could have been more outrageous. The vision of the keepers dressed in
outrageous animal costumes running around like chickens with their heads
off is hilarious.
The movie is entertaining, but it misses a bit too often. Gentlemen I
knew "A Fish Called Wanda", and this, sirs, is no "Wanda".
[This appeared in The "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana,
2/13/97. Michael Redman can be contacted at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Air Force One (1997)
America has finally gotten what it's needed for years: a compassionate sincere
President with impressive ethics and charisma. Regretfully it's only a movie.
President James Marshall (Harrison Ford) is fed up with terrorist activities.
Teaming up with the Russian government, he orders a strike force capture of
Alexander Radek, a reactionary general ready to re-unite the Soviet Union
under his fascist reign. During a celebration dinner, Marshall announces to
the world that he will send troops to fight oppression wherever it exists.
"It's your turn to be afraid," he declares.
Returning home on Air Force One, he gets the chance to demonstrate his words
personally. Ultra-nationalist militants loyal to Radek and lead by Ivan
Korshunov (Gary Oldman) hijack the plane threatening to kill a hostage every
half hour until the general is released. Marshall has a chance to escape in a
jettisoned capsule (which Clinton says doesn't exist in real life) but
refuses, preferring to stay and fight.
Director Wolfgang Peterson ("Das Boot", "In The Line Of Fire", "Outbreak"
takes the over-used "Die Hard" theme and gives us something new in a film that
combines brilliant acting with hold-your-breath intensity. If you can take
your eyes off the screen, steal a look at the audience. Everyone is totally engrossed.
The two actors do what they do best and they are probably the best there are
at it.
Oldman has become typecast as a psychotic sadist and no wonder -- he does it
so well. When he engages the teenage first daughter in sensitive conversation
about his family and the next minute threatens to blow a hole in her forehead,
you know that he's over the edge in the manner that people with A Cause can
become. You are convinced that young Alice could end up terminated at any
time. When Korshonov executes passengers, there is a frightening reality to
it. The guns in this film are deadly weapons, not cartoons.
Harrison Ford has done one role for several years. His mastery of the man in
the suit propelled into desperate action is in top form here. Marshall is a
Medal Of Honor recipient who now has a desk job. Realistically, he's a man
afraid, but not afraid to act. Ford is one of the few actors that could make
us believe that the President of the United States could be an action hero.
Indiana Jones in the Oval Office. He and Oldman's archetypes match up perfectly.
The other roles also go to accomplished actors. Glenn Close as the determined
but unsure Vice-President is the picture of an executive forced into a
position that she's not quite ready for. Dean Stockwell as Defense Secretary
eager for the authority ("I'm in charge here!") is her political nemesis and
turns in a good Alexander Haig performance.
Of course the politics are all wrong.  A cowboy President (even down to his
name) with big guns shoots his way through problems. Much like the American
collective memory of JFK's Camelot, the image is wondrous if you don't look
too deep. The pulls on the patriotic heartstrings would be too much in any
other film, but they work here. No matter what political spin you put on the
story, the movie is an outstanding one. 
        I left the theater feeling that there is hope for the country's future: not a
common belief nowadays. Now if we only can get Ford to run for President. Just
because one actor didn't work out as Chief Executive doesn't mean that a
different one couldn't.
(Michael Redman has lost count of how many years he's been writing this column
-- 21 years...22 years -- while watching the sunflowers outside his window
swaying in the cool breezes.)
[This appeared in the 7/31/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Lone Star (1996)
John Sayles' films remind me of real life: often it's slow, sometimes
the important events don't seem dramatic and there are far too many
subplots to keep under control. These are, of course, his strengths and
also his weaknesses.
In "Lone Star", Sheriff Sam Deeds (Chris Cooper) is investigating the
recently uncovered body of long-dead former Sheriff Charlie Wade (Kris
Kristofferson) who may have been murdered by his successor, Sam's
father, Sheriff Buddy Deeds (Matthew McConaughey). For most films, this
story would be not only center stage, but would also exclude almost
everything else.
But that=92s not enough for Sayles. Not one to let advancing the plot get=
in the way of the characters and their interactions, the director gives
us the history of over a dozen people  in the racially mixed Texas town.
We find  out that Wade ran the town with an iron hand and was hated by
almost everyone especially Buddy and Big Otis...who runs the
mostly-black bar in town and who left his family years ago including his
young son...who now returns to town as the head of the nearby army base
and is having trouble with his own son...who sneaks over to see Big Otis
secretly.
And Sam helps out a young boy innocently jailed...whose mother is Sam's
high-school sweetheart but was forced not to see him again by her
mother...who came into the country as an illegal Mexican immigrant
decades ago but now runs a successful restaurant where one of her
employees is a boy....who is helping smuggle illegals over the border
and=85
Whew! It goes on and on. Everyone has a tale and in the two-and-a-half
hour film, we see many of them. Somewhere in between all of this, the
main plot of the murder (remember that?) is working towards being
resolved.
There are possibly too many things going on even for a movie of this
length. The film is a lot of work for the audience. Keeping track of
this many people and all of their history is difficult with friends
you=92ve known for years, much less with characters you were just
introduced to two hours before. =
By the time the movie is over, there=92s a certain amount of confusion
about some people and events. Hours or days later, after your mind has
had a chance to sort some of these things out, you=92ll have revelations.=
 =
The main themes are how history affects the living and the relationship
between parents and children. The issues are complex and very little is
tied up with a nice neat bow by the film's end. I would have been
disappointed otherwise.
[This review appeared in the 11/21/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Simon Birch (1998)
Faith is a wondrous state of being. Sure knowledge without the benefit of
facts runs the risk of being misplaced but it is a remarkable comfort.
Oddly enough, even in these cynical times, we are a nation of believers.
Everything's going to get better. A better life is just around the corner.
Although the programmers working on it say that it's impossible, we believe
that the Y2K bug will be fixed in time. Despite the evidence of history and
Henry Kissinger's observation about power being the ultimate aphrodisiac, we
are shocked to find that the President has human foibles.
Religious faith in our individual destiny is a different matter. Confidence
that there is a design for our life is a rarity. Simon Birch (Ian Michael
Smith) is convinced that God made him the way that he is in preparation for
his ultimate fate, "I don't need proof. I have faith."
As a twelve-year-old boy just over three feet tall, Simon's faith in his
predestination is either his way of dealing or precognition. Something of an
outcast in 1964 Gravestown, Maine and parented by two people who ignore him,
he sticks to his conviction. God has a plan for him: he's going to be a hero.
Simon's best friend Joe (Joseph Mazzello) also doesn't fit the New England
small town mode. The illegitimate son of Rebecca Wentworth (Ashley Judd) who
refuses to reveal his father's identity, Joe is Simon's confidante and the two
are inseparable. When Rebecca virtually adopts Simon, the boys are like brothers.
Most of the story revolves around their church. Simon gets in trouble for
arrogantly challenging the minister in matters of doctrine, not co-operating
with his nervous uptight Sunday school teacher and copping a feel from the
Virgin Mary as he lies in a manger during the Christmas pageant.
When he does get his chance to shine, tragedy occurs. Because his strike zone
is minuscule, Simon's baseball coach has never allowed him to swing and he is
always walked to first. When the coach wants to go home early, he tells him to
try for a hit, hoping for an easy out. Simon connects with the ball but with
disastrous results.
Midway through the film, Rebecca is no longer available to the boys and they
turn to her suitor Ben Goodrich (Oliver Platt) for guidance in their searches
for Simon's destiny and Joe's father. Ben has worked his way into the boys'
hearts while trying to win that of Joe's mom.
The movie almost works. Like personal favorite "Stand By Me", the tale of
buddies growing up in a small town features kids with winning personalities.
Unfortunately, like "Stand By Me", it's a lot like "Stand By Me". There's even
a fat kid vomiting at a public event.
There are a few strong moments here. Joe's understanding of how a dead
person's existence disappears in bits and pieces from the still-living is
touching. Simon's faith is inspiring. Their friendship is poignant.
The biggest flaw is that everything is proclaimed in advance. There's no
foreshadowing here, it's foreannouncing. The film is framed as a flashback by
bookends featuring Jim Carrey in a small part as the adult Joe. His first
appearance reveals two important plot developments that come later. His
voice-over throughout the movie constantly tells us what is about to happen.
It's all so obvious that a woman in the row behind me was "Oh no"-ing for a
full minute before the climax of a key scene.
Judd (sibling and daughter of the country singers) and Platt are the
liveliest people in the film. She is vivacious, has a likable way and is
pleasant to watch. Platt is one of those actors you've seen in minor roles in
dozens of movies and is easy to warm up to. Unfortunately Rebecca disappears
halfway through and the movie is poorer for it.
Although it's obvious that this is Smith's first role, he and Mazzello are
excellent as the two friends. Their amiable friendship makes it even more
grievous that the film is flawed. Director Mark Steven Johnson isn't willing
to let them win us over, he has to be manipulative about it.
The film is loosely based on John Irving's "A Prayer For Owen Meany". It's so
loose that not only is the title character's name changed, but the credits
read "suggested by" the novel.
It's a bit confusing as to whether this is a story about two friends, one of
whom just happens to be a dwarf or if it's about someone who is "differently
abled" who happens to have a good pal. Just when I was admiring the story for
treating Simon as a regular human being, a scene would pop up where the
audience's heartstrings were tugged at based primarily on his size and awkward
movements. This is a fine line and to give Johnson credit, he mostly succeeds
at getting us to accept Simon as a boy rather than a freak.
Childhood is amazing. Films like this could allow us to revisit those times
we've left behind. Growing up is so full of awe and limitless possibilities
that it doesn't need a heavy-handed director to make us to appreciate it.
(Michael Redman as written this very column for over 23 years and sometimes
feels like his inner child is taking over. So there. Email your boy- and
girlhood misadventures to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 9/10/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
Ever-expanding civilizations run into a problem eventually. The Roman Empire
had its external enemies, but internal problems are what finally defeated the
massive state. The government had fallen into a state of disrepair, the
infrastructure couldn't stand the weight and it all collapsed into itself. The
"barbarians" at the gate were merely finishing off what had already been accomplished.
Some critics of modern western civilization compare it to Rome just before its
downfall. They say that it's too complex and the center cannot hold. We'll see.
In the far-flung future of "Star Trek", the United Federation Of Planets,
spanning hundreds of planets, could be slowly falling apart. The Borg and
Dominion are pressuring it from without. More importantly, the Federation High
Council seems willing to abandon its most sacred rule for a shot of rejuvenation.
As the third Next Generation "Star Trek" film opens, an investigatory team of
Federation and their new allies the Son'a are spying on a peaceful Ba'ku
village. Android Data (Brent Spiner), on loan from the Enterprise, goes
berserk for some reason, attacking his teammates and exposing them to the Ba'ku.
Admiral Dougherty (Anthony Zerbe) is determined to destroy Data, but Captain
Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick Stewart) demands a few hours to rectify the
situation. When he arrives at the planet, he discovers that the android is the
least of the problem. In apparent violation of the Prime Directive, the
Federation is attempting to secretly re-locate the Ba'ku because their world
is the fountain of youth.
As anyone with any Trek knowledge would know, Picard decides that the civilian
population is being wronged. Casting aside direct orders from a superior
officer, he and the rest of the Enterprise officers beam down to save the innocents.
"Star Trek" has a remarkably long history in terms of popular culture. The
television program debuted 32 years ago and has spawned several sequel series
and nine films as well as nurturing a substantial subculture of Trekkies and
Trekkers. This movie, as well as previous ones, is for them and they'll love it.
The "Next Generation" series has been off the air for a while and the films
are the only opportunity to watch new adventures of Picard, Data, William
Riker (Jonathan Frakes who also directs), Geordi La Forge (LeVar Burton), Worf
(Michael Dorn), Deanna Troi (Marina Sirtis) and Dr. Beverly Crusher (Gates McFadden).
For the rest of the audience, the film is a mixed experience. It is a
well-done new episode in the future history of the Enterprise crew, but it
isn't anything spectacular. 
Showing the new "Star Wars" preview before the film might be a mistake. After
the breathtaking scenes from what will surely be next year's blockbuster,
"Insurrection" pales by comparison. Trek has a history of an odd style of
storytelling. There are very few moments of high drama. Most of the scenes
take place in small rooms. There's a whole lot of talking and rarely a sense
of danger.
The big battle on the planet's surface involves the Federation and Son'a
tracking down the fleeing Ba'ku and shooting them -- with little darts. When
they are hit, they are teleported up to the orbiting ship. It doesn't come
across as real combat, but more like a futuristic game of paintball. Get shot
and you're out of the game.
The space battles aren't much better. Most of the action is offscreen. Word
has it that some of the effects didn't work and scenes were cut. When Riker
uses a video game joystick to steer the ship, it laughable not exciting.
Even the sinister Ru'afo (F. Murray Abraham), leader of the Son'a, is
underdone. Abraham is capable of a fine performance, but we don't get much
here. Ru'afo will not rank in the list of great "Star Trek" villains.
"Star Trek" also has a long-standing tradition of recycling old stories and
ideas. It's obvious when the camera pans over the Ba'ku village and shows 
them to be beautiful people living in harmony with their environment, that
they're soon to be in big trouble. The Son'a are hideous, confirming the
problems with too many facelifts. Guess who are the aggressors.
Disobeying the Federation to do the right thing is so common that we don't
even see Picard agonizing over his decision. I kept awaiting the
"insurrection" in the title but it's nothing that we haven't seen before.
Heavy handed allegories are also a Trek convention. The Ba'ku being relocated
for their natural resources is a reference to any number of historical events
especially the plight of Native Americans.
Picard's romance with the Ba'ku Anji (Donna Murphy) follows his trend of
falling for strong women but never following up. Murphy is a nice touch in
that she's a sensual intelligent woman who's not a Hollywood 19-year old
drop-dead beauty. Riker and Troi renew their romance and end up in a bubble
bath drinking champagne although in the chaste world of "Star Trek", you
suspect that they're wearing swim suits under the suds.
Some of the humor works. Commenting on their rejuvenation, Troi asks Dr.
Crusher "Do you feel your boobs starting to firm up?" Data's follow-up is
hilarious. And some of it doesn't work. Data singing a tune from "H.M.S.
Pinafore" is just goofy.
Although the theme of the Federation's aging is never explored, it does leave
possibilities for future films that go a bit deeper. "Insurrection" is
enjoyable for the Trek fan and not too bad for the general audience. Maybe one
day we'll see that marvelous "Star Trek" film we've been waiting for.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and has been a Trek
fan for even longer -- although he's discovered that "Babylon 5" leaves it in
the dust. Trekkies can send hate mail to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 12/17/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Castle, The (1997/I)
There's a new age saying I have a few problems with. "There's nothing outside
yourself", meaning that everything is within the individual, is a mantra to
some. While I can accept that most things are colored by a personal world
view, even the Dalai Lama recently reminded us that you can have all the
compassion possible, but if bullets come, you should get out of the way.
The aspects of life that are undeniably from within are emotions. Happiness,
sadness, satisfaction: these are all created by the person not the outer
world. One individual can be overjoyed surrounded by poverty; another, in
despair living in a mansion. (I am willing to admit that it might be a tad
easier in the mansion.)
Tow-truck driver Darryl Kerrigan (Michael Caton) is living the good life.
Everything is wonderful and grand. His house in Colloroo, Australia is on a
toxic landfill, in the landing path of the airport next door and next to
buzzing power lines. It's the ultimate fixer-upper with every section an
unfinished project in the works. But it's his home and it's a marvelous one.
He even has a pool room. Never mind there's only about two feet of space on
any side of the table.
Darryl is as proud as can be that his daughter Trace (Sophie Lee) has a degree
from an institute of higher learning. He doesn't care that it is from a beauty
school and she sports the worst hairdo in the country.
Every moment is a blessing. Each night he compliments his wife (Anne Tenney)
on what a marvelous dinner she has prepared. ("This meal is wonderful, what do
you call this?" "Chicken.") His vacation home is a shack on a mostly dried up
lake. To him it's an incomparable palace.
They are the down-under equivalent of "white trash", but they're happy with it
and that's all that matters.
He may be living in denial, but he's riding Cleopatra's pleasure barge down
the river.
When the federal government sends him a notice that it is taking his home to
make room for an airport expansion, he is convinced they can't do it. He
decides to fight and isn't very successful in the first court appeal. His
defense of "It isn't right" doesn't impress the magistrate. Not one to give up
the noble fight, he works his way up to the Supreme Court.
In another blow to the over-budgeted Hollywood tradition, this charming little
film was made on a remarkably low budget and is picking up a sizable audience.
Like the "Blair Witch Project", it's a triumph of substance over money.
Shot in just 11 days with a Super-16 camera, the tale of innocent struggle is
an easy-going story of the triumph of the small fry. Much like the making of
the film itself.
A team of four created the film, voting on who was to be director (Rob Sitch).
Santo Cilauro was chosen to be cameraman because, "The guys sort of realized I
was handy with the old wedding camera."
The characters are a bit quirky to be completely believable, but they're easy
to warm up to. Every time the family finds a bargain in the classifieds - and
they find a lot of them - it's a victory. Even if they don't have the least
idea what they're going to do with that remarkable deal on a pulpit.
Australia has a reputation for enchanting films. Picnic At Hanging Rock,
The Man From Snowy River and many more are unassuming movies about human
beings. As much fun as special effects are, it's a pleasure to sit in a movie
theater and watch something quiet and cheerful.
Of course the film has its flaws. The voice-over narration at the beginning
goes on for far too long. A chance encounter with a well-dressed man in a
courthouse telegraphs the rest of the film. A few of the scenes are somewhat clumsy.
But if feels good and sometimes that's all you need from a movie.
(Michael Redman has written this film for over 24 years and was ready for a
feel-good film so maybe he's not completely unbiased about this one. That's
life. Email your stories about great second-hand bargains to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 8/26/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Random Hearts (1999)
Stress makes people do weird things. Major stress makes people do _really_
weird things. Suddenly solid ground disappears and they're swimming in an
unknown ocean without the usual rulebook.
When their minds abruptly teleport them into their own personal "Twilight
Zones", they don't have the usual patterns to fall back upon. Their worlds are
filled with alien landscapes; their thoughts, bizarre assumptions. This is
often the opportunity for psychological and spiritual growth. It's also
occasionally the provocation to climb to the top of a tall building with a
high-powered rifle.
There are many different ways of dealing with anxiety. Some people work
through it. Some shut down. Others throw themselves into an obsession. Still
others deny anything has happened.
Washington D.C. internal affairs cop Dutch Van Den Broeck (Harrison Ford) has
just received horrible news. His wife was killed in an airplane crash on her
way to Miami. It gets even worse. She was flying their with her lover.
Dutch has to get to the bottom of this. Using his detective skills, he's
determined to find out what was going on: why she was having an affair. He
can't accept that there are no answers. The truth is it's not why, it just is.
He questions her co-workers, harasses the airlines and finally discovers her
lover's identity. Then he shows up on the widow's doorstep.
Shocked Kay Chandler (Kristen Scott Thomas) is a congresswoman from a small
town in New Hampshire and has chosen the denial method of coping with her
grief. When she hears the news of her husband's death, she changes history. He
told her he was going to New York, but she decides she heard wrong and he
actually said "Miami". Dutch's tale of infidelity is obviously fiction.
When Dutch refuses to abandon his obsession and continues stalking his dead
wife, his and Kay's paths cross repeatedly. She begins to soften towards him
and a forbidden attraction develops.
What had the potential for a probing look at grief and how different people
react to it, instead plods along sending the audience into thoughts of how
uncomfortable the theater seats are. Instead of looking at the numbing effects
of shock and stress, we experience the numbing effects of various body parts
falling asleep.
The film's 130 minutes feels like days as the story moves at a snail's pace
towards its inevitable conclusion. The first hour could have been edited to 15
minutes and lost nothing. There's so little that happens for such long periods
of time the mind wanders to grocery lists and choirs that need to be done.
Although the acting skills for the most part are more than adequate, there's
nothing special happening. Ford is almost always a delight to watch, but he
doesn't put much into this role. Thomas is a little better, but never really
breaks out of her ice princess character.
The chemistry between them is mostly negligible. The one scene that is an
exception takes place in her car parked at the airport. The sudden and
desperate groping in the front seat feels real and for a minute you think
something's going to break through the barrier between them.
Their romance growing from grief is unusual, but not out of the realm of
possibility. The problem is they are so detached it's difficult to believe.
The supporting actors fare better. Dutch's partner (Charles Dutton) and Kay's
campaign worker (Bonnie Hunt) are much more interesting characters and add a
little life. But not enough.
The police case and political campaign sub-plots look promising at first, but
drift into nothing but filler for a film that doesn't need it. The time spent
on these could have been used much more effectively on the real story.
Director Sidney Pollack has a history of admirable films, but this one doesn't
add much to his resume. His acting role as the unfeeling media spin doctor is
more impressive than his work behind the camera.
Life has enough tedium that there's no need to go to a movie for more of it.
Skip this one and step outside for the last few warm days of autumn instead.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 24 years and he'd like to
think he has better things to do than sit in a dark room being bored. Email
your non-boring comments to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 10/14/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
This week's Y2K article: http://www.indepen.com/
Y2K archives: http://www.indepen.com/y2k.html

Title
Review for Star Trek: First Contact (1996)
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
The "Star Trek" audience applauded wildly at the familiar figures,
spectacular special effects and blazing action scenes. Anticipation was
high for more of the same.
And then the "Star WARS" preview ended.
It might have been a tactical error to preview the re-release of the
Lucas trilogy just before the new Trek film. Movies about the Enterprise
crew tend to be slower moving and more methodical in their approach:
something of a disappointment in the sf action arena when compared to
Luke Skywalker and his buddies.
In this outing, the Federation starship must defeat the evil Borg who
have traveled into Earth=92s past to prevent the heavy-drinking
heavy-partying warp drive inventor from making first contact with a
friendly alien race. This will supposedly make it possible for the Borg
to assimilate our planet in their present.
This is the first Trek film without a single member of the original crew
on hand and featuring the new Enterprise E. No James T. Kirk to romance
the alien babes, no Spock to save the day, no Bones to proclaim "I'm a
doctor, not a quantum mechanic!" Instead we have the next generation
crew with a younger and hipper look. =
Some of the new cast look great on the big screen, especially Jean Luc
Picard (Patrick Steward who, oddly enough for being a Trek regular, is
in reality an actor) and Data (Brent Spiner), but the
Spectacular-Looking Award goes to the Borg. The cyborgs have always been
the creepiest of the Star Trek bad guys and they captivate the visual
aspect of the movie. The queen Borg (Alice Krige) is the perfect mixture
of exotic eroticism and lethal danger.
But the rest of the Borg, as cool as they look, just don't work as
menaces. Their method of attack is to lumber towards the enemy and
subdue him hand-to-hand so that he can become a new member of the hive.
The slow moving approach combined with Picard and crew waltzing through
huge numbers of Borg without even being noticed doesn't exactly create a
sense of excitement. They remind me of the zombies in "Brunch Of The
Living Dead" -- "Oh no, there=92s a Borg 50 feet away! We=92d better star=
t
to run in a half hour or so!"
The entire film runs as slowly as the Borg. There are not many highs or
lows in the level of action. Everything moves forward at the same
pondering pace.
Much of the movie must be a mystery to non-Trek fans. Picard's previous
experience with the hive (which changed mysteriously from a collective)
is underexplained. The holo-suite scene appears out of nowhere without a
background.
In terms of Trek films, this is one of the better ones: it's fun to see
the guys in another adventure; but when you compare it to other movies,
there's nothing spectacular. When the original series was on television,
we used to wonder what they could do with a huge budget on the big
screen. Now we know.
They make another "Star Trek" episode.
[This appeared in the 12/5/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Skulls, The (2000)
There are certain beliefs that our society supposedly holds as
universally true. Being nice to other people is a good thing. Thou shalt
not thisandthat.
Then there are those other convictions we secretly live by.
Some of the best films examine our secret dogma and how it affects our
lives and relationships with ourselves and others. The more successful
movies question the truth versus faith and the complex issues involved.
"The Skulls" just takes cheap shots...and does it badly.
The rich and powerful are morally corrupt. Even saints have to
compromise to get ahead. Ultimately that turns out to be a bad idea.
These simplistic doctrines are at the core of this film. No questions.
No exploration. And not much of a story.
Luke (Joshua Jackson) is a poor boy from the wrong side of the tracks
turned star athlete and scholar at an unnamed university that looks
suspiciously like Yale. He wants to go to law school, but lacks the
funds. Until, that is, he's invited to join the Skulls, a secret society.
The Skulls count judges and senators as their members and are an
organized good ole boy network. They will do anything for their brothers
including providing them with new cars, bank accounts, whores and a
career fast track. Didn't George W. Bush belong to one of these?
When one of Luke's buddies shows up dead, he suspects the Skull's
handiwork and wants out. In this junior version of The Firm, he is
stuck for life unless he can come up with a complex plan to outsmart them.
What goes wrong with this film? What doesn't? The acting is third-rate.
Character development is nonexistent. People do things that don't make
sense and say things that no human being would ever utter. The
cinematography is boring. Luke's plan only works by accident. Even the
obligatory sex scene is tame.
Someone should have done a reality check when they were filming this
thing. Our financially strapped hero lives in a luxurious suite posing
as a dorm room. Remarkably, the plot is somehow improbable and predictable.
The movie features mostly missed opportunities. Luke must turn to his
old skills as a petty criminal and enlist the help of techno-savvy
friends he left behind. At this point, the audience is filled with false
hope that something interesting is going to happen with real people. But
it goes nowhere. The scenes are dull and his old friends just disappear
never to show up again.
The story doesn't even tell us what the Skulls are really about. Why
they hold their rituals in the dungeon of the Rue Morgue. Why everyone
and their brother seem to know everything about this super-secret
organization. Why they brand future senators with the skull logo on
their wrists where everyone can see. Why we should care about anything
that happens in this movie.
There is one truth about "The Skulls" that the filmmakers must hope
remains secret. But I think I've just spilled the beans.
(Michael Redman has written this column for quite a while and he belongs
to societies so secret that even he doesn't know about them.)
[This appeared in the 4/13/2000 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bluemarble.net.]
-- 
mailto:redman@bluemarble.net
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Mr. Holland's Opus (1995)
For the first several minutes of this film, it seems as if it's going to be
another "Stand And Deliver" or "Up The Down Staircase" or "To Sir With Love"
or any one of the other zillions of `teacher turns on disillusioned students"
movies. And for the first few minutes it is, but then it turns into something else.
Richard Dreyfuss is playing the Holiday Inn circuit, but decides to teach
high school because the monetary rewards of musicianship leave something to be
desired. His lack of enthusiasm for his teaching career just about equals the
kids' level of excitement for music appreciation. No one wants to be there.
Dreyfuss connects with the students by finding the common interest of popular
music. Then he helps a girl transcend her horrible playing. Slowly it dawns on
him that there may be something to teaching besides the bucks. He also
discovers that his idea of composing in his spare time is a dream as the
demands of his job and caring for his deaf son overwhelm any possibility of
time that is spare.
There are a few cliches in the movie. When the teacher's marriage grows
tedious, his relationship with the talented young high school honey is
inevitable. The students' instant recognition that the subject matter is cool
is in every teacher movie ever made. But the scenes, familiar as they are to
the audience, ring true.
The film spans several decades as Dreyfuss changes the lives of his students
but can't do his own work or relate to his son. The make-up job is so
convincing that it's hard to remember what age the actor truly is. The story
is real enough to allow you to vicariously experience the teacher's agony and ecstasy.
This may be the first time that I've reviewed three films (this, "Nixon" and
"12 Monkeys") in a row and given them all four stars. There's some good stuff
out there and you owe it to yourself to catch them. ("Nixon" is already gone.)
The other two appeal to a narrower audience, but if you aren't touched by "Mr.
Holland's Opus", go home and check for a pulse. 
(Michael Redman, having written this column week in and week out for almost
half of his life, sometimes spends the early morning hours sitting in front of
a Mac trying to find the right words for this italicized section.)
[This appeared in the 1/24/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Diabolique (1996)
        The word to describe Sharon Stone is "wonder". Not that she _is_ a wonder,
but rather that I wonder how she can be so inconsistent. She has a dynamic
screen presence in "Basic Instinct", turns in a surprisingly fine acting job
in "Casino", but possesses neither of those here.
        Stone teams up with private school headmaster's wife Isabelle Adjani to kill
Adjani's thoroughly unlikable husband (Chazz Palminteri). In a comedy of
errors and unexpected twists straight out of Hitchcock (as in `homage to'
[read "steal from"]), it turns out that someone saw them or he's not dead or maybe...
        Kathy Bates turns in a credible, if unspectacular, performance as an
investigative police detective. Her character is a bit dull but realistic,
although her actions at the end are puzzling. Adjani is more than satisfactory
as the timid beaten spouse driven to desperation.
        It's Stone that is a disappointment among the actors. How can she be the
epitome of a femme fatale in previous films and come off as a blank in this
one? Costumed in skin-tight clothes and looking down her nose at everyone, she
is someone you would want to avoid because she is boring, not enticingly
dangerous. Even the threat (or promise?) of a lesbian relationship between the
conspirators is only half played out.
        On the positive side, there are enough unexpected plot developments to keep
your interest alive. That is if you can put up with Stone's cardboard cut-out
character and scenes directly lifted from Hitch's movies.
[This appeared in the 3/28/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)
"Pleasant". Now there's a word that's a double-edged sword. It used to mean an
agreeable experience, but during the past couple of years I've been hearing it
used differently. Occasionally when I've heard someone refer to a pleasant
time, what they really mean is "uninteresting". Nothing unexpected. Safe.
Twin teens David (Tobey Maguire) and Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon) live with
their divorced mom and are inundated with the troubles of the nineties. There
is no hope. There are no good jobs. AIDS is killing off the population. The
ozone is being depleted. They both cope in a time-honored tradition: they
ignore the problems. Jennifer is a party girl out for a good time. David
retreats into the safe world of reruns of "Pleasantville", a fifties sitcom.
While arguing over television - David is set to watch a "Pleasantville"
marathon, Jennifer has a hot date coming over to watch an MTV concert -- they
break the remote control. Almost immediately a peculiar TV repairman (Don
Knotts) shows up with a new super-powered remote. Instead of changing
channels, it transports them into the program. You can almost hear eerie music
and Rod Serling's voice, "There's a signpost up ahead. You are entering Pleasantville."
The television series is modeled after "The Donna Reed Show", "Father Knows
Best" and other sanitized family comedies popular during the late fifties and
early sixties. David and Jennifer find themselves taking the place of Bud and
Mary Sue and living with TV parents George (William H. Macy) and Betty (Joan
Allen). Having no choice, they pretend to belong.
Exploring the town, they discover that the black and white Pleasantville is a
little odd. The weather forecast is always the same ("High of 72, low of 72,
sunny skies"), there is no sex, nothing ever changes and the basketball team
never misses a shot. Everything is just too darned nice.
Jennifer changes all that when she seduces her boyfriend at lover's lane. He
doesn't have any idea what is going on. She reassures him with "Don't worry.
It's supposed to do that." Driving home afterwards he notices something
strange. A single rose in an otherwise monochromatic world is now a brilliant red.
Soon word of the new invention spreads like wildfire and the high school kids
are going to it like crazed weasels. Colors start sprouting everywhere. Skin
tones take on a rosy hue rather than pasty gray.
David brings a book of art prints to Mr. Johnson (Jeff Daniels), his boss at
the malt shop. Johnson is blown away by the magnificence of the colors and is
soon painting up a storm. There's no stopping now. A change is gonna come.
The film is filled with about a thousand metaphors. The most obvious mirrors
the transformation of society in the fifties. Scarred by the depression, World
War II and the threat of the bomb, Americans wanted to put themselves to sleep
for a while. Television illustrated that desire. Father did know best. If
there was a minor problem, it could be resolved by having a little talk with
the Beaver.
Meanwhile out in the real world, this wasn't exactly the case. Racism, poverty
and minority rights were looming on the horizon. Elvis and James Dean were
lurking in the shadows, ready to wake the country up.
On a more personal level, the movie is about individual choices between
mediocrity and adventure. At first the colorizing seems trite: get laid and
everything looks better. Then we find that it's not sex that brightens up the
world. It's passion for life.
Especially telling is Betty's experience. After Mary Sue explains to her "mom"
what sex is, Betty experiences her first orgasm in a bathtub of warm water. A
tree outside bursts into flames.
Although energized, Betty doesn't want anyone to know. She uses gray make-up
to cover her now-pink skin. She knows what life is about but wants to "pass"
as normal and lead the proverbial life of quiet desperation because it's
safer. Later she can no longer resist. When told not to worry, her color will
go away, she replies emphatically "I don't want it to go away."
The film made me squirm in my seat. The effects are handled beautifully with
little patches of surreal color appearing in otherwise black and white scenes.
The actors are all fine with Macy and Allen as particular stand-outs. But I
kept waiting for the film to delve deeper into its theme. Unfortunately it
never gets far below the surface.
The sequence of events is predicable. Kids, artists and women awaken to a new
vivid reality and want to change things. The men in power are frightened and
fight back.
Director and writer Gary Ross hits us over the head with heavy-handed
messages. A store window sign reads "No Coloreds". There's a book-burning. The
Chamber Of Commerce look like Nazis.
The adults of the fifties knew better than to believe the simplistic
television shows. Their kids, on the other hand, may have fallen for them. The
first generation growing up with the little glowing screen as a family member
were indoctrinated by those programs. Even as adults, children of the fifties
find it difficult to shake that early message that if you do things right,
life will be easy.
Perhaps the best line in the film comes when David is consoling his real
mother who is in tears. Echoing a statement that has come out of almost every
Baby Boomer's mouth, she cries, "I'm 40. Life isn't supposed to be like this!"
"Mom," he explains, "there is no way life is _supposed_ to be."
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and is still
searching for just the right mix of pleasant and that other stuff.)
[This appeared in the 11/5/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Man in the Iron Mask, The (1998)
Audiences flocking to see this sixth film adaptation of the final of
Alexandre Dumas' "Three Musketeers" trilogy are mostly going to view the
Titanic Leonardo DiCaprio in his dual role. The filmmakers must have been
counting on this in advance and that's why they sabotaged what could have been
 an exciting movie.
It's 1662, many years after the heydays of the Musketeers and the four
friends have aged and gone their separate ways. Aramis (Jeremy Irons) is the
leader of the militant Jesuits. Athos (John Malkovich) is devoted to his son
Raul (Peter Sarsgaard). D'Artagnan (Gabriel Byrne) is the captain of the new
generation of Musketeers and guards young King Louis XIV (DiCaprio) with an
intense allegiance for a mysterious but too-guessable reason. Porthos (Gerald
Depardieu) is attempting to work his way through France's vast supplies of
wine and women, two and three at a time.
The king is a perfect example of why the French Revolution occurred with such
a vengeance. When Raul's sweetheart catches the royal eye, he sends Athos' son
to the front of a border skirmish so the young man will be killed. This unites
three of the four in a conspiracy to replace him with the enigmatic Bastille
prisoner (also played by DiCaprio) clad in an iron mask to hide his identity.
The story has a lot of things going for it: political intrigue, aging heroes,
regal corruption, swashbuckling action and the potential for the ultimate
buddies film. We get very little of any of it on screen.
It's a full hour and a half of not much, before there's any of the swordplay
that could have made the film something more than an eye-feast for teenage
girls. During that final 30 minutes, when they finally get down to "One for
all and all for one", there's the promise that was made, but it's too little
too late.
All of the Musketeers roles are skillfully performed by the actors although
the characters are devoid of much personality. DiCaprio, more than adequate as
Jack in "Titanic", stumbles through both his roles here and was a poor choice
by writer/director Randall Wallace who ironically scripted the wildly
successful "Braveheart". DiCaprio can't hold his own on screen with the
seasoned foursome.
Maybe someday someone will take the last half hour of this film and film a
competent beginning to it. Until then you should plan on buckling your swashes elsewhere.
(Michael Redman has written this column for 23 years. As he writes this, it's
April Fool's Day and the March summer seems to be over. Good trick!
Redman@bvoice.com for interesting electrons.)
[This appeared in the 4/2/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Avengers, The (1998)
Conventional wisdom among collectibles retailers is that children's items
begin to dramatically escalate in price about twenty-five or thirty years
after the item was made. That's when the kids of that time have jobs,
disposable income and a desire to re-visit the awe and wonderment of childhood
that has disappeared from their lives. Check out the prices of toys from the
late sixties and you'll find that Yogi Bear lunch boxes are demanding
big bucks.
There's a heavy nostalgia nowadays for the late sixties and early seventies
and nowhere is it more apparent than on the big screen. Boomers are now mostly
in their forties and fifties and have lived in the work-a-day world for a long
time. They'd like to re-capture some of that fun they remember from days of
yore. Hollywood seems more than eager to churn out product to help them.
Directors are zealous to put their stamp on icons from that time.
And for the most part they're messing it up.
"Mission Impossible", "Lost In Space", "Godzilla", "Zorro". None of these
successfully capture the originals. None of these are even good films. You can
now add "The Avengers" to the list.
The British television series began in 1961. Super secret agent John Steed
(then-Patrick Macnee) and his third partner, Emma Peel (then-Diana Rigg) are
the pair that the American audience fell for. Surrealistic and witty, the
series fit the mood of the times. The leather-clad Rigg probably didn't hurt
the ratings either. After all it's not a coincidence that you can't pronounce
her character's name without "appeal".
Now we're in the nineties. Steed (now-Ralph Fiennes) and Peel (now-Uma
Thurman) are battling evil genius Sir August De Wynter (Sean Connery) who is
screwing with England's weather.
That's about as much of a plot as we have. There's some footage about a lot
of other things that either don't make sense or make even less sense. We get
betrayal for some unknown reason. Evil clones appear and vanish and have no
connection to the film. Remarkably ineffective giant flying robot wasps with
machine guns in their belly come from nowhere for no good reason. There's a
high tech hot air balloon, but I have no idea why anyone's in it.
The spy agency is run by a man called "Mother" who is in a wheelchair and a
woman named "Father" who is blind...at least in some scenes. There's probably
a reason for all of this, but we'll never know it.
Macnee makes an appearance of sorts. He is the voice for an invisible man
whose character goes nowhere in a scene that does nothing.
A group of villains sits around a table, all clad in huge pastel-colored
teddy bear outfits. At first it's humorous to watch the teddies waddle around,
but then it becomes goofy.
The movie is a medley of clutter, confusion and wrong decisions around every corner.
It feels like major portions of the film are missing. The storyline jumps
rather than flows. Reportedly the film was re-cut several times. This is one
of those times where the whole is less than the sum of the parts especially
since some of the parts appear to be missing.
There's one good point where Peel is running from one room to another in a
house designed by Escher. Other than that, the effects are second-rate. The
weather threat is old hat as are the scenes of huge tornadoes.
Thurman almost makes an adequate Emma Peel but it doesn't work. She looks
good, dresses in all the right fetish outfits but there's no spark. Fiennes
fares even less well. Macnee's Steed was a witty man of the world with a sense
of humor. Fiennes' agent comes across as a dour kid in grown-up clothes who
has never been out of his home town. Even Connery, one of the greatest living
actors, doesn't have much of a presence outside of a few fiery scenes.
The action scenes are difficult to follow. Director Jeremiah Chechik
(responsible for the atrocious remake of "Diabolique") somehow manages to put
the camera exactly where it shouldn't be. Things happen, people move around,
but even if, with the utmost effort, you were able to care about any of it,
the scenes are bewildering.
The primary allure of the original was the interaction between the two leads.
Witty banter and an underplayed sexual tension were a winning combination.
Admittedly there are a few humorous sexual puns in the film, but there's no
chemistry and the repartee is anything but clever. One of Emma Peel's first
lines of dialog is "Rules are made to be broken." It doesn't get any better.
Advance word alone should have been enough to scare off anyone. The release
date was changed several times. Connery refuses to promote the film. There was
no screening for critics which may have been a good choice for Warner
Brothers. At least this way, they get something of an audience for the first
weekend before the news gets out.
Admittedly I haven't seen an episode of the television series for a couple of
decades. My guess is that it would be severely dated now. No matter how
antiquated it might be, there's no doubt that it holds up better than this
film is at first viewing.
There's no reason to waste any part of the last few days of summer inside
watching this movie. No reason at all.
(Michael Redman has written this column for one score and three years and
thinks he's going outside for a while. He'll come in occasionally to check his
email at redman@bvoice.com)
[This appeared in the 8/20/98 "Bloomington Independent" (formerly the
"Bloomington Voice"), Bloomington, Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at
redman@bvoice.com ]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Tao of Steve, The (2000)
Human mating rituals have to be the most fascinating aspect of existence.
There is no other activity man (or woman) kind spends so much energy
planning and agonizing over and no other one that makes us look so
ridiculous. "America's Funniest Home Videos" has nothing on 3:00 am at the
local bars.
Dex (Donal Logue) has it all figured out. He's an overweight slacker who
dresses funny; has never had a good hair day; spends his days smoking
American Spirits, drinking beer and playing frisbee golf and was born to bed
the babes. He's the guy who for no apparent reason is inexplicably
irresistible to the fairer sex.
Our pudgy lothario's secret is a mixture of self-serving eastern philosophy
("Be desireless: if you don't want to get laid, you _will_ get laid") and
the "Tao Of Steve" (McGarrett, Austin and McQueen). Within moments of the
film's beginning, he has had his way with a friend's wife in the library
stacks and convinced a young college woman that the true path to
enlightenment lies in his bed.
But, and as Peewee Herman says, "We all have big buts," it all comes to a
screeching halt when he falls for Syd (Greer Goodman) who is impervious to
his charms.
The turning point in the film comes when they discuss Kierkegaard's opinion
of "Don Giovanni" who slept with hundreds of women because he was afraid
that not one would actually love him. Dex's feigned detachment works with
the hundreds, but he has to search for something deeper for the one.
A witty and occasionally hilarious small film, Jenniphr Goodman's debut
directoral outing is a prize. The Sundance favorite isn't perfect: Dex's
scenes with his roommates and poker buddies border on the tedious. But the
screen time with him and Syd is charming and the mismatched lovers ooze with chemistry.
[Michael Redman has written film reviews in town for an exceptionally long
time and has to admit to some suspicions when his editor asked him to write
about a guy in weird clothes with unruly hair and his attitudes towards
women. Email clues to redman@bluemarble.net.]
[The appeared in the 10/19/2000 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bluemarble.net.]

Title
Review for Newton Boys, The (1998)
Newtons movin' kinda slow at historical junction
There are twilight times in history: years where something that was gives way
to what will be. It's rare that individuals living during such a shift
perceive the transformation. Most are too preoccupied with putting food on the
table and a roof over their heads to see the big picture. It takes living on
the fringes of society to visualize the forest.
We seem to be living in one of those times of change now. Fifteen years from
now may be radically different from what we've experienced previously. In the
early years of this century the western United States was undergoing such an
alteration and it took a gang of bank robbers to see it coming.
The Newton brothers began their life of crime in 1919. They successfully
robbed over 80 banks without getting caught and pulled off the largest train
robbery ever at the end of their career in 1924. And they did it all with a
minimum of violence -- no deaths and few injuries.
Based on the exploits of the historical family (during the credits there are
interviews with the boys themselves including an appearance with Johnny
Carson), the film is an interesting study of the developing west. After a
failed daylight holdup that ends with crooks on horseback being chased by the
law in a motorized vehicle, Texan Willis (Matthew McConaughey) Newton realizes
that the days of Jesse James style plundering are over.
Convincing his brothers Joe (Skeet Ulrich), Jesse (Ethan Hawke), Dock
(Vincent D'Onofrio) and explosives expert Brentwood Glasscock (singer Dwight
Yoakam) that the dirt-poor life of sharecroppers is not for them, Willis sets
about modernizing bank robbery. He obtains a list of banks that still have the
older square door safes and, in a stroke of genius, realizes that the best
time to rob them is in the middle of the night when no one is around.
After years of successful crimes, the boys get greedy and go for a mail train
out of Chicago loaded with down with cash. Although they get away with $3
million, this is their fatal mistake. The Feds and Chicago cops are after them
and they're not about to give up.
The movie is too reminiscent of "Butch Cassidy And The Sundance Kid". without
as many entertainment values. There's even a scene with Willis with a glass of
champagne soaking in a bathtub in middle of a fancy hotel room. Later his
girlfriend shoots photos of the guys. Sound familiar? Good buddies doing
crimes politely in the modernizing west with a light-hearted flavor worked
well for the earlier film and those aspects are the highlights in this one.
The film's main audience attraction is its downfall: the boys themselves. As
much appeal as the young men here have for the female gender, they just don't
have the acting chops of Paul Newman or Robert Redford. These actors in "The
Newton Boys" are interchangeable enough that at times it's difficult to
remember which brother is which.
Director Richard Linklater ("Slackers", "Before Sunrise") begins with a
slow-moving delightful western that rambles for too long and eventually grinds
to a halt. By the time that the two hours are up, you'll be wondering if most
of it was filmed in slow motion.
The supporting cast, especially "ER"'s Julianna Margulies as Willis' babe,
are interesting enough to provide some bright spots. Journeying through the
days of 70 years ago is fun but not enough to hold the film together by itself.
The clips at the end from the "Tonight Show" are the highlight of the movie.
That's unfortunate.
[This appeared in the 4/2/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Bulworth (1998)
Bulworth exciting but what does it mean?
Senator Bulworth (Warren Beatty) is a man facing his own demons. Coming from
an idealistic liberal beginning, he's now in bed with lobbyists and has sold
out everything he believed in. In the middle of a re-election campaign he's a
man with a plan. "Buying" a huge life insurance policy in exchange for voting
correctly, he then hires an unknown assassin to kill him.
With the new found freedom, Bulworth discovers life. He begins telling the
truth as he sees it - a definite no-no for a politician. In the beginning his
pronouncements are convoluted. He tells an all-black church that unless they
stop eating chicken wings and backing OJ, they'll never be rid of people like
him. At a Hollywood fund-raiser, he condemns movies as shoddy products and
says that the only reason that he's there is because they are all rich Jews.
At a Black after-hours club, he begins to have some fun. Dancing with the
luscious Halle Berry in one of the most erotic scenes ever involving two
vertical people, he falls for her and decides that he wants to live. Now he
has to figure out how to call off the contract.
There are some fascinating aspects of the film. The story follows traditional
mythological aspects of a heroic journey. The lost man travels deep into the
underworld to discover his soul and finds truth. Reborn a new person, he
attempts to right wrongs.
There is also the political angle. In this arena, the movie seems somewhat
anachronistic. It's a film that could have been made years ago and although
the circumstances are still the same, that portion seems dated.
The confusion comes when these two are mixed. Just when Bulworth's search for
his new life is becoming interesting, the election throws that line off track.
The assassination device also is troublesome. While it works to get the story
into gear, after that it gets in the way. Bulworth's dodging his murderer is a
waste of time in what is an otherwise enticing film.
Two weeks after mulling over the movie in the vast recesses of the back of my
mind, there are still a few things that I can't get a grasp on. The most
wondrous character in the film is an elderly homeless man who runs into
Bulworth at opportune times to say...something. He ties into the mythological
journey but how? Who is he and what is his purpose in the film? Either I'm too
dim to understand or he (and a few other scenes) is tossed in the mix just for
weirdness. I would prefer to think it's the latter.
Bulworth is a well-constructed ride and thought-provoking. The answers aren't
readily apparent and maybe that's a good thing.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and realizes that
the Summer Solstice is just around the corner. Time flies when it rains every
day. Redman@bvoice.com is an eaddress for random notes.)
[This appeared in the 6/18/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Horse Whisperer, The (1998)
As trite as it sounds, life is full of potentials. Every day we wake up,
there are new alternatives. Every time we turn around, there are new options.
With so many possibilities, often it's difficult to make choices. And after
we've made them, we wonder what would have happened if we had taken the other
path. The what-ifs can be infuriating. What would have happened if I had left
this person to be with that one? Quit this job and taken the other?
One absolute truth is that we never know those answers. We can't live both
lives. As difficult as it may be, we have to make the choice and go on.
Annie MacLean (Kristen Scott Thomas) must make one of those painful
decisions. She either leaves everything behind for a new love and a new life
or she abandons her would-be lover to return to a relationship she has devoted
her life to. Either way she loses. Either way she wins.
In a horrendous accident, Annie's daughter Grace (Scarlett Johansson) and her
horse Pilgrim slide in the snow into the path of an 18-wheeler. Grace looses
half of her leg. Her best friend is killed. Pilgrim is badly hurt and driven
mad. The vet wants to put the horse down, but Annie refuses permission.
The 14-year old girl sinks into depression. Her mother and father, Robert
(Sam Neill), are desperate to do something to pull her out of it. When Annie
happens upon an article about a mysterious "horse whisperer" who can work
wonders with equine problems, she packs up Pilgrim and the reluctant Grace and
heads out in their Range Rover for a New York to Montana trek.
After they arrive at his ranch, cowboy shaman Tom Booker (Robert Redford)
reluctantly agrees to look at the horse. He has already told her "no" on the
phone ("Does 'no' in Montana mean 'yes' where you are?"), but Pilgrim is there
and Booker has a heart of gold.
All four of the major characters (Annie, Grace, Tom and Pilgrim) are damaged
goods. Annie is so obsessed with her career that she's lost her life. Grace
believes that she can't go on. Pilgrim is crazed. Booker's beloved wife left
him years before and he's never been able to fall in love again.
The interaction between them brings each to a better way of being. Booker
works with the horse and at the same time Grace starts to come out of her
black mood. Annie, the hard New York magazine editor, also begins to soften to
the simple life and to the quiet complex man. 
She and Tom begin to explore their mutual attraction. They slow dance
together and the desire is obvious. Director Redford gets more out of a hand
on a back and a leg touching a thigh than most other directors can accomplish
with two sweaty naked people. When Robert shows up to visit, Annie is faced
with the fateful choice.
        Redford is obviously in love with the big sky country. It's not difficult to
imagine why he spends most of his time on his ranch in Utah rather than his
home in New York. Judging from the film, you know where his heart is and he
wants you to feel the same.
This is a beautiful film. The affectionate look at the countryside is
breathtaking and the story unfolds in an unhurried natural manner. When Booker
and Pilgrim stare into each others' eyes in a field of tall grass for what
seems to be hours, it's real and makes sense. He and Annie take a sunset ride
to a gorgeous vista and somehow it isn't corny.
Even with the complex issues that the film addresses and the longing gazes
between man and woman and man and horse, the movie's plot is a bit simplistic.
There is little doubt as to the outcome of the story. After the plot is laid
out, you know what's going to happen to Grace and Pilgrim. Even Annie and
Tom's relationship is fairly predictable, as is the ending. The strength of
the film is that, although you know what is going to happen, it happens with style.
All of the actors are believable and some fine performances are on the
screen. Even the small parts (Chris Cooper and Dianne Wiest as Tom's brother
and sister-in-law) are tasty.
Redford is never disappointing as an actor, but there's an oddness to his
portrayals. He's a little too clean. His characters are likable and engrossing
but they're somewhat sterile. Tom Booker is the kind of guy you'd love to have
as a friend, but you'd always suspect that somewhere there's a hidden dark
side. He's just too darned nice.
The ranch life is also fairly antiseptic. It all looks beautiful and calm.
There's a place for everything and everything is in its place. In my
experience, where there are horses, there are piles of...well, you know.
Country life has its attractions, but it's not nearly as neat and tidy as
Redford would have us believe.
This is a fairy tale for adults so it doesn't matter much that Tom and his
ranch aren't realistic. We aren't meant to question the lack of faults. We are
supposed to feel the message.
Although the film is overly long at nearly three hours, the length and
slowness imparts the sensuousness of natural surroundings. As I was watching,
I was reminded that I hadn't been out in the country for weeks.
It's necessary to get away from our everyday lives occasionally and touch the
dirt. Living in town and working every day causes us to lose the big picture.
The experience of watching the movie is a virtual visit, almost like being
there. It's not the same, but it does remind us that there's something else
besides jobs and television.
(Michael Redman has written this column for 23 years, but now he's thinking
about camping.)
[This appeared in the 5/21/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Marvin's Room (1996)
Because of the inherent drama, dysfunctional families have always been
better film fodder than "normal" ones and here we have a prize-winner.
Marvin, the father (Hume Cronyn) is a 20-year stroke victim who can't do
much more than lie in bed twitching and watching reflected light bounce
around his room. Aunt Ruth (Gwen Verdon) is semi-invalid, addicted to
soap operas and somewhat demented albeit in a delightful way. Daughter
Bessie (Diane Keaton) has sacrificed her life to care for the two.
To make matters even more complex, Bessie learns that she has leukemia.
She can possibly be saved by a bone marrow transplant from her sister or
nephews. Of course this is complicated too. The two siblings haven't
seen each other since the stroke when Lee (Meryl Streep) abandoned the
family because she couldn't deal with her father's condition.
Realizing that this time she must face up to her responsibility, Lee
packs up and reluctantly heads to the Florida home. First she must
gather up her sons: Charlie (Hal Scardino) who rarely looks out of his
books and Hank (Leonardo DiCaprio) who was placed in a mental
institution after he burned down their house.
Given the commercial approach to marketing films, we shouldn't be too
shocked that the misleading newspaper ads only feature the quote "I
promise Marvin's Room will make you laugh...", but if you're going to
the film expecting a light-hearted laugh-fest, you're in for a surprise.
Writer Scott McPherson (who died of AIDS complications in 1992) succeeds
in pulling off the comedic scenes by making the characters human beings
who have not totally given in to their dire circumstances. Caring for
her father who has been dying for 20 years, Bessie has adapted to the
situation and is able to see the joy in living ("I look back and I've
had such love").
Besides the humor, the thing that saves this from being a melodramatic
"disease d'jour" film is the exceptional acting abilities of the stars.
Even the relatively minor roles are wonderful choices. Bessie's
forgetful Dr. Wally (Robert DeNiro, also one of the producers) and his
half-witted assistant (Dan Hedaya) provide some of the light moments.
"That's what I get for hiring my brother," Wally explains after one of
Hedaya's off the wall comments.
At the core of the film is not the various ailments, but rather the
growing relationship between Hank, his mother and his aunt whom he has
never before met. As he comes out of his anger, there is hope for the
future among the dying.
Keaton appears to be on a come-back roll as she looks and acts much
older than her former screen personas. Streep, who could play almost any
character with skill, abandons herself to the almost-graduated
cosmetologist.
There are no high drama death scenes. Fortunately the story doesn't sink
to the tear-jerking level of who's going to die and how sad it is. It's
more about how to live amongst the sorrows. We are given a glimpse into
the lives of real people: a rare treat.
[This appeared in the 3/6/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Lost World: Jurassic Park, The (1997)
Steven Spielberg's sequel to "Jurassic Park" signals the beginning of
the big bang summer films. Unfortunately it also begins the season of
major disappointments.
It turns out that the dinosaurs n the original were breed elsewhere and
shipped to the theme park. Now there is a battle for control of the
island where the beasts have roamed free for the past four years. The
grandfatherly corporate big wig John Hammond (Richard Attenborough),
having had a change of heart, wants to let the lizards roam free. His
greedy capitalist pig nephew Peter Ludlow (Arliss Howard) has taken over
the company and decides to bring them to San Diego for a mainland
Dinoland.
Hammond calls in the expert in chaos theory from the first film Ian
Malcolm (Jeff Goldblum) to head up a four-person team to document life
on the island to sway public opinion so that the prehistoric creatures
can stay where they are. Malcolm, no fool he, declines the offer, but
heads for terrorville anyhow to convince his current significant other,
paleontologist Sarah Harding (Julianne Moore) that she is in the wrong
place at the wrong time.
Once in the land of the very large predators, bad turns to worse as
Malcolm discovers that his teenage daughter Kelly (Vanessa Lee Chester),
who was never mentioned in the first film and just happens to be black,
has stowed away. Continuing the trend towards disaster, the evil company
has sent a team to round up dinosaurs in rodeo style.
That's about as much of a plot as we get. There's a lot of destruction,
human-eating and loud screams on the island. A T-Rex is shipped back to
the mainland and then there's even more destruction, human-eating and
loud screams.
As you might expect, the effects are stupendous. The stegosauri and tiny
piranha-raptors are awesome (in the pre-eighties meaning of the word).
Everything looks even better than it did in "Jurassic Park"c.
One of the problems with the original was that the dinosaurs were more
real and interesting than the human cardboard cut-outs with the
exception of Jeff Goldburg. The same is true here, but even Goldblum
succumbs to the blandness.
After an amusing scene where a yacht accidentally discovers the island,
the first clue that we're in for trouble comes in a brief but seemingly
eternal scene with Malcolm and Ludlow. Goldblum hems and haws through
the conversation leaving the audience to wonder whether Malcolm had a
lobotomy or Goldblum just slept late and forgot to memorize his lines.
Where is the cocky Ian who was the only redeeming person in the
original?
The plot is full of holes and the people, remarkably stupid. 
Harding, who has studied dinosaurs for years, hangs out petting a baby
stegosaurus while its parents are heading towards them. She is oblivious
to any danger. Then she hijacks a baby T Rex to set its broken leg,
little suspecting that mom will come looking for her kid. And then
she wears her dinosaur blood-soaked jacket as they try to make their way
through a land of critters with the best sniffing ability in the world.
She must have gotten her degree from the Institute Of Really Dumb Things
To Do.
Even the velociraptors are out of character. In the first movie, they
were the perfect killing machines: intelligent and hunting in organized
packs. Here they eat backpacks and fight with one another as their prey
saunters off.
If someone can explain to me exactly what happened on the ship carrying
the T-Rex to San Diego, the film might make a little more sense, but I
don't have much hope.
If you want to catch some extraordinarily realistic dinosaurs, see this
at the matinee, but be prepared to be unamazed at the rest of the film.
During the first movie, the audience screams were in terror. Here
they're also in terror, but aimed at the script. I suppose it should be
expected since it's a sequel. I can only think of a couple of things
that are better the second time.
[This appeared in the 5/29/97 issue of the "Bloomington Voice",
Bloomington, Indiana. Michael Redman can be reached at
mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Love Letter, The (1999)
A good love letter is hard to beat. Of course it's always nice to know who
it's from. In the small New England coastal town of Loblolly-By-The-Sea, no
one even knows who it's to.
Helen (Kate Capshaw) finds the letter between the cushions of her couch as
she's sorting mail. Assuming it's meant for her, she comes up with two likely
suspects: old friend George (Tom Selleck) or her college-aged employee Johnny
(Tom Everett Scott). The missive gets around and jump-starts a few other lovers.
The film is daring in a few quiet ways. Helen is forty-ish. Her romance with
the kid is believable and, like much of the movie, very European. Hollywood is
slowly, but surely, discovering that women past the age of 25 can not only be
beautiful, but legitimate objects of desire. Capshaw is a honey and Helen is
intelligent and witty. It's no wonder Johnny falls into bed with her at a
moment's notice.
But it's obvious there's something of a problem. "I've never felt this way
before," he tells her. "Of course not," she responds, "You're only 20."
Much of the tale seems a bit too familiar. Maybe if we hadn't recently seen
"You've Got Mail" and "Message In A Bottle", the anonymous letter notion might
seem clever. Like Meg Ryan's character, Helen is even a small bookstore owner
with too many employees and few customers.
Selleck doesn't add much to the film. The most interesting person in the town
is Miss Scattergoods (Geraldine McEwan), an older eccentric who uses a 4th Of
July sparkler to light her cigarette. Unfortunately she's only on screen for a
few moments. Ellen DeGeneres as Helen's friend Janet gets in some good lines.
At times "Love Letter" is like a gentle breeze from that New England shore,
but it's not a very fresh breeze.
[The appeared in the 6/24/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted to Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Heaven's Prisoners (1996)
Dave Robicheaux (Alec Baldwin) is an ex-New Orleans cop and an ex-hard drinker
who has turned his life around. Nowadays ole Dave has devoted himself to
selling bait and fishing in a secluded bayou. Until, that is, a plane loaded
with illegal aliens and a drug ring underling explodes over his boat and
crashes into his own personal swampy Shangri La.
Robicheaux and wife Annie (Kelly Lynch) rescue a young Salvadoran girl from
the submerged plane and, obeying the universal law of `finders keepers',
decide to raise her as their own. Not unexpectedly, the crime connection
complicates matters.
Our hero goes after the bad guys. Then the bad guys go after him. Then he goes
after the bad guys again. And on and on.
Slipping back into the tough guy role under the guise of protecting his
family, Baldwin shoots and beats up a bunch of evil-doers while getting
pummeled. "Die Hard 3: Nawlins Swamp Boogie".
New Orleans is a natural for a film site. It would be difficult to direct a
film in that city without including fascinating locales and colorful locals.
Just point a camera down any street and you have a movie.
Baldwin does ok with his role, but is outshined by his co-stars. From
Robicheaux's past, Mary Stuart Masterson is a hard-drinking (there seem to be
a lot of those in the Crescent City) stripper (likewise) on the run (ditto) in
love with him. Never without her thermos of gin, Teri Hatcher of Lois Lane
fame plays the scheming wife of a drug lord. In true New Orleans style, all
the women beat the heat by wearing as little as possible, sometimes less.
Baldwin, though, keeps his pants on during the entire film.
Eric Roberts as Bubba Rocque steals the show. Rocque is Robicheaux's childhood
buddy turned southern crime boss who may or may not be plotting to kill
everyone while the two pals sip drinks on the lawn of his plantation. Roberts
may be guilty of quirky over-acting, but you can't take your eyes off him. He
fills the screen with a huge presence.
Let's see: Hollywood heartthrob, sex, violence, alcohol, drugs, guns, blood,
New Orleans in the hot sweaty summer, beautiful naked women. I think you got
one of your summer blockbusters right here.
[This appeared in the 5/22/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
At some point in nearly everyone's life, one begins to wonder exactly how
real his perception of the world is. Usually between the ages of 30 and 40,
most people realize that they have been looking at life through glasses made
of lenses ground first by their parents, then by teachers and continually by
the media.
Then there is the painful choice of accepting that view or attempting to get
out of the box that surrounds us and form our own vision. No wonder that time
of life is often referred to as a mid-life crisis.
Truman Burbank (Jim Carrey) is having one hell of a 30th year. Beginning with
a studio light that mysteriously falls out of the perfect blue sky and
followed by odd "coincidences", he begins to believe that the world is
revolving around him. In real life this would be called paranoia or delusions
of grandeur. Here it's because, unbeknownst to him, Burbank is the subject of
a 24 hour a day television series: the most popular show in the nation.
Adopted by a corporation at birth, his life has been broadcast to the world
since his day one. Now at day 10,909, he's discovered that something is amiss.
Everyone -- his wife, his best friend, the bus driver -- in his flawless
hometown of Seahaven (filmed in the sanitized Florida community of Seaside) is
an actor.
Even the town is a movie set with 5,000 hidden cameras under a huge dome. The
sun and moon rise and set by command of series director Christof (Ed Harris
who stepped in after Dennis Hopper left), he of the godlike name. All of
Truman's experiences and emotions are manipulated by Christof's whispers to
the actors. Truman lives in the ultimate fascist state.
An actress extra is yanked from the set when she and Truman begin to form an
attachment to each other because it wasn't in the script. While she is trying
to tell him that his life is a fake, she is hustled away by an actor playing
her father.
The movie owes much to "The Prisoner" television series, but the show within
the film reminds me of the slow-speed OJ Simpson car chase. Perhaps the best
television ever, the extended chase was riveting because it was real and
because nothing was happening, yet all eyes were on the tube. In this film,
viewers watch Truman going about his mundane day. He leads an idyllic life
and, like the chase, nothing much takes place...until he opens his eyes.
The audience watches him working, eating and sleeping. They give up their
lives (in one scene a baby screams while its parents ignore him, glued to the
set) to watch Truman eat dinner. We have become a country of voyeurs enjoying
the bread and circuses.
Strangely enough with all of the overly-long films recently, this one feels
too short. I wanted to know more. It is frustrating that the movie ends on the
brink of potentially the most interesting aspect of Truman's life. Like the
television audience, I want to watch.
Although turning in a marvelous job, director Australian Peter Weir ("Picnic
At Hanging Rock", "Witness", "The Year Of Living Dangerously") is a bit
heavy-handed with the metaphors. It's obvious that the film is about our
media-manipulated lives and the struggle to escape the shell of control. A
more subtle approach would have worked better.
Weir has a history of casting actors (Harrison Ford, Robin Williams, Mel
Gibson) in films that change their careers. Jim Carrey is no exception. Moving
from his hilarious television work in "The Duck Factory" and "In Living Color"
to the money-making but remarkably insipid "Ace Ventura" films, Carrey made
his living with broad comedy and a rubber face. Taking a chance in the daring
but flawed dark comedy "The Cable Guy", he signaled a change in direction. Now
with "The Truman Show", Carrey has completed his about-face. Reining himself
in, the actor is still hilarious at times, but there's a human here not just a goofball.
The supporting cast is up to the task. Each walks the fine line between
portraying a television character and portraying an actor playing a character.
The standout is Harris as the all-powerful megalomaniac on high.
The promotion of this film must have been a challenge. It was ready for
release last year, delayed for a few months and then delayed again. The studio
has decided to advertise it as a comedy. People who walk into the theater
expecting to see nonsensical Carrey antics are going to be surprised.
It's much easier to watch someone else than to have our own experiences. It's
seductive to be concerned about others because then we don't have to worry
about looking at ourselves. And then when we are in a time of crisis, someone
else's life can flash before our eyes.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and has seen a
number of people's lives flash before his eyes. Email your experiences to redman@bvoice.com.)
[This appeared in the 6/11/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Saint, The (1997)
Val Kilmer's super spy for hire is one part James Bond and one part
"Fletch" (a decidedly mediocre Chevy Chase film based on an excellent
detective book series) and doesn't succeed as well as even the Chase
disaster.
A master of disguise with a habit of using the names of Catholic saints,
Simon Templar is hired by a Russian crime boss turned politician to find
the secret of cold fusion. In order to do so, he must romance Emma
Russell (an uninteresting and apparently uninterested Elisabeth Shue),
the good doctor with the secret. Although not a part of his plan, he
falls in love with her.
Someone has stolen all of the fuel oil in Moscow and whoever comes up
with a new energy source will rule the country. If you can swallow that
far-fetched plot device, perhaps you'll go along with the rest of the
film. I found almost everything that happens equally implausible.
Kilmer can be a first-rate actor, but it doesn't happen here. The scenes
of his Fabio-inspired long-haired naked lounging are difficult to take
seriously. In all fairness, the two women that I spoke to after the
movie both loved the film...but then they had serious Val Kilmer
blinders on.
[This appeared in the 4/10/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Craft, The (1996)
Four teenage girls at a Los Angeles Catholic high school who have ample
reasons to hate the world (even beyond the fact that they are teenagers)
attempt to solve their problems by becoming witches -- with disastrous results.
As the result of a Wiccan advisor, the film has about as much accuracy in the
area of witchcraft as you could hope for in the midst of a quasi-horror movie
from an effects-happy Hollywood. Some of the rituals and concepts come
directly from the modern neo-pagan religions, but then the special effects
blow it all away into science fiction land. It's as if a scene in a film about
Christianity featured a priest performing a baptism with a flood of water
flowing from his fingers and lightning bolts shooting from his eyes.
Films featuring religion as the center point have always been a difficulty 
for mainstream studios, especially belief systems that are seen as The Other.
The easy approach is to grab the most exotic and sensational aspects and go
with them: Moslems as Jihad warriors, Hindus as fakirs, witches as
power-hungry spell-casters. At least there is none of the usual miscasting of
witches as Satan worshipers.
This story does capture the teen fascination with magick as a means to their
ends. A couple of the universal truths of adolescence are feelings of
powerlessness and a dissatisfaction with the cultural status quo. Magick is
seen as a cure for both. Empowerment in a way sure to piss off the parents.
When the girls perform a ritual to evoke a powerful spirit, they are in true
form: over their heads with precision in their act but no grounding in theology.
When one of the young witches realizes that things are falling apart (a slow
learner, she catches on after several deaths and her coven-mates begin
attacking her), she goes to an older witch for help. The elder practitioner
gives her a few hints, but our young friend runs away before she can help much.
The movie especially falls apart towards the end. One of the three "bad"
witchs seems to see the error of using magick to control others and then
suddenly she's back in the role of "evil"  without explaination. The tale
moral appears to be one of the main Wiccan beliefs: what you put out, you get
back threefold  the witch's version of the Golden Rule. The good little witch
supposedly believes that and uses it to defeat her opponents, but the last
scene shows her using her powers in an act of vengeance to scare and warn her
former friends.
As a horror film aimed at the younger set, this is nothing amazing, but does
stand a chance of becoming a cult (no pun intended) classic. It topped the box
office list during its first weekend in release. Checking out the pagan
newsgroups on the internet, the Wiccan opinion seems to be "It's not as bad as
we feared."
[This appeared in the 5/9/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Holy Man (1998)
Birthdays often cause individuals to access their lives. Are we doing what we
want to be doing? What happened to our dreams? With the new millennium, our
collective big birthday, just around the corner, some people are sensing a
certain dissatisfaction with their existence.
The old standbys of traditional religion and science aren't doing it for many
anymore and they're looking for something else. We'll be seeing more and more
films with a metaphysical theme over the next few years.
Ricky Hayman (Jeff Goldblum) is having a career crisis. The programming
director for the Good Buy Home Shopping Network, he's going to be fired unless
sales increase dramatically . New producer Kate Newell (Kelly Preston) is
supposed to whip things into shape.
When the two are fixing a flat, they almost run down new age pilgrim "G"
(Murphy). G wanders onto the television set and connects with the viewers by
telling them that they don't really want all that commercial crap. In some
unexplained manner, this causes sales to sour. Ricky is saved.
The movie tries to be too much at once and fails at it all. It's not an
over-the-top comedy or a heart-warming message of humanity. It _is_ a
mish-mosh of poorly directed scenes made even worse by insipid dialog.
I am willing to put up with preaching from a film, but the messages here are
old hat. You should take time to smell the roses. Selling your soul for cash
is a bad idea. Golly. I'm glad I saw the movie. I never would have thought of these.
The opportunity to poke fun at the goofy products is mostly missed. When G
takes a chainsaw to the set, there's an obvious chance for Murphy to be
hilarious. It doesn't happen. The bits are so subdued and overly-long that
there's only a hint of laughter from the audience.
Murphy has changed his roles in recent years and not for the better. There are
hints of promise in this one. The only time the film picks up even a little is
when his shaved-headed character in the long flowing white caftan shows up on screen.
The others are horrendous. Goldblum has episodes of brilliance in his career,
but here he seems to have been replaced with a lifeless pod from his "Invasion
Of The Body Snatchers". His relationship with Kate makes no sense. They move
from antagonism to love somewhere off screen. Preston is as uninteresting as
she could possibly be.
Somewhere hidden deep inside of this film is about ten minutes of value. An
attempt to satirize stupid television, we get a self-parody instead.
[This appeared in the 10/15/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Arrival, The (1996)
Starting off the summer's science fiction onslaught, Charlie Sheen stars in a
quasi-intelligent fifties-retro alien invasion conspiracy. (How many oxymorons
can you find in that sentence?) 
Sheen is a nerdish radio astronomer in the SETI (Search For Extraterrestrial
Intelligence) program and spends most of his time sitting around awaiting
signals that would indicate sentient beings out there.  It's a lonely life
until one night the indicators go off the scale.
Sheen takes the tape to his superior (Ron Silver) who dismisses it, fires him
and destroys the tape. The conspiracy begins and the plot thickens. When our
hero's co-worker meets an untimely demise shortly after G-Men types confiscate
all the data, it's certain that there's something going on and we don't know
what it is.
In a surprise to no one, Sheen obsessively takes on the mystery. The
investigation takes him to Mexico in some of the best and heavily textured
scenes in the film. Here he runs into a scientist (Lindsay Crouse) also on a
quest: hers, to find the cause of localized global warming.
This is not an effects film but they are good enough, if not spectacular.
Suitably alien aliens and a spectacular underground building work well and
even the goofy copper ball weapon isn't dumb enough to wreck the tale.
The movie is an updated version of about a zillion B films from 35 years ago.
Evil aliens invade to take over the earth. One man finds out and has to defeat
them by himself. The ETs conspire to stop him. He discovers the one thing that
will defeat them (germs, light, electricity or ...) Sheen's speech to the
intruders at the finale is copied from every second-rate sf film of that time.
Oddly enough this is an asset, not a problem although the movie does have its
defects. It seems to take forever for the story to come together. The science
is a bit shaky. The most disappointing is that fascinating characters (Crouse,
Sheen's girlfriend, his assistant, a street-wise black kid) show up only to
disappear and then re-appear later for just a few minutes, never staying
around long enough to fulfill their potential. 
Good fun, enough action for the short-attention-spaners and plenty of story.
[This appeared in the 6/6/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Meet Joe Black (1998)
What would you do if you were informed that you only have a very limited time
to live? This would be the ultimate life crisis. Some would spend their
remaining days putting their affairs in order to make life easier for their
families. Others would work on getting right with their god. Certainly some
would jump into that familiar river Denial and ignore the situation.
The most common answer is that one would do all those things that he had been
putting off. Tell a loved one how much she means to you. Express to your
friends the importance they've had in you life. Explain to your children the
lessons you've learned so maybe they won't have to make the same mistakes.
Visit Bali like you've always wanted to. Of course the reality that we all do
have only a limited time rarely sinks in and we continue in our work-a-day
world oblivious to the ticking of the countdown.
Media mogul William Parrish (Anthony Hopkins) is approaching his 65th birthday
and is sure he is about to die. He has it from the ultimate authority. Death,
himself, delivered the news over dinner.
Parrish's daughter Susan (Claire Forlani) has had better luck. Involved in a
loveless relationship with Drew (Jake Weber), a business partner of her
father's, she meets a handsome stranger (Brad Pitt) in a downtown coffee shop.
There's an instant connection and they almost drown in each other's eyes.
That evening, she's shocked to find the man at her family's table. Parrish
introduces him as "Joe Black", a new associate. Unbeknownst to the rest, Death
has taken over the young man's body to spend some time on earth and try to
discover what being human is all about. He and Parrish have a deal. The Grim
Reaper will delay harvesting him as long as he acts as tour guide to our reality.
What Joe doesn't count on is falling in love with Susan. Although the two
seemingly don't have much in common -- she's a doctor from a very wealthy
family, he's an immortal force of nature -- they find themselves drawn together.
Director Martin Brest ("Scent Of A Woman") has taken a potentially 
fascinating look at coming to grips with mortality and the nature of
supernatural beings and ignored what should have been the film's strong
points. Loosely based on the 1934 "Death Takes A Holiday", there's promise in
the concept but it doesn't deliver.
The film's biggest sin is its length. At three hours, the admittedly
satisfying ending comes about 60 minutes after it should have. Virtually every
scene goes on longer than it needs to. Entire sub-plots could have been
eliminated without detracting from the movie.
Mostly what Parrish does during his last days is defend his company from a
hostile takeover. Headed by Evan, his board of directors ousts him from the
firm and he must fight to regain control of the business he's built. The
corporate takeover doesn't add much to the story except a couple brief
witticisms about death and taxes.
As part of their deal, Parrish can't explain who Joe really is to his business
cronies. In the real world if a handsome young stud suddenly showed up
constantly hanging out with a rich older man and they both refused to tell
what was going on, there would be an obvious guess as to their relationship. I
was surprised that this suspicion was never voiced.
The movie is filled with one-trick ponies. Forlani plays Susan as a nervous
hesitant woman, especially in the love scenes with Bill. She does a great job
at it, but about the fifth time it happens, you'll find yourself impatiently
tapping your fingers on the armrest.
Pitt's Death is understandably an enigma, but one that makes little sense. At
times Joe is childlike. He doesn't know what food is about. He can't figure
out how to tie his tie. He can barely walk. Think Peter Sellers in "Being
There". At other times, he delivers the insights that you'd think an entity
who has spent forever observing mankind would have.
The relationship between Susan and Joe is occasionally touching, but not very
believable. After all, she is in love with the guy she met at the coffee shop,
not this unnatural being inhabiting his body. As clueless and cold as he is
when they meet again, it's difficult to understand what she sees in him.
There are some well-done bits.The last minute of Joe and Susan's first meeting
comes out of left field and is a great cinematic moment.
The one time that the overly long scene work is when Susan seduces Joe into
discovering the garden of earthly delights. It takes forever for them to
undress each other and it's a slow heat coming to a full burn. Forlani has an
offbeat beauty that can be enticing at one moment and uninviting at others.
Not happening to be of the sexual persuasion to fully appreciate Brad Pitt's
physical attributes, I can only mention the involuntary "oohs" and "aahs" from
the women in the audience when his shirt comes off.
Hopkins is wonderful and it might be worth seeing the film just for him. He's
a grand actor, but at times he seems to be in a room by himself, reacting to
things that we can't see.
The movie misses the boat. There are interesting ideas to explore. Susan's
older sister Allison (Marcia Gay Harden) has spent her life trying to please
her father. Her husband Quince (Jeffrey Tambor) is the most human of the bunch
but gets little screen time. Surely Parrish has something better to do after
finding out he's about to die besides spend his time in the boardroom. But
these aspects get slighted in favor of far too much time spent on corporate
wheelings and dealings and Joe and Susan who get dull fast.
After what seems to be five or six hours into the film, you'll begin to wonder
whether Death is coming for Bill Parrish or this movie.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and isn't answering
the door if there's a guy with a big scythe out there. Let Death contact him
at Redman@indepen.com like everyone else.)
[This appeared in the 11/19/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Ulee's Gold (1997)
This "small" film concerning the life a beekeeper in the Florida panhandle is
surprisingly enjoyable. The biggest surprise is that, as many people do, Peter
Fonda has become his father. At times he is the spitting image of his old man
with the same lean body, gaunt face and eccentric mannerisms.
Ulee Jackson (Fonda) is a Vietnam vet who has never recovered from his wife's
death several years ago and would like nothing more than to retire from the
world and spend his the rest of his life tending his bees and harvesting
Tupelo Honey. Because his estranged son Jimmy (Tom Wood) is in prison and his
daughter-in-law Helen (Christine Dunford) abandoned the family, Ulee is
raising his two granddaughters. He's doing the best he can in a situation that
he didn't create.
And things get worse. Jimmy calls to tell him that Helen is strung out and
staying with his former partners-in-crime in Orlando. She needs rescuing.
Ulee's existence is based on duty: to the bees, to his little girls and now to
Helen. He drives his pick-up to carry the unconscious woman back home.
The robbers are archetypal sleezoids and threaten the family unless Ulee comes
up with money that Jimmy kept from the robbery and hid in a swamp. Unlike
other directors, Victor Nunez doesn't go for the big gun shoot-em-up scenes.
The intimidation and threat of harm are readily apparent and create a tension,
but the only actual violence is realistically understated.
With the help of a nurse neighbor, he helps Helen through her cold turkey
while, at the same time, attempts to deal with the threats. His life of quiet
desperation has gotten a lot louder.
In many ways, it's easy to see Ulee as Fonda's "Easy Rider" Captain America as
he has gotten older. (Of course the fact that the character was killed at the
end of that generation-defining film makes it a bit difficult for this to be
fact.) In that film, he was a loner looking for America, now he is a loner
looking for his soul.
Very different from the vast majority of the summer cinema fare, this is a
breath of fresh air. Don't expect any explosions or bug-eyed aliens, but
you'll find a glimpse into the inner workings of a human being.
[This appeared in the 7/24/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]
-- 
mailto:mredman@bvoice.com

Title
Review for Battlefield Earth (2000)
Battlefield long, boring and just plain stupid
In my mid-teen years, I had a horrendous re-occurring nightmare. Behind
the wheel of a car, I was driving down a straight road in the middle of
a desert. No scenery except the horizon line and the converging parallel
lines of the highway. No matter what I did, the view didn't change:
travelling but not getting anywhere. Each time I awoke in a sweat, terrified.
You don't have to be Carl Jung to understand that dream. Powerless to
make changes, trapped in a boring situation with no hope of rescue, this
is the stuff of nightmares whether we are asleep or awake.
This is exactly how you will feel 15 minutes after "Battlefield Earth"
begins. For all of its flash and style, L. Ron Hubbard's science fiction
epic is the earliest and best entry for the dullest summer film of 2000.
Dull "and" stupid.
In the year 3000, the Psychlo aliens have ruled our planet for 1,000
years. Humans either work as slave labor in mining operations or live as
barbarians. There's no hope. The future is bleak.
Then the Psychlo make a mistake and capture feisty Jonnie Goodboy Tyler
(Barry Pepper) who organizes a revolution against Chief Of Security Terl
(John Travolta) and the alien race.
It's an archetypal post-apocalyptic plot full of promise. Considering
some of the talent involved and all the millions thrown at the screen,
it's difficult to see how it could have failed so miserably. But it does.
The story is so full of holes that it falls apart within minutes of the
opening credits. Are we really supposed to believe that after a
millennium of looking for gold, the Psychlo never discovered Fort Knox?
Or that fighter planes are still in pristine condition after all that
time -- and gassed up? Or that the cavemen become such expert pilots in
seven days that they can easily down the advanced alien ships? Or that
the Psychlo spy cameras somehow don't notice that their slaves are
missing for days?
Travolta prances across the screen hamming it up for all he's worth and
is almost entertaining. Almost. The rest of the actors are wooden
mannequins trying not to laugh while delivering lines that no person --
"man-animal" or not -- would ever utter.
Some of the film _looks_ good, but it also looks so familiar. A race of
large hulking ape-like creatures has taken over the world while our
cities lie in ruin. Sound like something Charlton Heston might be in?
The Psychlo look like overweight Klingons in gear from "Dune". The final
air battle between the Air Force fighters and the Psychlo ships in their
high-tech city is something George Lucas might have been associated with.
It's too loud. It's too oppressive. It's too slow. It's too long...far
too long. And on it goes. The list of the problems with "Battlefield
Earth" is endless. It's difficult to find anything in the film that does work.
The real question is how this movie ever got made. Could it have
something to do with the fact that L. Ron Hubbard was the founder of
Scientology? And that John Travolta is a member of the church.
That might explain why Travolta bought the rights to the novel years
ago. But it doesn't give us a clue as to why first-time screenwriter
Corey Mandell's atrocious script was used. Or why the high-profile
project was entrusted with Roger Christian who had never before directed
a major film.
Or why no one looked at this thing before it was released and realized
there might be problems.
The one bright spot is that no longer will Kevin Costner's "The Postman"
(which I begrudgingly admit as a guilty pleasure) be "the" big budget
science fiction failure. "Battlefield Earth" has the honor sewed up.
Often reviewers will recommend that you skip mediocre films and wait for
the video. That's not the case here. You can act now and make the
decision to not see it on the big screen or on the small one. Don't
hesitate. Strike now while the iron is cold.
(Michael Redman has written this column since before this novel was
published and he's still not a Scientologist. Send tales of religious
science fiction experiences to redman@bluemarble.net.)
[This appeared in the 5/15/2000 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bluemarble.net.]
-- 
mailto:redman@bluemarble.net
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Pushing Tin (1999)
Competition is one of the almighty forces in the universe. In the course of
human affairs it ranks up there with gravity, nuclear fission and sex.
When I was a kid, we were told that competition was the main difference
between communism and capitalism. We had it, they didn't and because of that,
their economic system was doomed to failure. Plus they were godless which was
almost, but not quite as bad.
Competition is what drives wars. For 50 years the Soviet Union wanted to be
King Of The World as did the United States. Oddly enough for a non-competitive
country they were as aggressive as we were.
Competition causes men and women to do weird stuff. It's behind the macho and
catty attitudes. It's why people can be remarkably stupid in the presence of
the opposite sex. It causes individuals to cheat, lie and steal to get ahead
in their careers.
It's also one of the reasons that some perform at their peak and do
extraordinary work.
Nick "The Zone" Falzone (John Cusack) is a competitive guy. And he's the best.
An air traffic controller at the New York Terminal Radar Approach Control, he
guides planes at three major airports with rapid fire commands.
It's a frantic job. The facility controls 7,000 flights a day. Controllers are
responsible for thousands of lives a day. Sitting at radar scopes, they are
one with the electronic images. They stare through the screen into a virtual
3-D world with the same concentration that teenage video game players possess.
After work, they play with the same intensity. Drinking, flirting in cafes,
shooting hoops, catching a quickie with their wives: everything is fast and furious.
Nick's life is good. In the small town of Controllerville, he's top dog.
Until, that is, a new gun moves in. Russell Bell (Billy Bob Thornton) shoves
aside the chair on rollers, pulls up his own folding chair, sticks a feather
in his hair and gazes into the scope with a Zen-like serenity.
Russell is a wonder, stacking up planes like no one has seen before. He shows
up Nick. Even worse, he does it without breaking a sweat. He effortlessly
bests Nick's free throw record at a barbecue. All the wives are agog in the
presence of the mysterious stranger. Nick is fueled by caffeine and
adrenaline. Russell is a smooth as silk.
Nick can't stand it and begins his search for a way to win the rivalry. Soon
his paranoia takes over and he starts to lose it. Is Russell playing the
one-upmanship game or is he just who he is?
The actors are first rate. Cusack masters his quirky obsessed character and
makes it seem as easy as rolling off a log. Thornton retains his impressive
presence he's shown in other films and captivates the screen.
The women are equally skilled although they don't get as much screen time.
Cate Blanchett is Nick's wife Connie, a middle class floosie with a look of
intelligence behind her eyes. There isn't a second you don't believe that's
who she is. Her performance is particularly impressive when you realize this
is the same woman who played a completely different role in "Elizabeth".
Angelina Jolie, as Russell's child bride Mary, is the film's hot babe. When
she struts through a backyard party, leather-clad, pouty-lipped and exhibiting
abundant cleavage, the men are speechless. She and Nick have dinner in an
Italian restaurant after he chances upon her crying in a supermarket. While
they are talking, she slowly tastes one of her fingers and his fidelity is a
lost cause.
Mary is the woman that every man would like to meet - until they discover the
foundation of her personal food pyramid is vodka.
The film has dozens of sub-plots maneuvered like the tiny blips on radar,
lining up one after another. Although most glide to smooth landings, some
meander around and eventually crash into the Atlantic. The individual scenes
are well crafted, but a few don't work together.
The story's weakness is the ending. Not completely unsatisfying, it still
feels out of synch with the rest of the movie. Like many films recently, it
could have ended about ten minutes earlier.
(Michael Redman has written film columns since before the invention of
moveable type and thinks he's going to take the train on his next trip. Email
tales of air adventure to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 4/26/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for True Crime (1999)
We'd like for our heroes to be saints. In the complexity of our world, it
would be wonderful if something were simple. We want the good guys to gallop
up, wear white hats, rescue fair damsels, always tell the truth and fight for
truth, justice and the American way. The ability to leap tall buildings in a
single bound is a bonus we expect.
Of course it's not always like that. In truth, it's probably never like that.
Bill Clinton is demonized because he had an affair with a younger woman.
Picasso often wasn't a pleasant person. John Lennon was criticized after a
drunken night in a bar. Kurt Vonnegut can be a grouch.
Obsession sometimes leads to excellent work, but it doesn't necessarily lead
to "nice."
"Oakland Tribune" editor-in-chief Alan Mann (James Woods) puts it best when he
describes Steve Everett (Clint Eastwood) as an [expletive deleted] but a great
reporter. Everett isn't an admirable guy. He keeps getting kicked off of
newspapers for sleeping with the editors' wives and daughters. He doesn't have
much time for his family. He's an alcoholic, just two months sober. He ignores
his boss's orders. Worst of all, he smokes in the office.
When a woman assigned to write a human interest article about an execution is
killed in a car wreck, Everett's editor Bob Findley (Denis Leary) phones his
own wife to locate him. Luckily he was there, next to her.
Everett is known for going overboard on his stories and Findley warns him that
they just want a puff piece. A couple of minutes after receiving the
assignment, the reporter decides that something is wrong and he's going to
find out what it is.
Frank Beachum (Isaiah Washington) is scheduled to be put to death in 12 hours
so Everett doesn't have much time.
Although the film resorts to a number of time-worn devices, it's done with
style. There's a clock counting down the minutes, but fortunately it not a red
digital one superimposed in the corner of the screen. It's fairly obvious that
Beachum is innocent. The action is intense in the last few minutes. These are
formulaic but the audience is on the edge of their seats despite it all.
The reporter and the convict have a lot in common but they are completely
different. Everett's estranged relationship with his wife and daughter is
directly contrasted with the warmth exhibited when Beachum's wife and daughter
visit the condemned man.
Eastwood has become known for taking chances during recent years. He doesn't
shoot anyone here, but he's not a kinder gentler Dirty Harry. Everett is a
jerk, but he's our hero. Eastwood isn't afraid to display his character or his
own weaknesses. Although he's in good shape, a nude scene for a man in his
sixties shows courage.
Some of the best bits are between Eastwood and Woods. The characters are
buddies, both with respect for a good story. When Mann is chewing Everett out
for sleeping with Findley's wife, he asks several times how she was. During a
showdown between the three newspaper men, Mann dismisses the rules-and-regs
Findley and sides with the rogue.
Early in the film when Everett is told of the female reporter's death, he says
the right words: "I was just with her yesterday." "That's too bad." But
there's no hint of feeling behind them. What at first appears to be poor
acting is actually an insight into his personality. There appears to be no
emotion because there is no emotion.
He's a hard man. Everett explains to Beachum that all he has is his nose for
news. Without that he is nothing. He has given up his personal life for his obsession.
Like a number of films, the major problem is the last five minutes. Eastwood
had me in the palm of his hand with the well-constructed film until he decided
to put a bow around it. The film could end just before Everett goes toy
shopping. If Eastwood had abandoned the feel-good finish, it would have been a
much more powerful experience.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and admits a certain
admiration for obsession. Email confessions of your obsessions to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 3/25/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Sphere (1998)
Underwater science fiction stays submerged
One of the most unpleasant experiences that can occur in a movie theater is
when a cast of fine actors end up in a film that wastes their talents. You
keep thinking what they might have accomplished with the time they squandered.
Psychologist Norman Goodman (Dustin Hoffman) is called to the middle of the
Pacific Ocean to work with the survivors of a plane crash. When he arrives at
the site, he discovers that there is no plane, but rather an enormous
spacecraft that has been sitting 1,000 feet below the surface for almost 300 years.
Having written a paper for the Bush administration on how to handle first
contact, he is chosen to head up the team of scientists investigating the 
ship. His group as outlined in his report, consists of Beth Halperin (Sharon
Stone), a biochemist; Harry Adams (Samuel L. Jackson), a mathematician; and
Ted Fielding (Liev Schreiber), an astrophysicist.
Unfortunately it turns out that the writing was a blow-off project for Goodman
who did it for the money and named his then-colleagues to the team. "After
all," he explains, "who reads government documents?"
Lead by Harold Barnes (Peter Coyote), a top secret federal operative, the
group descends to a mobile undersea headquarters set up next to the alien
vessel. Once there they stroll over, knock on the door and explore the
still-operational UFO. Discovering the surprising origin of the ship and the
crew finds an astonishing gigantic golden liquid metal sphere. When Adams
enters the sphere, the weirdness unfolds.
A storm rolls in on the surface and the team is forced to remain below just as
an unseen presence begins to communicate through their computer. "My name is
Jerry. I am happy" flashes across the screen. This is unsettling for the
psychologist. "What happens if Jerry gets mad?" he asks. Barnes is more
pragmatic: he needs a last name because he can't put in his report that they
made contact with an alien named Jerry.
Then the situation turns bad. Deadly beasts appear from nowhere. A gang of
jellyfish kills one of the Navy personnel. Lethal sea snakes attack Goodman. A
giant squid batters the habitat just as Adams is reading "20,000 Leagues Under
The Sea". The suspicious scientists turn against each other.
This has all the makings of a first-rate thinking man's science fiction film.
However even the finest ingredients don't go very far in the hands of a chief
who doesn't seem to care about his product. Director Barry Levinson has
churned out a mish-mosh that doesn't engage the audience beyond a few skillful
suspense scenes.
The first of the film zooms by as the situation and players are introduced
without any characterization or justification. It's much like speed-reading a
novel and realizing that you missed the nuances. It doesn't get any better
when the action scenes begin.
While the actors do an adequate job with their limited roles, the people are
still flat. Oddly they hardly have reactions when deaths occur around them.
After Adams experiences the interior of the sphere, no one bothers to ask him
what happened. Their history together is an intriguing plot device but is
barely exploited. Even Goodman and Halperin's ill-conceived affair when she
was his student is just mentioned in passing. Her psychotic tendencies are
talked about but never convincing.
There's a truism that items shown early in a movie must be used before the
ending, but here they are far too obvious. When an emergency mini-sub is
explained, you know what's going to happen.
The movie affectations are nothing more than distracting. Chapter headings
that divide the movie have no function. The shaky camera work muddies already
perplexing chaos. Much of what goes on is confusing and difficult to follow.
Although some of the disorientation eventually is understandable, a great deal
of it isn't.
Even a science fiction film must be internally consistent. There's too much
here that doesn't make sense. Are the manifestations real? The jellyfish kill
Queen Latifa (in a throw-away role) and the squid nearly destroys the outpost,
but the bites of the fatal snakes have no effect. A scene in the sub suggests
that it's illusion, but earlier episodes indicate that it's not.
Not everything has to be explained to death, but there are major questions
that the film never answers. Where the ship came from is clarified, but how it
ended up on the ocean floor in 1709 is merely alluded to. Even the enigmatic
sphere is still mysterious when the credits roll.
The climax is followed by 15 minutes of epilogue that does little but weaken
the already labored tale. After pre-release audience testing, the actors were
called back to re-shoot the ending. It's difficult to imagine how the original
could have been worse.
Following the recent tradition of lengthy films, this weighs in at over two
very long hours. The weak scenes could have been cut, but then there wouldn't
have been much left. The movie was supposedly held up by effects work, but
there's nothing special on the screen. We never even see the monstrous squid
or the menacing storm. Stealing from "Alien", "The Abyss" and the disastrous
"Event Horizon", this film has learned nothing from them.
Remarkably Levinson and Hoffman's other currently showing film is "Wag The
Dog", a smart and entertaining piece of work. This one could have been titled
the same sans one word.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and is amazed that
the Wild Raccoons Party Mardi is next week. It seems like only a year since
the last one. Redman@bvoice.com is the magical electronic eaddress.)
[This appeared in the 2/19/98 "Bloomington Voice" Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Flubber (1997)
Robin Williams is a comedic genus. That is, he is one when he's in a film that
allows him space to move. "Flubber" straps him in a straitjacket, covers him
with duct tape, stuffs him in a coat closet and piles furniture against the
door to make sure that he doesn't get out.
In a re-make of its own 1961 "Absent Minded Professor", Disney offers us proof
that more is definitely less. Recycling old films ("That Darned Cat", "101
Dalmatians") dressed up as new is the newest money machine from the home of
the mouse that roared.
Professor Phillip Brainard (Williams) is a terminally forgetful scientist
teaching at a small college. His fiancee, Sara Jean Reynolds (Marcia Gay
Harden), president of the college is none too happy with him because he's left
her waiting at the altar due to his lack of short-term -- and long-term --
memory. She's giving him one more chance.
He blows that chance when he invents "flubber" (FLying rUBBER) and is so
excited by his discovery that Sara Jean is once again awaiting him in her
white dress. His tardiness is helped along by his jealous flying robotic
assistant who wants him all to herself.
It's not all bad news. Flubber is a green jello that can magnify and reflect
energy that is applied to it. Brainard realizes the commercial potential
within the goo can save the school from bankruptcy and being taken over by the
town's evil industrialist Charles Hoenicker (Raymond Barry).
While he's busy with his new breakthrough, the slighted sweetheart is being
wooed by his sleazy rival Wilson Croft (Christopher McDonald). There's a
flying car, flubber-enhanced basketball game and an assortment of broken lab
equipment: none of which are the least bit interesting or funny. At one point,
my son looked around the audience and asked "Why are these people laughing?"
Although Williams turns in one of his least inspired roles, he is easily the
most lively of the actors. Everyone else comes across as half-asleep. The
re-make is successful in that respect. It feels like a bad Disney movie from
the sixties. I remember the original as being charming, but my guess is that
the memory from almost four decades ago has been artificially enhanced by the years.
There have been some updates. Fred MacMurray's flying Model T has been
replaced by a T-Bird. His faithful dog Charlie is now "Weebo", the hovering
robot. The biggest change is that, with sophisticated computer animation, we
now can have films show off special effects without being at all entertaining.
Flubber is anthropomorphized into a being supposedly with personality. The
gloop has little arms and legs and splits into tiny little gloopettes for a
big dance number. This has nothing to do with the story. The only possible
reason is to create merchandising opportunities so that kids can badger their
parents into taking them to McDonalds for the toys.
Not that contributing little to the plot is a big problem. There are very few
aspects of the film that move the story and those that do don't make sense.
The discovery of flubber is going to save the college because Brainard can
sell his flying car to Ford. Anyone with half a brain would be able to see
that his intelligent flying automaton is worth billions.
It's unbelievable that his lover (well, probably not a lover -- after all this
is Disney) starts dating Croft after the aborted wedding. There's not one
appealing component of this man.
After the professor discovers that smearing a golf ball with the gunk causes
it to bounce uncontrollably around his lab wreaking havoc, I cringed as he
picked up a bowling ball. This guy is beyond forgetful, venturing into the certifiable.
Co-writer John Hughes used to direct light-weight but thoughtful teen films.
The care behind "Pretty In Pink" and "The Breakfast Club" all went out the
window after his "Home Alone" franchise heated up the box offices. Looking
much like "Home Alone 3 1/2", "Flubber" even features a couple of vapid goons
who get banged around and a cute little boy who screams a lot.
In some ways, it's difficult to judge this film. I have a suspicion that I'm
not it's target audience. After all, I measure my age in two digits.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 22 years and can't believe
that there are only some unspecific number of shopping days before all those
holidays that fall on December 25. Email gift ideas to redman@bvoice.com)
[This appeared in the 12/10/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at redman@bvoice.com ]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Chain Reaction (1996)
For some reason director Andrew Davis decided to remake his own movie
"The Fugitive" and had the brainstorm to cast Keanu Reeves in the
Harrison Ford role. This must be why he's making the big bucks out in
Hollywood while the rest of us are slaving away for peanuts.
Eddie Kasalivich, a nice Chicago boy genius, is a grad student techie
working on the mysterious Hydrogen Energy Project (mysterious partially
because the science doesn't make much sense) when things start to go a
little wrong. Immediately after they finally get the thing to work, the
chief scientist is murdered and the project blows up, leveling eight
blocks of the Windy City. Of course Eddie is on the run from the FBI
because they think he is selling secrets to whoever our enemy is
nowadays, but it's really the one-armed man...no, wait, that's the other
film.
Blazing through this non-start adventure film, Reeves looks as
uninvolved as possible, which appears to be the extent of his acting
ability. There are a few good scenes -- the explosion in Chicago is well
done, although you've seen that on the previews already -- but most of
the so-called action scenes will leave you begging for less. The ice
boat on the frozen lake sequence is a masterpiece of bad logic,
implausibility and poor cinematography.
As various organizations join the chase, the main theme of the film
becomes which governmental agency is the most evil: the Chicago Cops,
the FBI, the CIA or the CIA Front. Morgan Freeman is the best bad
guy/good guy  (Fred Ward is definitely not Tommy Lee Jones) owing at
least partially to his god-like voice. Although Freeman takes his
character as far as possible, we're just talking a short drive in the
country.
Davis says that the film was made up as they went along. I believe it.
Of all the "Destroy The Cities" films out this summer, this is one that
should have been saved for the late show along with the Godzilla movies.
[This appeared in "The Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana, 8/8/96.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Metro (1997)
Eddie Murphy=92s latest comedy action film owes much of its commercial
appeal to his previous "48 Hours". Unfortunately director Thomas Carter
and writer Randy Feldman seem to have forgotten that the earlier movie
not only had a plot, but had at least a few scenes that were not
time-worn cliches.
Murphy is police hostage negotiator Roper who forms an arch-enemy
relationship with a sadistic psycho played by Michael Wincott. Although
the two turn in more than adequate performances, as does girlfriend
Carmen Ejogo and partner Michael Rapaport, the story goes where _every_
cop buddy movie has gone before.
The story was so predictable that I found myself in a time warp,
watching the film ten minutes beyond what was on the screen. When
Roper=92s older police mentor goes into an apartment building to "just
talk" to a suspect and tells Murphy to wait in the car because it=92s no
big deal, you know what=92s about to happen. After the inevitable, Murphy=
wants to track down the killer and is ordered off the case by his boss.
What do you think he does?
Early in the film, streetwise tough guy Roper is assigned a white
partner with no experience but lots of book learning. Ever seen this
before? Wincott escapes from jail eager for vengeance and Roper and
girlfriend are about to leave for a vacation when she goes back to her
apartment alone. You can guess the next plot development.
There are so many plot lines that are not followed up that I suspect
there are five films on the cutting room floor where these scenes made
sense. The cop pals spend an afternoon at a race track for some reason.
Ejogo=92s boyfriend makes a brief appearance and then vanishes.
Murphy=92s performance makes the movie watchable. Miraculously he is able=
to wring some freshness out of most tired scenes by his over-the-top
persona. Looking leaner and meaner than in past films, he does a
commendable job in the dramatic role. Rapaport turns in a decent job,
but his character is underused and goes nowhere.
Like all good cop films, there are car chases and explosions aplenty.
After the popular chase sequences in "Bullet", every action movie filmed
in San Francisco has an obligatory high-speed-flying-through-the-air
spectacle through the city of hills. Here we are treated to that sight
so many times that it bores rather than thrills.
There is an out of control cable car chase that is more interesting and
features a unique method of applying the brakes to the picturesque means
of transportation. The scene would have been even more exciting if it
had an hour or two trimmed from it.
[This appeared in the 1/23/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
"The Phantom Menace" is possibly the most anticipated film of the last 50
years. "Star Wars" has transcended cinema to become one of the world's
mythologies. Obi-Wan Kenobi may not be more popular than Jesus Christ, but
he's giving him a run for his money.
For the two people who don't know, here's the Cliff Notes. This film
takes place a few decades before the first Star Wars movie. Obi-Wan
Kenobi (now Ewan McGregor) is a young Jedi apprentice to master Qui-Gon Jinn
(Liam Neeson). The two are dispatched to the planet Naboo which is being
blockaded by the Trade Federation. There they meet teen queen Amidala (Natalie
Portman) and amphibian Jar Jar Binks (played by a computer program).
Then they make a stop on Tatooine and encounter Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd),
a slave boy exceptionally strong in the Force and destined to become Darth
Vader. The bad guys are Sith Lords Darth Sidious and Darth Maul. There are
lots of light saber battles, weird creatures and space ships.
First of all: yes, it's great fun. The effects are magnificent, the best of
their type ever seen. A phenomenal high-tech hot rod race is guaranteed to
wake up the dead.  The battle between Darth Maul and the two Jedi is the most
stunning yet. The eye candy is beyond reproach. Forget the popcorn. Forget the
cokes. Forget the restroom. Don't take your eyes off the screen.
It's strange watching the first part of a story you know the ending to. When
young Skywalker's mother tells her son to go with the Jedi and live his dream,
you can almost hear a deep voice saying "To rule the universe."
As usual, director George Lucas cobbles together pieces of various cultures to
create an eerie but familiar atmosphere. When hordes of faceless droids under
the command of the Trade Federation Viceroy with an Asian accent attack the
peace-loving orange-robed inhabitants of Naboo, it feels like an intergalactic
re-enactment of the Chinese invasion of Tibet.
But then there's the rest of the movie.
Acting has never been the strong point of the "Star Wars" films. Mark Hamill
worked well as Luke Skywalker, but if you want to judge his acting skills,
take a look at the Marsh commercials.
It's especially disappointing in "Phantom Menace" because of the caliber of
actors. Neeson is remarkably flat. Samuel Jackson in a cameo as a Jedi master
is horrendous. Darth Maul seems to exist primarily to sell action figures.
There is an odd emotional distance to the movie. It's telling that the only
character who shows much humanity is the computer-generated alien Jar Jar.
There's no one the audience can identify with. The Jedi are too squeaky clean;
the villains, too dastardly and the kid, too damned cute. Where's Han Solo
when you need him?
There are flaws with the story. The Force is a mystical energy. Attempting to
explain it away with scientific babble is a bone-headed mistake. Too many
things happen by happy accident. The attack droids fall over at the slightest
provocation and are terrible shots. You know how the battles are going to turn
out: the good guys win.
Or do they? The major problem with the plot is that a very important element
isn't clear. Exactly who or what is the "phantom menace" is guesswork. The
relationship between the future Emperor and another character is key to
understanding what is going on and that relationship is only hinted at.
Revealed in the "Star Wars" novels, but not in the film, this knowledge
completely changes what the film is about.
Having said all of that, I'm going to make a confession and the first few
words of the next paragraph will forever brand me as an unrepentant fanboy.
Watching the film the second time a few days later, all of my problems with it
melted away. Jar Jar became enjoyable rather than annoying. Having figured out
the relationship mentioned above, the movie was much more intricate.
Expectations gone, I could settle back and have a great time.
Despite numerous flaws, it's still "Star Wars" and I was a kid again. That's
good enough for me.
(Darth Redman has written this column since before the first "Star Wars". He
considering starting to re-live his own prequel.)
[This appeared in the 5/27/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Message in a Bottle (1999)
Is this bottle half full or half empty?
Shutting down after a personal tragedy is not an uncommon occurrence. Our
lives are on automatic. We sleepwalk through the day with emotions flatlined.
Some people work through grief and eventually move on. Others cling to the
catastrophe and continue the rest of their days with only memories. Their
present is the past: a comfortable but lonely place to live.
Garret Blake (Kevin Costner) has mourned the death of his wife Catherine for
two years and can't get beyond his guilt of not being the perfect husband.
He's given up on his dreams and writes messages to Catherine, rolled up in
bottles and tossed into the sea.
On a run along the beach, recently divorced Theresa Osborne (Robin Wright
Penn) finds one of his bottles. The words are so poetic and heart-felt that
she has to find the author.
As you might expect, when she does locate him in North Carolina's Outer Banks,
she is instantly captivated and his feelings begin to awaken. (In real life
the odds of it being Kevin Costner are just about as great as an anonymous
emailer turning out to be Meg Ryan.)
The film is infuriatingly uneven. The injured souls' romance is believable and
touching. Their hesitancy in getting involved is poignant. But just when the
story grabs you, it shifts gears.
Theresa's boss and co-workers at the "Chicago Tribune" are dull yet eat up
screen time. Garret's fight with his former in-laws doesn't contribute much.
It feels like padding for an already overly-long film.
One of the biggest sins is a far-too-common plot device. When Theresa first
encounters the man of her dreams, she doesn't tell him the true story of why
they meet. After they become involved, it's too late. She's waiting for the
right moment to confess and, of course, it never comes.
The audience knows that he's going to find out, get angry and leave her. 
Unfortunately the film takes its sweet time getting there and most of the
intervening scenes are lost as viewers anticipate the inevitable.
This film is designed to appeal primarily to women. The bitter-sweet romance
is a tear-jerker with a red sun shimmering in the background against an orange
sunset, sailing ships on the high seas and lovers under a starry sky as
strings swell on the soundtrack. They spend their first few nights in bed just
holding each other. I have it on good authority that women like this kind of stuff.
Oddly enough for one of my particular gender, I usually enjoy "women's films."
However this one has an inexcusable flaw. The ending, out of left field, is
cinematic manipulation at its worst. The filmmakers take a convenient easy way
out just to pull at the heartstrings.
Costner is one of my guilty pleasures, but his character here mostly just
mopes. Penn is difficult to get a grasp on. She plays a strong enticingly
beautiful woman but her habit of leaving sentences unfinished and filling in
with giggles is less than endearing.
Paul Newman as Dodge, Garret's crusty dad, is a treat. The old codger could be
Hank Stamper, his role years ago in "Sometimes A Great Notion", slightly more
mellow and relocated to another coast. Newman and Costner work well as father
and son. Sometimes you'll wish that the movie were about _their_ relationship.
(Michael Redman has written this column for well over 23 years and as you are
reading this, is probably still sleeping off the Wild Raccoons Party Mardi.
Email wake-up calls to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 2/17/99 "Bloomington Indpendent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Almost Famous (2000)
Nostalgia, as the old saw goes, isn't what it used to be. Now that the
Boomers are aging, albeit as slowly as they possibly can, the country's
youthful memories are of sex, drugs and rock and roll. Certainly much more
interesting than Ozzie and Harriet.
Writer and Director Cameron Crowe's young years were what we aspired to in
our teenage years. If we couldn't be rock and roll stars, we wanted to be
rock and roll journalists. Now we can live them vicariously.
Fueled by his sister's legacy of albums left to him when she escaped home,
15 year old William Miller (a thinly-disguised Crowe played by Patrick
Fugit) wrangles a writing assignment from "Rolling Stone" magazine. He's to
tour with the bluesy grunge band Stillwater and it's everything you would
imagine rock journalism to be in the early seventies.
William falls into it all head over heels. With stars in his eyes, he can't
quite figure out how to write his story. He likes these guys, but how can he
tell the truth and not make them hate him?
Crowe does a commendable job of bringing his characters to life. Even the
jerks are real people who turn out not to be totally evil at all. Billy
Crudup as guitarist Russell and Fugit both are the real deal. Frances
McDormand is great as William's eccentric rock-hating mother. Philip Seymour
Hoffman chews up the screen as critic Lester "Rock Is Dead" Bangs from
"Creem" magazine.
But the soul of rock and this film is embodied by 16 year old Penny Lane
(Goldie Hawn's daughter Kate Hudson). The leader of the groupies make that
"Band Aids", Penny _is_ what rock and roll is all about.
If the early seventies had an "it" girl, she would be it. A combination of a
Greek muse and a teenage boy's wet dream, she doesn't walk, she dances and
skips and floats. She doesn't talk, she oozes poetry and life. She is the
memory of the girl every guy wanted...and probably still does.
The film works well. As it finds its way towards the end, it falters some,
dragging now and then. But then miraculously life is resurrected for an
improbable but tasty ending.
(And those who didn't become rock journalists, reviewed films. Email your
tales of early seventies decadence to redman@bluemarble.net.)
[This appeared in the 9/21/2000 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bluemarble.net.]
-- 
mailto:redman@bluemarble.net
Film reviews archive: 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Michael+Redman

Title
Review for L.A. Confidential (1997)
The most difficult aspect of talking about "L.A. Confidential" is knowing
where to begin. The film is thick with subplots come together to create a
smart complex film that is one of the best police movies in recent years.
The City Of Angels of 1953 is one of police brutality, a clandestine attempt
to take over the city's crime world and the heavenly bodies are working girls.
When a chief mob figure is jailed, his lieutenants are mysteriously and
violently eliminated as someone is making major moves into his territory.
When what appears to be a robbery gone bad at the Nite Owl Cafe results in a
six-person massacre, it becomes apparent that things are not what they appear
to be. A crooked ex-cop is a victim in the killings and it looks like his
murder may have wide-spread implications.
Three officers become involved in the investigation from three distinctly
different directions. Ed Exley (Guy Pearce) is a by-the-books new-look
policeman complete with eyeglasses and a dapper look. He's so clean that he
rats out others in the squad when they engage in beatings of jailed Mexicans.
Bud White (Russell Crowe) is at first glance his exact opposite. He's not
above breaking some bones to get the co-operation that he needs even if his
victim is tied to a chair. 
Jack Vincennes (Kevin Spacey) is an attention-hungry media conscious operator.
His deal with a tabloid reporter (Danny DeVito) who tips him off to nefarious
activities in exchange for first-hand photos goes hand-in-hand with his
position as advisor to the television program "Badge Of Honor" which closely
resembles "Dragnet".
None of these characters are as simple as they first appear. Good boy Exley is
not above manipulating situations for advancement in his rapid rising career.
Mad dog White is particularly aggressive towards criminals who harm women.
They both learn a thing or two when forced to work together. The interaction
between the two of them and Kim Bassinger's character is right on target when
it looks at the strangeness that exists in the attraction between men and women.
The supporting cast doesn't fare quite so well as complex characters. The
millionaire who runs a stable of movie star look-alike call girls is the
personification of sleaze. Bassinger as one of his prostitutes is the
proverbial whore with a heart of gold. DeVito's "journalist" is played almost
entirely for dark comedy.
Director Curtis Hanson has done a commendable job of turning James Ellroy's
1990 almost-500 page novel into a coherent film. You need to pay attention but
it all makes sense. Converting a novel into a movie is a daunting task. Doing
this one could have resulted in a five hour film, but it feels as if nothing
were lost.
The film begs to be compared to "Chinatown". Although "L.A. Confidential"
would rank in second-best in a contest, it is one of the few that could even
come close. The noir pulp approach works well with one exception.
If I were King Of The Known Universe and had control over all films, I would
have made different choices in lighting. The sets are sharp, the
cinematography excellent, but most of the time everything looks lighted with
about 20 spotlights. For a film drenched in darkness, there is a tremendous
amount of brightness.
Look for this movie to pick up a number of little statues come Academy Awards
time. It looks good, works well and doesn't talk down to its audience...at
least not very much.
(Michael Redman, with over 22 years of writing these words of wisdom, is
currently hanging out in big sky country  one of the few places that can
rival southern Indiana's beautiful autumn. Email to mredman@bvoice.com will
still reach him because the electrons go everywhere.)
[This appeared in the 9/25/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Bogus (1996)
Because of the numerous possibilities of headlines and comments of a
negative nature, if I were making a film called "Bogus", Id go out of
my way to make sure that the film was one of quality. As usual, the
producer and director didnt beat a path to my door asking for advice.
Too bad.
Little boy Albert (Haley Joel Osment)'s Las Vegas chorus girl mother
dies in a traffic accident and he is sent to live with her lifeless
adoptive sister Harriet (Whoopi Goldberg). Albert is frightened and
doesnt want to go, but finds an imaginary friend, Bogus (Gerard
Depardieu) to help him on his way.
The subject of the imaginary friends of children and adults is an
intriguing one, worthy of imaginative exploration. But dont look for it
here amid the dull pap.  Often in films with kids, the problem is with
the overly-cute children. At least you dont have to worry about that
here. Osment has his wide-eyed look down fairly well, but most of the
time hes just there.
Goldberg isnt much better. Her film career has been dramatically uneven
running from the listless comedies to fine performances in "Boys On The
Side", "The Color Purple" and others.  Her appearance here is flat, as
if she had realized what a drab vehicle she was in and attempted to
match it.
The only semi-bright spot is Depardieu. His larger than life man-child
is occasionally delightful and comical. Dressed in an enormous floppy
trench coat that frequently seems to be going in a different direction
than he is, the French actor has a flair for physical humor.
Unfortunately he can't pull the movie out of itself.
Theres a powerful cinematic short-cut that is becoming over-used and
trite. During this film, we see scenes from "Harvey" on the television.
What this segment of Jimmy Stewart talking to his imaginary six foot
rabbit friend is supposed to do is bring us to an "Oh yeah, 'Harvey'!
That was a great film and was about the same subject as this one is so I
should transfer my warm feelings about 'Harvey' to this movie." state of
being. I first remember seeing this used effectively in "Close
Encounters", but here it seems like a sleazy trick.
Even worse than attending a film that you suspect might be mediocre is
seeing one that, based on the cast and story, you expect a magical time
and having it turn out to be a numbing experience. Stay home and rent
"Harvey"; youll have a much better time.
As alluded to in the first paragraph, "Bogus" is, indeed.
[This appeared in the 9/12/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Ransom (1996)
If he doesn=92t watch out, Mel Gibson is in danger of being known as
someone other than Mad Max. Of course there are still a few big guns in
this film, but there=92s some accomplished acting too. Although Gibson
continues to shed his rough and gritty anti-hero skin as his career
progresses, here he explores a new genre: the businessman as action
hero.
In Ron Howard=92s latest film, Gibson plays Tom Mullen, a gazillionaire
airline owner whose son is snatched from the junior science fair by
kidnappers. Mullen at first agrees to pay the ransom, but when things
fall apart he rethinks the situation. A veteran of numerous hard-nosed
business negotiations, the tycoon realizes that in order to get his son
back alive, he has to play his hand differently.
The casting is what puts this film over the top. The trio of Gibson, the
kidnappers' mastermind (Gary Sinise) and FBI team leader (Delroy Lindo)
play off of each other wonderfully. Sinise is perfect as the driven
scheming sleezebag is right on the mark. His speech to Mullen over a
walkie talkie about H. G. Wells=92 Morlocks and Eloi reveal his vision of=
society. Mullen and the other glitteratti frolic up on high while Sinise
and the other lowlifes dwell below, feeding off the unsuspecting.
Gibson=92s character is an all-American hero with a few flaws. His cowboy=
tactics tend to work, but they are also what got him into this situation
to begin with. In a round about way, if he weren=92t known as a man who i=
s
willing to buy his way out of trouble, his son wouldn=92t have been
kidnapped. As Sinise says "You=92re a payer. You did it once and now
you=92re going to do it again."
One of the nicest elements of this film is that most of the characters
actually have personalities. Lindo calls home to talk to his kids,
obviously shaken at working this case. Even the kidnappers are real
people, arguing about the ultimate fate of Sean Mullen and feeding him
candy bars.
Gibson=92s break-down on the balcony of their penthouse apartment is
especially effective. It=92s one of the best filmed representations of a
man=92s world falling apart that I=92ve seen.
It=92s not all perfect. The shoot 'em  upending, while emotionally
satisfying seems tacked on to be just that rather than to provide a
powerful resolution. As well crafted as the scene is, we=92ve seen it
before. Mullen=92s wife (Rene Russo) has several good moments, but
occasionally just seems to be there. While adequate, Brawley Nolte
(Sean) doesn=92t provide much to the film other than occupying space to
build the story around.
But you=92ll ignore these problems as each minute of the movie builds on
the previous one. Forget about the large coke, you won=92t want to leave
for that five minute break an hour later.
[This appeared in the 11/14/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Big Lebowski, The (1998)
The relaxed Dude rides a roller coaster
The most surreal situations are ordinary everyday life as viewed by an
outsider. When those observers are Joel and Ethan Coen, the surreal becomes
bizarre. When the life is that of Jeff "The Dude" Leboswki, the bizarre falls
over the edge into the world of "What'sgoingonaroundhere".
The marvelous sound of  "The Stranger" (Sam Elliot)'s voice-over introduces
the film. At least it does until he forgets what he was going to say and gives
up.  The Dude (Jeff Bridges) is described as the "laziest man in Los Angeles,
possibly the world", although he's not so much slothful as he is relaxed. 
Spending the last 30 years with a roach clip in one hand and a White Russian
in the other, he doesn't have much of a life, but he's having a good time.
When asked what he does for fun, he responds "bowl, drive around and the
occasional acid flashback".
Lebowski's passion is bowling. When he's not rolling the ball down an alley
towards a strike, things just happen to him. Arriving home one night, he's
beaten by thugs attempting to collect money that his wife owes them. Even
worse, they urinate on his rug. The problem is that The Dude doesn't have a
wife. His assailants realize that their target is a different Lebowski when
they glance around at his apartment. The "Big" Lebowski (David Huddleston) is
a multi-millionaire and his Dudeness lives in two-room squalor.
The next day, our ragtag hero visits his namesake's mansion attempting
compensation for his soaked rug. The carpet is important to him because it
pulls the room together: not surprisingly since it's virtually the only object
there. When he's denied any money, he picks up a replacement rug off the
floor. On his way out, he runs into Lebowski's trophy babe wife Bunny (Tara
Reid) who offers to perform a sexual act that, according to rumor, is one of
Bill Clinton's favorites for a thousand bucks. The penniless Dude wisecracks
that he's heading for the cash machine.
Later he gets an unexpected phone call enlisting his aid in being the bag man
to deliver a ransom to Bunny's kidnappers. This begins the trademarked Coen
brothers crimes-gone-wrong sequences. The kidnappers are impossibly inept. The
Dude and his cronies are even worse. Every plan goes awry. You can almost see
Lebowski's brain churning in slow motion as he tries to figure out the clues.
That's the story, but to tell the truth it doesn't much matter. There could be
almost any plot and the film would be just as entertaining. The narrative only
exists so we can watch the offbeat characters and the quirky predicaments they
fall into. The Dude's bowling buddies Walter (John Goodman) and Donny (Steve
Buscemi) look like people you'd see on the street but, like everything else in
this film, they're not quite what they seem.
Walter is a vet as stuck in Vietnam as The Dude is in the sixties. Everything
that happens reminds him of a situation in the Nam. When a fellow bowler
crosses the foul line but won't admit it, Walter pulls a gun on him until he
marks a zero on the score sheet. Donny gets precious few words in between
Walter's screaming and The Dude's rambling. When he does, Walter shouts him
down with horrendous albeit seemingly unintentional bowling puns. Donny is
"out of his league" and doesn't "have a frame of reference".
The film is peppered with people for whom the term "character" would be an
understatement. The Big Lebowski's daughter Maude, an avant-garde "vaginal"
artist, paints while swinging naked in a leather apparatus like an S&M Mary
Martin. The kidnappers are German  techno nihilist bikers. Bunny Lebowski is a
high school cheerleader turned porno star.
Most impressive is John Turturro in his far too small role as a Hispanic
bowler. As the flamenco music swells, we see him putting on his lavender hose.
The camera pans up to an all-purple skin-tight bowling outfit with "Jesus"
(pronounced with a "J", not an "H") embroidered on the pocket. He addresses
the lane with intense seriousness and one painted fingernail. His tongue
slowly snakes out and lovingly licks the glowing bowling ball.
Bridges works The Dude as if he had been living him for decades and maybe he
has. I can't think of anyone else who could have done a better job. Buscemi
has a limited role, but he plays it perfectly. The more that I see John
Goodman the more convinced I am that he's one of the treasures of our time.
It's odd to think that most of the world knows him only as Roseanne Barr's
television husband.
More like the Coen's "Raising Arizona" than their hit "Fargo", "The Big
Lebowski" demands an open mind and even more open eyes. A mark of the Coen
brothers is that even with all wonderful dream sequences and the broad
slapstick physical comedy on the screen, much of the humor is subtle and easy
to miss. There's so much going on that frequently it disappears before you can
see it.
Walking out of the theater, I felt that the film had something important to
say. On further examination, I wasn't sure exactly what it was. "If you meet
Jesus at the bowling alley, it's not going to be what you expect"? "When the
going gets weird, the weird go bowling"? Maybe there's no real message.
Perhaps it's just a roller coaster ride through a hilarious world. Maybe
that's enough.
(Michael Redman has written this column for 23 years and just realized that he
was so taken with The Dude that he ran out of space to talk about "The Man In
The Iron Mask" starring that favorite of 14-year-old girls of all ages.
Redman@bvoice.com is the eaddress for estuff.)
[This appeared in the 3/19/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Rounders (1998)
"We cannot run away from who we are. Our destiny chooses us," explains
Professor Petrovsky to law student Mike McDermott.
If I were a betting man, I'd put my money on half the people reading that
statement thinking "Great, bring it on!" And the other half saying "Oh God,
no! Anything but this!"
The notion that fundamentally we are who we are and nothing we can do will
change that is both comforting and frightening. How dismaying it is that we
might be fated for a role in life and yet how inviting it would be just settle
into who we are and quit fighting it.
McDermott (Matt Damon) is a poker player. No matter how much he wants to be
something else, he is a genius at the game. When he loses his $30,000 life
savings in one hand to KGB Teddy (John Malkovich), he begins to doubt his
chosen profession.
A few months later, we catch up with Mike who has hung up his deck of cards
and is driving a delivery truck to put himself through law school. He's doing
well although his live-in girlfriend Jo (Gretchen Mol) is constantly
suspicious that he'll return to his addiction. Mike is living the straight and
narrow until his childhood buddy Worm (Edward Norton) gets out of prison and
guilts him into returning to The Game.
Although Worm was a stand-up guy while they were growing up and didn't rat out
Mike when they got into big trouble, he's a something of a sleezoid. Where
Mike is a master at the psychological game, Worm is a "mechanic", manipulating
the cards and dealing off the bottom. In short order, he's racked up a $7,000
debt in Mike's name, gotten him into danger from violent gangster Grama
(Michael Rispoli) and beat up by dozens of state cops.
Focusing on immediate problems, Mike screws up his potential law career
showing up for moot court completely unprepared. Jo is disgusted that he's
gone back to gambling and moves out. Unless he comes up with a huge wad of
cash in a couple of days, Grama and KGB Teddy are going to kill him.
The inside look at high-stakes poker is fascinating. From the posh Las Vegas
World Series Of Poker to the paint pealing walls of New York game rooms hidden
behind locked metal doors, we get a glimpse of a world that most of the
audience have never seen. Director John Dahl ("The Last Seduction") has wisely
chosen not to dumb-down the scenes for those of us who are only acquainted
with the penny-ante version of the pasteboards. Often voice-over narration
only tells us what we already know, but in this case Damon's explanations work
well as a map to a foreign world.
Mike maintains that poker is a game of skill rather than luck. He plays the
man, not the cards. An expert at picking up the little physical "tells" that
reveal what a player has and knowing when to hold 'em and when to fold 'em, he
fleeces the flock faster than most people could deal a hand of five-card stud.
But the gambler has an ego problem. After a big game when he has all the money
he needs to re-pay Worm's debts and then some, he can't resist one more round
for everything. Gambler's Anonymous is going to have a problem with this film.
The movie is jammed with first-rate actors and the film's defects are salvaged
by their performances. Damon is as easy to like as he was in "Good Will
Hunting", partially because he plays essentially the same character having to
choose between school and the seamier side of life. Norton's quirky and
nervous Worm is a Sean Penn role and he plays it as well as Penn ever could.
Malkovich is hilarious as the Russian mob-connected poker player with one of
the thickest accents around. Martin Landau has a small but pivotal role as
Mike's professor and is a pleasure to watch.
Under-used is John Turturro as Joey Knish. Knish is the opposite of Mike. He
plays poker to pay his alimony and child support rather than for the thrill of
victory. Turturro is wonderful and I kept wishing for more screen time.
This is definitely a film about men. The women seem tossed in as an after
thought and are as well fleshed-out as Barbie dolls. Mol's Jo is little more
than a nag from the beginning. Famke Janssen as Petra, operator of a poker
room, has potential but a very minor role.
When the camera leaves the poker table, the film has some problems. Everyone
is telling everyone else how to live their lives. Jo demands that Mike not
gamble. Mike insists that Worm do things his way. Knish advises Mike on the
true path. Petrovsky informs Mike on the way things work. Grama lays out the rules.
As believable as the interaction between the characters is, their
relationships are lacking. Mike and Jo are never shown doing anything but
bickering. Their relationship exists only to provide the obligatory love
interest. He seems as unaffected by their break-up as he is by his academic
problems. Mike and Worm are pals, but their friendship is never really resolved.
Although the movie is flawed, I'll lay you ten-to-one that the atmospheric
subculture of high-stakes gambling will be as enticing to you as it is to me.
I'm ready to pack up my $34 life savings and head to the tables.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and he just found
two more dollars to play poker with but he still can't remember if a flush
beats a straight. Email the answer to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 9/17/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Scream 2 (1997)
The return to the popular spoof of slasher films had the biggest December
opening weekend in history and, in accordance with one of the rules of
sequels, features an even higher body count.
Like its predecessor, there are some clever lines (a sorority girl offers "Hi!
No, I really mean it! Hi!") and send-ups of the genre. My favorites are the
scenes where the unarmed would-be victims rush around trying to find the
vicious killer. What are they going to do if they find him?
Despite the witty antics, the film doesn't have much entertainment value for
me. Why? I dunno. Perhaps it's because the characters don't hold much
interest. Or maybe the fact that the same scene is played out over and over
enters into it.
It could be that I don't have enough of a background of slasher films to enjoy
a parody. I guess that's not such a bad thing.
[This appeared in the 12/18/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at redman@bvoice.com ]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Michael Collins (1996)
This is one of the most controversial films of recent times, not for the
quality of filmmaking, but rather the subject matter. Depending upon
whom you ask, Michael Collins is either a murdering terrorist and
traitor to his own people or a national hero of Ireland. Again,
depending upon whom you ask, director Neil Jordan ("The Crying Game",
"Interview With A Vampire") either portrays history relatively
accurately or plays fast and loose with the truth.
After the abortive 1916 Easter uprising against the British, Collins
(Liam Neeson) comes to realize that the only tactic left to the Irish is
an undercover war fought by an invisible army. Inventing the modern
terrorism that became the signature of the Irish Republican Army, he and
a small band of men bring England to her knees. As he states, his talent
is mayhem. The problem is that once he wins, it is no longer mayhem that
is needed, but politics. =
Sent to England by Sinn Fein head and president of the Irish Republic
Eamon De Valera (played with an eerie intensity by Alan Rickman) to
negotiate a settlement, Collins returns with less than he hoped for.
Ireland would be divided with the south being a Free State, but having
to pledge allegiance to the English king.
Historically correct or not, the film would have us believe that De
Valera send Collins because he knew what the outcome would be and didn't
want to take the fall himself. The two fellow revolutionaries have a
vicious falling out and civil war breaks out, each on different sides
and each leading forces killing their fellow countrymen. As with many
battles for independence, the real question is what to do when there's a
victory.  =
There are cries of whitewashing Collins' life by changing events to make
him appear more the hero. The less-than-admirable portrayal of De
Valera, also an Irish national hero, will strike some the wrong way,
especially the implication that he was involved in Collins'
assassination. =
Liam Neeson has played larger than life historical figures in
"Schindler=92s List" and "Rob Roy". Now he has stepped into the big shoes=
of Michael Collins. He is the fuel behind the film, although the
co-stars (Rickman, Julia Roberts, Aidan Quinn and Stephen Rea) help
carry it.
The cinematography is moody and with the exception of a technique stolen
from "The Godfather", extremely affective. No matter what your politics,
the craft of the film is beyond debate. And no matter what the
historical realities were, it=92s an extraordinary tale.
It has been said that history is written by the victors, but in the
latter half of the 20th century, history is being written by the
filmmakers. Although the movie itself admits that some events have been
=93fictionalized=94 to create a better story, the truth of the Irish
revolution has become "Michael Collins" for many people. It may be
wishful thinking to believe that we can have a grand film that is true
to the events, but it would be interesting to see someone try.
[This appeared in the 11/7/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Kama Sutra: A Tale of Love (1996)
Although the plot (commoner and princess vie for the affection of a
king) comes straight from a Harlequin romance, this Indian film is so
rich with sensuality and lush richness that it is a joy to behold.
Directed by Mira Nair (Salaam Bombay!, Mississippi Masala), the
tale follows two young girls Maya (Indira Varma) and Princess Tara
(Sarita Choudhury) as they mature in the ways of sex and politics. Tara
marries Raj Singh (Naveen Andrews) but not before Maya seduces him the
night before.
On her wedding day, Maya tells her "All my life I have lived with your
used things. Now something I have used is your forever." Tara is not too
happy with this turn of events and Maya is banished from the village.
Wandering through 16th century India, she comes upon royal sculptor who
turns her on to a Kama Sutra class. This prepares her for her new
occupation as courtesan to the same king that her childhood friend
married.
The story isn't much, but the costumes and sets are grand. The real star
of the film is the erotic love-making. The scenes are hot without being
explicit, sweaty without being offensive and certainly qualify as some
of the best filmed sex scenes to hit the cinema. See it and take a close
personal friend.
[This appeared in the 5/2/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for People vs. Larry Flynt, The (1996)
Virtually everything connected with "Hustler" publisher Larry Flynt is
tinged with controversy, even the poster for this movie. Elsewhere in
the world the film is advertised with an image of Flynt (Woody
Harrelson) draped in an American flag being crucified on the body of a
nearly nude woman. In the United States, because the Motion Picture
Association Of America wouldn't approve the artwork, the poster is of
Harrelson's head with a flag over his mouth.
The film itself has also stirred up emotional feelings. While there is
general agreement among critics that it is an exceptionally well crafted
piece, not everyone believes that the screen Flynt is much like the real
Larry Flynt. Produced by Oliver Stone ("JFK", "Nixon") who is known to
present his own particular version of history, directed by Milos Forman
("One Flew Over The Cuckoo=92s Nest", "Amadeus") who specializes in
iconoclast as hero films and written by Scott Alexander and Larry
Karaszewski ("Ed Wood") who delight in the low-brow; Flynt's life story
is from a very personalized point of view.
Growing up in the hill country of Kentucky, he graduates from a child
moonshiner to running a seedy strip club in Cincinnati. Looking for a
way to promote his establishment, he hits upon the idea of a glossy
newsletter featuring photos of his dancers. Reluctantly agreeing to
adding words as a result of a conversation with his printer who tells
him "This is it? You=92ve got to have text, like 'Playboy' " to make it
legal, Flynt begins his publishing empire. Said empire is going nowhere
until he lucks into nude shots of Jackie O for the second issue. Then
everyone in the country wants to see what he describes as "The First
P****! [expletive for female genitalia deleted]"
The film is a combination of court room drama and an offbeat love story.
Rags-to-riches Flynt=92s battles with fundamentalist preacher Jerry
Farwell make it to the Supreme Court with a case concerning a satire ad
in "Hustler" featuring Farwell=92s supposed confession of his first sexua=
l
experience which was with his mother in an outhouse. Last seen as the
naive hillbilly kid (or is he really a criminal genius?) in "Primal
Fear", Edward Norton is excellent as Flynt's attorney although he looks
remarkably young for the role. =
Flynt's temporary conversion to born-again Christianity by President
Carter=92s sister is included in the film, but not very well explained. I=
t
is amusing, however, to watch him try to combine his newly found
religion with the porn mag. Naked women on transparent crosses floating
in water, indeed!
The romantic tale is equally interesting. He finds his wife-to-be when
she is an underage stripper in his club. Althea Leasure (that can=92t be
her real name) is played to a T...make that a G...by rocker Courtney
Love (that can=92t be her real name). Seconds after they meet and an equa=
l
number of seconds before they consummate their relationship, she brags
"You=92re not the only one who=92s slept with all the women who dance her=
e."
Larry and Althea=92s courtship is unlike most. After sharing three other
women in a hot tub with him, Althea proposes and is astonished to learn
that her intended has confused the word "marriage" with a desire on her
part for monogamy.
Harrelson captures the self-confessed scumbag perfectly for the screen.
His transformation after Flynt is shot and ironically paralyzed below
the waist by an unknown assassin is top notch. Love is wonderful as the
bi-sexual devil-may-care temptress who later becomes drug addicted,
contracts AIDS and withers away before our eyes. Their scenes towards
the end of her life are touching no matter how you judge their
lifestyle.
Flynt's life is not exactly the stuff of traditional role models and
this film barely touches on the question of whether "Hustler" promoted
violence towards women, but it certainly is one of the few Must-Sees
that have come our way.
[This appeared in the 1/16/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible (1996)
Supposedly based on the television series from the late sixties and early
seventies, this film directed by Brian De Palma is only barely. It does have
the series title, a character's name (although certainly not the _same_
character) and some hi-tech gobligoop, but that's all that connects it to the original.
The series featured a team that pulled off a complex operation each episode
that featured disguises, split-second timing and usually completed its task
without anyone from the outside knowing what had happened.
The movie gives us a `James Bond-Lite' lone agent (Tom Cruise) who blows up a
bunch of stuff.
The first few minutes lull the audience into a false sense of a Mission:
Impossible film with a group assigned to catch the thief of a NOC list naming
undercover agents. Unfortunately for the team and the film, most of them
shortly meet an untimely demise including Emilio Estevez, easily the most
interesting Mission member.
The only survivors are Cruise and Emmanuelle Beart ("Manon Of The Spring"), an
actress of skill but in a fairly worthless role here. The spy bosses have
known for some time that there was a mole on the team and since Cruise
survived, decide that it is him. Cruise and Beart have to go after the bad
guys while ducking the good guys. Any of this sound familiar?
The film is an action movie disguised as a mystery in the guise of Mission:
Impossible. And not a very good one of any of them. The few action scenes are
physically impossible although well paced. The mystery is easily solved
moments after it is posed. The one remaining M:I character, Jim Phelps (Jon
Voight, originally Peter Graves) has nothing in common with the original. Fans
of the series will not recognize much.
Cruise's boyish appeal complete with trademarked grins doesn't play very well.
Bond he ain't. Besides the disappearing and uncredited Estevez, there are only
two actors with much charisma. Veteran actress Vanessa Redgrave shines in what
is an unusual role in films: an extremely sexual older woman. Oddly cast, big
tough-looking Ving Rhames ("Pulp Fiction") is fascinating as the kind-hearted
but devious computer hacker.
Selling out even at mid-afternoon matinees, the movie has enough explosions to
rake in the big bucks for Paramount and make it a summer blockbuster. If
you're looking for quality though, you might want to save your money.
[This appeared in the 5/25/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Crazy in Alabama (1999)
The human mind spends a lot of time trying to make sense of things. We devote
an amazing amount of energy sifting through chaos, trying to find the
patterns. It's why optical illusions work. It's why everyone has their own
ideas of how life works.
The idea that there is no pattern, no "why," is so alien that we reject it. We
need order and connections, even if they are illusions.
Attempting to find the connections between the two stories in "Crazy In
Alabama" is not only a fool's errand, but it ruins what might have otherwise
been an acceptable little film.
Lucille (Melanie Griffith) is fed up with her cruel controlling husband. He
beats her. He's kept her pregnant for years by punching holes in her
diaphragm. She's so tired of him that when he tells her she can't go to
Hollywood to pursue her dream of stardom, she poisons him and cuts off his
head with her electric carving knife.
She stuffs his body in the family freezer, drops off her seven young kids at
mama's house and hits the road for sunny California with poor hubby's head in
a Tupperware container by her side.
Back at mama's place, the influx of youngsters forces her to move Peejoe
(Lucas Black) and his brother, orphaned grandsons she has been raising, to
their uncle Dove's (David Morse).
Living in the small town of Industry, Peejoe soon comes face-to-face with the
racial unrest that was Alabama in 1965. When Sheriff Doggett (Meat Loaf Aday)
kills a black teen trying to swim in a public pool, Peejoe becomes radicalized
to the plight of Negroes.
So there you have it. Zany Lucille is driving to the big city on a one-woman
"Thelma And Louise" trek to strike it big and 13-year-old Peejoe is immersed
in the civil rights movement. What's the connection?
Sure there are some thematic similarities. Women and Blacks have been kept
down for centuries and both are beginning to awaken. But Lucille's half of the
film is played for laughs and Peejoe's is deadly serious. Although the film
was adapted from Mark Childress' novel, it doesn't work as one story. It feels
like the studio had two completely different tales and stapled the scripts together.
The frustration is that either could have been a satisfying film. Lucille's
search for self identity and fame has some hilarious moments. Peejoe coming of
age in the turbulent sixties is often poignant.
Either story could have worked. Not both.
It's too bad. Watching the film, trying to fit the two together, I kept making
excuses because there are so many good scenes. I kept hoping that it would all
fall together in the end. Ultimately it doesn't.
Actor Antonio Banderas' directoral debut takes a few more wrong steps than
just the juxtaposition of the mis-matched plots. Both have some problems. The
decapitated head talking to Lucille is neither funny nor entertaining. The
depiction of the plight of oppressed people told through white eyes is an
overworked error.
Griffith has played this part a number of times before and often succeeds,
especially in her "I'm so sexy you can't stand it" scenes. Unfortunately she
occasionally appears disconnected from her character.
Black is grand as the homegrown southern kid. His role here rivals his
performance as the trusting boy in "Slingblade". Kids who come across as real
children on the screen are rare. He does it to perfection.
A few of the supporting characters are strong also. Morse turns in a good
understated job as the liberal mortician. Meat Loaf's redneck sheriff is fun
to watch, cliched as it is. Rod Steiger show up as a judge at the courtroom
finale. He almost seems like he's in a different film than the rest of the
cast, but adds a touch of energy.
Wait until this comes out on video. Then do your own editing, putting the
scenes from each story together and watch it that way. You'll have two
acceptable short films rather than one longer one that just doesn't work.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 24 years...or is it 25? Send
your chaos vs. order theories to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 10/28 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
This week's Y2K article: http://www.indepen.com/
Y2K archives: http://www.indepen.com/y2k.html

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
As I sit in front of the glowing screen in this pre-dawn hour thinking about
this film, everything around me feels eerie. The usually-comforting piles of
clutter and artifacts that fill my office are alien. When my cat walks across
the keyboard causing me to delete his gibberish, it's not an annoyance, it's foreboding.
I walk to into the living room and put on some Jimmy Buffett -- the least
frightening music I can think of. It doesn't work. There's still a strange
atmosphere haunting the house.
This is the power of "The Blair Witch Project". It's been two days since I saw
the movie and the reaction remains.
Three student filmmakers wander off into a Maryland forest in October 1994 to
film a documentary about the Blair witch, a local piece of folklore. They
disappear, never to be found. A year later, anthropology students discover a
duffel bag containing film and video cassettes buried under a 100 year-old
cabin deep in the woods. The movie we see is the found footage.
Knowledgeable members of the audience know this is all fake. The actors
playing the students are still alive. The film team never existed. None of
them were lost or killed.
The footage is a combination of the black and white 16mm supposedly filmed for
the documentary and video shot for a "Making Of" feature. Much of it has the
appearance of what you get when you take a camcorder out for the day. Scenes
are poorly lighted. Subjects are out of frame. Often it's difficult to make
out what you are seeing or hearing.
It's the most unprofessional film cinematography ever seen on the big screen.
And possibly the most realistic. The amateur quality is what makes it work.
Like even the worst home movies or old grainy 8mm porn films, there's a
fascination because there's something real going on. It's as if you are
eavesdropping on someone's life.
No matter how much they try, high production values can never accomplish this.
The very nature of the unprofessionalism erases the barrier between the
audience and the film.
Anyone who has spent a few nights in the woods knows the fear of the night
unknowns that creeps into your mind at times.
Usually when I'm camping, it's with a large group of ten to a few hundred
people. There's always weirdness, but I have an idea of what most of it is. On
the occasions when there's only been two or three of us, it's a different
matter. Unidentifiable sounds come from outside the tent and you know there's
_something_ going on out there.
In the film, some of the "somethings" can be attributed, as you do when out
there at night, to animal activity. But some of them decidedly can not.
After the students are lost, they hear disembodied voices. They awaken one
morning to find piles of rocks outside their tent. The night scenes never show
us anything beyond the few feet the lights shine. Whatever is there, is beyond
their -- and our -- knowing.
Some of the most frightening scenes are from the camcorder left on as they run
helter-skelter through the forest in the dark. All we see are branches
brushing past the lens. All we hear are panting and a few excited words. It's chilling.
The three actors (Heather Donahue, Joshua Leonard, Michael Williams) use their
real names in the film and are completely convincing as people you might run
into walking down the street. Ordinary people scared out of their wits.
The movie has some flaws. We don't learn enough about the Blair witch. When I
left the theater, I felt disappointed in the last two minutes. Too much was
neatly wrapped up and I thought it would have been better had the film ended earlier.
But days later, the final five seconds stay with me. It's more terrifying now
than it was then.
Although the film is undeniably ground-breaking, it's unlikely we're going to
see a lot of movies copying it as is the tradition. It's a concept that can't
work more than once or twice.
In some ways it's a one-trick pony. But it's a remarkable trick.
(Michael Redman has written this column for 24 years and during that time has
seen a lot of weird things in the woods at night. Email your camping
experiences to redman@indepen.com. No, really. Do it.)
[The appeared in the 8/5/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Mars Attacks! (1996)
The bubble gum cards that this film is based on were released in the
early sixties to criticism of their violent and explicit scenes of death
and destruction. Thirty years later this is played for laughs.
Tim Burton who gave us "Beetlejuice", "Batman" and "Edward Scissorhands"
attempts a difficult task: making a purposefully bad big-budget science
fiction film funnier than the unintentionally hilarious B films. How can
you outdo "Plan 9"? An admirable task, it's unfortunate that he doesn't
succeed. "Mars Attacks" starts off extraordinarily slow and doesn't get
much better.
Despite dozens of big name stars (Jack Nicholson, Glenn Close, Michael
J. Fox, Jim Brown, Tom Jones, Rod Steiger and many more), the one-joke
film falls on its face. With such a big cast, characterization is
difficult and here it's not even attempted. When the main characters get
fried one by one by the invaders, it's a big ho-hum.
Burton obviously believes that excess is the road to success, but in
this film it's just the superhighway to even more excess. Everything is
big and bright from the destruction of Congress to the red and green (in
celebration of Christmas?) glowing skeletons that remain after the
Martians scorch earthlings with their death rays.
There are a few amusing bits and excellent effects. But they're only
impressive the first time you see them, not the second, and certainly
not the twentieth.
The film does almost work on a conceptual level. True to its origins,
the movie sports grand visuals. Many of the scenes are borrowed directly
from the cards and look great on the big screen. The project is much
like a series of moving trading cards. Here's a cool picture -- the
stampede of burning cattle is breathtaking. And there's another. I'd
trade two of these for one of those. Just like cards, they look great,
but then what do you do with them?
In the best of all worlds, you'd take the images and design a humorous
engrossing story around them. We don't live in the best of all worlds
and what we get is a tedious movie with tiresome aliens that look like
the puppets they are in a story inspired by "Gremlins" as much as by the
gory drawings on cardboard.
The film goes from one vignette to another with little connection
between them. Remarkably enough for such a flashy movie, it moves at a
slothful pace. And it goes on and on and on and...
I'm perfectly willing to admit that there will be many who love the
film, but Burton lost me with "The Nightmare Before Christmas". Perhaps
I just don't get it, but I suspect that there's nothing there to get.
This is a movie that the subject of one of his films, Ed Wood, could
have made.
The microscopic bacteria recently found on rocks possibly from Mars show
more life than this film does. The search for extraterrestrial
intelligence continues.
[This was published in the "Bloomington Voice" 12/26/96. Michael Redman
can be contacted at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Hoodlum (1997)
Gangster films have long been a major mainstay of cinema lore. While there
have been superb movies of this genre and several different approaches to the
subject, in some ways they have a sameness. "Hoodlum" is a good looking film
and offers a high level of entertainment but little new.
Loosely based on a true story of the struggle for the numbers racket in
Depression-era Harlem, the film follows the rise of "Bumpy" Johnson (Laurence
Fishburne). South Carolina teenager Johnson, sent to live with his older
sister in New York rapidly ran into trouble with the law during the Harlem
Renaissance of the Roaring Twenties.
After doing time at various institutions, he is released in the early
Thirties. This is where the film begins. Johnson rejoins his old buddies and
immediately becomes involved with Madame Queen's (Cicely Tyson) numbers
"business". The numbers game, similar to the lotteries available now in almost
every state, was illegal of course because it wasn't being run by the government.
Dutch Schultz (Tim Roth) has taken over the numbers concession in every New
York neighborhood except Harlem and is making his ruthless bid for those
pennies. Bumpy isn't about to let that happen.
When the Queen is arrested by a crooked cop in Schultz's back pocket, she
turns control over to Johnson and he declares all-out war against the
Dutchman. The blood is about to flow and everyone knows it.
Lucky Luciano (Andy Garcia) has organized the gangs in the city but is having
trouble with Schultz who is crude, unrefined and, perhaps even worse, not
Italian. His politician, the Special Prosecutor, makes loud noises when the
fighting breaks out of Harlem as Bumpy brings the war uptown.
Luciano brings the gangsters to the bargaining table but to no avail. These
two aren't built for compromise. Seeing that the battle is not near an end,
Bumpy decides to fight Schultz with the weapons where he is clearly superior.
He is going to out-think him.
Director Bill Duke ("A Rage In Harlem"), set designer Charles Bennett
("Roots") and costumer Richard Bruno ("The Untouchables") combine with
cinematographer Frank Tidy ("Under Siege") to craft an especially attractive
one if you can excuse the graphically violent scenes. 
Harlem of that time was a study in contrasts. The extremely poor co-existed
with the high fashion. The well-known Cotton Club featured Black performers
but non-Whites were not allowed in the audience. This film captures the mood
with style.
Fishburne is exceeding prolific recently, appearing in a number of movies and
turning in a respectable job with each role. He and Garcia adopt the
respectable mobster look with chic clothes, sly smiles and talk of chess. It
is Roth who takes the chances here when he portrays Schultz as a cultureless
sadistic low life. Coming dangerously close to overplaying the role, he takes
it to the edge but not a step further.
The scene-stealer of the film is Chi McBride as Bumpy's cousin Illinois
Gordon. Every time he is on the screen, he captures all eyes. Serving as the
gang's conscience, he repeatedly points out that innocent people are dying as
the war heats up and Bumpy hardens. His romance with his "big woman" is
especially touching while providing the film with some of its lighter moments.
Bumpy's love doesn't hold as much interest. While Francine (Vanessa Williams)
is certainly a looker, her "good girl falling for the tough guy" character
isn't very convincing. Most of her scenes could have been dropped from the
overly long (almost two and a half hours) film and we wouldn't have missed a thing.
The trend towards romanticizing mobsters is troublesome. Was Bumpy Johnson
really a Robin Hood, stealing from Schultz to give away the money to the poor?
Was he defending Harlem from outsiders so that the community could control
their own business and provide jobs to 2,000 otherwise unemployed number
runners? The body count provides evidence that Bumpy was no angel.
Bad politics and stylish demeanor: looks like the wave of the cinematic
future. 
(Michael Redman who has penned this type of thing for over 22 years is looking
forward to the beautiful southern Indiana autumn and losing this muggy stuff
that passes for weather.)
[This appeared in the "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana 9/4/97.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]
-- 
mailto:mredman@bvoice.com

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
        Guilty pleasures are secret little joys of life. Things that we're not
supposed to enjoy because they're not hip and they're certainly not good for
us. Velveeta cheese, Reeses Cups, silly sit-coms. We sneak these in every once
and a while but don't mention them as we're munching brie and imported
chocolate while discussing PBS specials.
        Here's my confession: "Armageddon" is great fun. It's as intelligent as a
Twinkie, but, ohhhh, that cream filling!
        An asteroid the size of Texas is hurling towards Earth and we have 18 days to
do something about it. A "Global Killer", it will wipe out all life on the
planet -- not even bacteria will survive. Not to worry though, NASA has a
plan. They're going to land on the rock, drill 800 feet into it, stuff a
couple of nukes down the hole and split the thing in half sending it away from
our lovely home world.
        Their problem is that the trained astronauts don't have much hole-digging
experience. Agency head Dan Truman (Billy Bob Thornton) turns to the best oil
man on the planet, cantankerous Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis). Stamper brings
in his team of misfits to learn how to be outer space heroes and they're a not
exactly the guys that NASA would have picked to stick in the shuttle to save
the world. As one of the legit astronauts says, "Talk about the wrong stuff."
        It's the usual "Dirty Dozen" gang: AJ (Ben Affleck), the young headstrong
rebel; Chick (Will Patton), a gambler with a child who doesn't know him;
Rockhound (Steve Buscemi), the genius crazed lothario; and the rest of the
rag-tag cowboys you've come to expect -- the muscular black guy, the gentle
fat guy and more.
        After some fun and games at NASA, they blast off in two shuttles piloted by
real astronauts. Refueling at a Russian space station they pick up a loony
cosmonaut who has been alone a bit too long as the station explodes into flames.
        When they get to the asteroid, everything that could possibly go wrong does
as they fight the doomsday clock. Bet you didn't see that coming.
        There's remarkably little story and virtually no characterization. Stamper
isn't even as filled out as Willis' usual characters are. All the drillers are
cartoon people. We're supposed to get to know them in the very few moments
devoted to bringing them to life in the two and a half hour film. 
        There are two chances to identify them. When they are picked up by G-men for
the mission each is doing something that is supposed to help us figure out who
they are. Rockhound is propositioning a married woman in a sleazy New Orleans
bar, someone is out in the desert on a big motorcycle outrunning the cops.
Later, just before blast-off, they get a night off. Chick visits his estranged
kid, most of the rest get into a bar fight.
        But it doesn't work. At one point, several characters die. After the film, we
tried to figure out who they were, but no one could remember. They were not
people, just bodies.
        AJ and Stamper's daughter Grace (Liv Tyler) are in love much to her daddy's
displeasure. Their romance adds a touch of humanity to the film, but just a
touch. Mostly she hangs around Mission Control doe-eyed, sobbing about the
danger that her father and fiance are in.
        During the first half of the film, Thornton is such a stand-out that the
other actors pale by comparison. Cast against his previous redneck roles, he
does a fine job as the harried NASA chief who yearns for space.
        The movie is filled with bad science (some objects on the asteroid act as if
they were in Earth's gravity), incomprehensible ideas (NASA sends giant
machine guns into space?) and cinematic cliches (in disarming a bomb, do they
cut the blue wire or the red one?). Everything...let me repeat that...
_everything_ is done at absolutely the last possible second. And you can tell
by the digital readouts.
        But, you know, who cares? The special effects are amazing. When relatively
little meteors hit New York, buildings get blown up real good. (The Chrysler
Building is taken out yet again.) Paris is spectacularly vaporized. There are
enough explosions and fire to satisfy anyone.
        Director Michael Bay ("The Rock") used to direct music videos and commercials
and it shows. There's seemingly an edit every two seconds which works well to
create an intense feeling of excitement and hide the lack of story. It does
makes things confusing. In several scenes, it's difficult to figure out
exactly what is going on. Who is where? What is what?
        As fun as it is, "Armageddon" is only one-third of a movie. The earlier
death-from-the-sky film "Deep Impact" was more intellectually satisfying but
lacking any sense of excitement. Both are peopled with characters that you
don't really care about. Once again we are left to wonder why someone can't
make an edge of the seat movie that makes sense and features real people.
        It's traditional that, at the end of each century, the doomsday prophets
appear in full-force. As we approach the end of this millennium, our
story-tellers are giving us what we want. Some say the end of the world will
come in fire, others say water. Hollywood says giant rocks from above. The
most interesting theory is that our way of life will radically change not with
a bang, but with the gentle double-zero.
(Michael Redman has been writing this column for over 23 years and he's
thinking about making a fried baloney and Velveeta sandwich on white bread,
but don't tell anyone. Redman@bvoice.com is the eaddress for confessing your
guilty pleasures.)
[This appeared in the 7/9/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for G.I. Jane (1997)
Demi Moore does her best to be husband Bruce Willis in a "guy film"
disguised as a feminist movie. Beat-up, bruised and bloody but
buffed-out, she triumphs over overwhelming odds: "Die Hard 15: This
Time It's A Babe".
In a political trade-off for confirmation of the new head of the Navy,
the military powers that be agree to a few trial cases for women in
combat. Lt.  Jordan O'Neil (Moore) is assigned to SEAL training. The
brass is sure that she will wash out within a week; after all, 60% of
the __men__ fail the intense course. We know better from the
beginning.
O'Neil sticks it out despite resentment from her fellow sailors and
harassment from drill instructor Master Chief John Urgayle (played
with a wonderful depravity by Viggo Mortensen). After she endures
weeks of physical and mental torture, the big boys start to get
worried - she might make it. They begin to put political pressure
on Senator Lillian DeHaven (Anne Bancroft), the woman that forced them
into the situation in the first place.
The film is supposed to have a Message, but it is nothing new. Some
women can do as well as some men in physically demanding
situations. Now there's a revelation. Women in the military poses some
problems. Another news flash.  Perhaps these are new thoughts to
some. After all, the audience I saw the film with thought that "If I
want your opinion, I'll give it to you" was a hilarious line.
The movie beats you over the head with the obvious. A black team
member tells the story of a relative in WWII who was denied combat
duty because it was well known that people of his race had bad night
vision. "You're the new nigger on the block," he tells O'Neil. The
not-too-subtle undercurrent in the statement is that sexual
integration of the military is inevitable. A bit more refined
statement comes from one of her superiors "She's not the problem. We
are."
The extended shots of training get old fast. If you've seen a five
minute segment of people crawling through the mud and barbed wire
while being shot at, you've seen 'em all. There doesn't need to be a
dozen of them. The film looses the ability to keep your attention
early on.
There are some plot devices that don't work and others that don't make
sense.  The top Navy staff never figures out that the officer they
have assigned to keep track of O'Neil is her boyfriend. There couldn't
be a more vivid illustration of the old joke about the oxymoronic
aspect of military intelligence.
The tired twist of a training exercise turning into real combat is no
more of a surprise than anything else is. It could have been redeemed
if those action scenes had been exceptional, but we've seen it all
before...and usually better.
I would have expected better from director Ridley Scott ("Aliens",
"Blade Runner", "Thelma And Louise"), but his films have been on the
downhill slide for a few years. As he drifts into brother Tony's ("Top
Gun") simplistic but popular territory, he's losing something
valuable. This movie has the dynamic look of previous Scott efforts,
but none of the soul.
It's not all horrible. Cheering for the underdog is always an
audience-pleaser and it's easy to do here. Much of the film looks good
visually. But these aren't enough to make up for a one-trick plot and
hackneyed script.
The one bright spot is that Moore does a credible job with what little
she is given to work with. Admittedly the role isn't exactly
challenging, but with the atrocious "Striptease" behind her, this is
certainly a step forward. Upon first glance, the films couldn't be
more different, but on closer examination the two characters could be
the same woman. Feisty and determined hot honey makes good in a man's
world.
Of course no Demi Moore film would be complete without some gratuitous
footage of her assets. Clad only in a thin tank-top and tiny shorts
and covered with sweat she demonstrates that she is really not one of
the guys even as she's doing one-armed push-ups.
Becoming a man seems to be O'Neil's goal. Not content to just be
treated equal to the others, she becomes a hit with the men when she
strongly suggests that the Master Chief "suck my [anatomical component
that we would be surprised if she actually possessed]."
Perhaps someday Scott will release a director's cut with the better
scenes in this film and find a story worth watching to go with
them. Someone give me a call if that happens.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 21 years and is
continually amazed at what passes for entertainment at times. Email to
mredman@bvoice.com is your direct link for fan mail.)
[This appeared in the 8/27/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]
-- 
mailto:mredman@bvoice.com

Title
Review for Escape from L.A. (1996)
Walking into the theater, I was expecting a teched-up sequel to the 15
year old "Escape From New York". Seeing only four people seated, I
should have guessed that the word of mouth wasn't phenomenal. After the
first few minutes of the film, I could see why.
The earlier film, also starring Kurt Russell and directed by John
Carpenter, featured a post-apocalyptic NYC turned into a prison island
populated by off-beat an colorful gangs. Tough (but lovable) Guy Snake
Plissken (Russell) is recruited by the powers that be to rescue the
President who crash landed in the middle of the mess. To keep Snake on
track, he is booby-trapped so that if he doesn't deliver the Prez within
a time limit, he dies.
Once inside the city, our antihero locates the chief executive and
fights his way out, guns a'blazing. Zillions of bullets zoom towards
Snake with his name on them, but he emerges virtually unscathed, ready
to deal with the governmental double-cross.
Why talk so much about the original? The plots of both films are nearly
identical. Substitute New York with "Los Angeles after the big one" and
President with "President's daughter and mysterious black box" and
you've got "Escape From LA".
In this version, the Christian right has taken over the country and
sentenced the whores, atheists, meat-eaters and smokers to LA. It's
debatable which side of the wall is the actual prison. If it weren't a
deportation facility, it would be marketed as the perfect vacation spot.
Like many films with Roman numerals in their titles, this is no sequel.
Sequels continue the story: this is more of a re-make. Even worse, this
is a shabby re-make.
The original gave us an occasionally humorous, entertaining action film
where the effects worked even though some things didn't make sense. Now
that they've spent six times what the first one cost, we get an
over-the-top tedious movie with badly done models and poor computer
animation where nothing makes sense.
There are attempts at humor. If you think that Snake Plissken and Peter
Fonda surfing a tsunami down Wilshire Boulevard while trying to catch up
with a convertible sounds hilarious, this may be the film for you.
Russell does as much as he can with his Clint Eastwood impression and is
the only thing consistently worth watching. On the other hand, Carpenter
should be ashamed. Perhaps his next movie should be "Escape From Bad
Films".
[This appeared in "The Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana,
8/22/96. Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Ever After (1998)
It's not a bad thing to update old stories. It's done all the time in the
oral tradition. The difficulty with this film is not that the tale has
changed, it's that it's dry.
The new Cinderella, Danielle (Drew Barrymore) is not sitting around waiting
for her prince to come. She's a woman of the late twentieth century albeit
situated in sixteenth century France. When her father dies, she stays on in
his house even though she is mistreated by her wicked stepmother Rodmilla
(Anjelica Huston). She works by day, but reads Sir Thomas More by firelight at night.
Although the story is updated, you know the plot. Danielle meets Prince Henry
(Dougray Scott), goes to a ball disguised, is later found out and they live
happily ever after.
The movie is often like watching a filmed play. Theater in real life is
engrossing. Theater on the screen is usually lifeless. There doesn't seem to
be much going on. The camera can be a star of films. Here it's a co-conspirator.
Danielle's convictions are compromised. A socialist and a feminist, she
pretends to be royalty to get her man. A kind woman, her last act in the movie
is one of revenge.
The most enjoyable characters are the most cartoonish. The fairy godmother
stand-in, Leonardo Da Vinci (Patrick Godfrey) is fun to watch as the eccentric
old man who advises Danielle. Huston is enjoyable in her over-the-top wickedness.
In all fairness, my companion loved the film. Maybe it's one of those "chick
flicks" that men don't like. It is certainly a date film. Nearly the entire
audience was couples. Oh well, maybe it's good for something.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and should have
known that his run of enjoyable summer films was bound to end sometime. Email
your retro-fitted legends to Redman@bvoice.com)
[This appeared in the 8/6/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Sling Blade (1996)
Recently things have changed in the world of cinema. Not only are
independent films capturing top awards, but one of the most successful
auteurs around is named "Billy Bob".
Billy Bob Thornton wrote, directed and starred in the most disturbing
film in recent memory. The movie was made for an incredibly low $1
million, sold to Miramax for $10 million and is well on its way towards
earning many times that for the studio.
Thornton plays Karl Childers who returns home to his rural southern town
after spending 25 years in a "nervous hospital". At the age of 12,
Childers murdered his mother and her lover misunderstanding the
situation. Now he reckons that the doctor thinks he's cured. Un huh.
Gentle to a fault, the simple man is much more complicated than you
might expect. Making close friends with a young boy as a result of a
chance meeting, he is drawn to his new family. Young fatherless Frank
Wheatley (Lucas Black) likes the way Karl talks (un huh) and appreciates
the protection he offers from his mother Linda's (Natalie Canderday)
drunken abusive boyfriend Doyle (an all-too-convincing Dwight Yoakam).
Linda's best friend, the gay effeminate Vaughan is played convincingly
by, of all people, John Ritter.
Karl speaks with a halting yet confident Old Testament view of the
world. Guilty of not only the double murders, but also of involvement in
an even more unspeakable crime, he is searching for redemption for his
sins committed from a distorted innocence.
The portrayal of the redneck life that exists in this small town is both
frightening and compassionate. Country singer Yoakam's drunken rage is
particularly convincing as he instantly alternates from slapping around
Frank to begging forgiveness to threatening to kill Linda. Life in the
fast and desperate lane.
The ending is telegraphed from the beginning. The audience knows what is
going to happen and it is somewhat of a disappointment when it does. The
film isn't about a surprise finale, but rather the inescapable one. The
players are set into motion and no power on earth can stop what is to
be.
Billy Bob's Karl is a masterpiece of characterization. No Forest Gump,
the virtuous murderer is an intense image that you'll be seeing in your
mind's eye for a long time.
[This appeared in the 4/10/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Event Horizon (1997)
To be perfectly blunt: this movie sucks. And in the worst way.
Although heavily influenced (to be kind) by "Alien", the film starts off with
great promise. The fine cast combined with first rate effects and dynamic art
production sets the mood for what looks to be one of the few science fiction
films with thought and soul. Then it turns into a cinematic disaster.
Unexpected story twists and surprise changes in plot are not necessarily bad
things, but "Event Horizon" takes so many bewildering left turns that it
should have picked up a Triple A trip map before it began. Perhaps then it
wouldn't have ended up completely lost. 
Starting off in Alienland with a short journey to Stargateville and a
stop-over at The Shiningtown, the movie travels to CliveBarkerburg and then
makes a rapid descent into the bad side of ThirdRateSlasherville. It's a long
strange trip that ends up nowhere.
In 2047, the crew of the Lewis And Clark head off to rescue a top secret ship
that supposedly was destroyed seven years before. Now it has turned up in the
upper atmosphere of Neptune. Neptune was obviously not chosen by chance by the
filmmakers. Ask your local astrologer: it's the planet of deception, illusion
and blurring the edges of this dimension and the next.
Upon coming out of stasis, the secret is revealed. The ship was designed to
create black holes and travel through them effectively moving faster than the
speed of light. It had disappeared when the engine core was engaged only now
to emerge in the lightning storms of one of the outer planets. The rescue
ship's mission is to recover the inter-universe drive and hopefully rescue the crew.
The crew of the Event Horizon turns out to be a lost cause as they have been
turned into bloody shredded beef strewn all over the ship. When the rescuers
began having vivid hallucinations and recover the lost ship's video log
showing the crew violently attacking each other, it is obvious that something
has gone horribly wrong.
The first half of the movie has its problems. It's too derivative of "Alien"
and creates startling moments by loud noises rather than suspense, but it
still looks good. The ancient future art direction (ala "Stargate") is
fascinating. The strong casting of Laurence Fishburne, Sam Neill and Kathleen
Quinlan is certainly a step in the right direction. The computerized special
effects are some of the best crafted ever seen on the screen.
Then it all falls apart. After leading us into the false sense of security
that we are in for a film of value, the producers decide that height of
filmmaking is "Friday The 13th" and pour more and more blood on the sets. When
you hear the ship's scientist explain that the EH has opened a gateway into a
"dimension of unimaginable evil", you know that all hope is lost. After that,
little makes sense. The plot is thrown out the window and substituted by
boring gore.
It would take hours to go through all my complaints about this piece of trash.
The actors, effects and artistic vision are all completely wasted when the
film jumps off the cliff into its ocean of mindless carnage. The auspicious
beginning only creates a stronger sense of betrayal as the movie collapses
under the weight of blood and guts and gorged out eyeballs.
If you want to see some extraordinary visuals, go and walk out after about an
hour. You won't have missed a thing.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 21% of a century and rarely
has he seen a film that was such a disappointment.  Email notes of sympathy to mredman@bvoice.com)
[This appeared in the 8/22/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
People do weird stuff. This is one of the few indisputable facts about
human beings.
Your electrician builds altars to small furry woodland animals. Your son's
teacher dresses in an outlandish costume and screams with a frantic rock and
roll band. Your waiter is preparing for the end of civilization. No matter
where you are, some of your neighbors are involved in practices most people
would consider bizarre if they only knew about them.
Most of these are harmless. Some are even beneficial. But then, there's that
rich industrialist on the other side of town who's making snuff films.
Private investigator Tom Welles (Nicolas Cage) runs into that situation when a
wealthy just-widowed woman hires him. She's found a reel of film in her
husband's secret safe that seemingly depicts the actual killing of a young
girl. She wants to know if it's real and what it's doing there.
This begins Tom's journey into the seamy world of hard-core fetish porn. He
hires Max California (Joaquin Phoenix), an adult bookstore clerk who reads
Norman Mailer hidden behind an X-rated novel, as a guide through the strange land.
Snuff films are the urban legend of pornography. Extreme S&M movies, they end
with the authentic death of one of the participants. Rumored to exist for
decades, not a single genuine example has ever been found. The one Tom is
investigating appears to be the real McCoy.
Each stop on the tour of the grotesque takes him one step closer to the
producers of the depravity. And one step closer to total obsession with
avenging the girl he's never met. Even after learning of the extreme danger
he's in, he can't give up the case.
Director Joel Schumacher takes the term "noir" literally. Not only is this a
very gloomy story, it's an extremely dark screen. The predominate color in
every scene is black. At times the dimly lighted film resembles the garish
grainy film stock of its title.
Although his life with his wife and infant daughter presumably illustrate
Tom's "normal" side, you wouldn't be surprised to find Hannibal Lecter behind
the bedroom door. Like the rest of the film, even Tom calmly raking leaves in
his front yard feels creepy.
His supposedly loving relationship with his wife is an odd one. He limps in
bleeding from a head wound, having narrowly escaped being murdered, and her
first reaction is "How can you treat me like this?" If his home life is Tom's
reason to live, it's no wonder he spends most of his time at work.
The highly stylized episodes searching for the killers fare better. When Tom
and Max voyage into the underground basement flea market of vendors selling
"Way beyond XXX" wares, the scenes could have come from Fellini's "Satyricon".
There's so much going on that it's difficult to take it all in.
When the investigator finally tracks down the director of the film in a
decrepit warehouse, the images are some of the most disturbing since "Blue
Velvet". This is not a "feel-good" movie. It may even define the tiny genre of
"anti-date film".
As well-crafted as the visuals are, the film has some problems. Tom's
character isn't very defined and some of his actions seem out of place. For
some reason, there are two different times where the suspense depends upon him
straining to get to a gun out of reach.
Cage is well-casted as the placid detective with obsession just below the
surface. He has a reputation for playing offbeat characters and can add Tom to
the list. It's certainly not one of his more recent action hero roles.
Phoenix adds a needed comedic touch to a film that otherwise might have
drowned in its own bleakness. James Gandolfini and Peter Stormare are
stand-outs as the vile but fascinating smut producers. Watching them is like
driving by the proverbial car wreck.
I don't think I'll ever want to see this film again. It's an ugly depressing
movie that makes you feel like taking a long shower to wash off the scum. It
is worth a viewing if you want to deal with it. Sometimes art isn't pretty.
(Michael Redman has written this column for two and three-tenths decades. He
took two showers and slept with the light on. Email your secret activities to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 3/4/99 "Bloomington Independent, Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Trekkies (1997)
"Reality is a crutch for those who can't handle science fiction" reads a
t-shirt that has been in production in one design or another for decades.
Although you could substitute "soap operas", "gardening", "guns", "rock and
roll", "politics" or any number of other pastimes for "science fiction", sf
fans are a special breed. And "Star Trek" fans are a unique mutation within
that species.
Director Roger Nygard and Denise Crosby (Tasha Yar from "Next Generation")
traveled the convention circuit interviewing fans and have come up with some doozies.
Probably the most famous is Barbara Adams, chosen for jury duty in the
Whitewater trial. Wearing her Starfleet Commander's uniform to the courtroom,
she seemed oblivious to the incongruity of the situation. "I'm an officer of
the Federation 24 hours a day," she explains, "Every day I would walk past the
reporters with a Vulcan-like stoicism."
Sometimes the film takes a loving look at the phenomenon. Nichelle Nichols of
the original series tells of a very young Whoopie Goldberg who ran screaming
through the house shouting, "Everybody come look! There's a black lady on
television and she ain't a maid!"
Unfortunately, too often the film presents the fans like a freak show and I
found myself cringing in a combination of fascination and embarrassment. A man
speaks of having his ears surgically altered to look like Spock. A woman
exhibits her hundreds of nearly identical photographs of Brent Spiner (Data)
and talks about gazing at the hill near which Spiner lives.
Fourteen year old Gabriel Koerner sits at his computer creating wondrous
graphics, but he is so self-satisfied about his collection that you hope, if
he were in the series, he'd be the extra who beamed down to the strange planet
never to return.
I may have never said this about a film before, but as the camera pours over
the minutia of a Treked-out dentist office, you have to wonder why this is a
movie. It'll be a hoot as a video, but in the theater I felt trapped.
(Michael Redman has written this column for a very long time and confesses to
having seen every "Star Trek" episode several times...well, except some of
those from "Deep Space Nine".)
[This appeared in the 6/3/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Straight Story, The (1999)
Lynch's lawnmower leisurely triumphant
At times we feel an overwhelming drive to put our lives in order. The
compulsion might follow a traumatic incident or it might be a change in
the seasons that triggers the need. Whatever the catalyst, we attempt to
right previous wrongs and clean our psychic house.
Many people delay until later -- sometimes much later. Often so
much later that we never get around to it. How many people lie on their
death beds with thoughts of "I should have..."?
Alvin Straight (Richard Farnsworth) is a lucky man. He's made it to 73
and still has an opportunity to make his pilgrimage. Based on a true
story, "The Straight Story" is touching and to the point.
Alvin's journey of spiritual reconciliation takes an unusual form. He
drives a John Deere lawn mower 350 miles across Iowa to his own personal
Mecca of Mt. Zion, Wisconsin. Alvin needs to visit his estranged ailing
brother to set things right and he can't put it off much longer. He has
to do it on his own, even without a driver's license, so he resorts to
the bizarre form of transportation.
The six-week trip through the Iowan cornfields and small towns in the
autumn is presented at a leisurely pace, well suited to the speed of the
mower towing a trailer three times its size. The camera pans slowly from
Alvin, across the fields, up into the sky and then back to the road
where he has progressed 20 feet. The luscious cinematography perfectly
illustrates the slowness of the trip.
As you might expect, Alvin encounters an assortment of characters during
his trek. A pregnant teenage hitchhiker, a Catholic priest, volunteer
firefighters: they all take to him like they would a long-lost
grandfather. And with good reason. Farnsworth is the guy everyone dreams
about having as an older relative. Homespun and stubborn, he has a
lifetime of experience in the real world.
A few scenes are real tearjerkers. Hanging out in a bar with a fellow WW
II vet, they exchange war horror stories. On a very personal level, they
reveal how combat changed them forever.
Asked the worst part of being old, Alvin replies "Remembering when you
were young." You know he means it and it captures an aspect of elderly
melancholy, but as he reminds his daughter, "I'm not dead yet."
We have come to expect the occasional effective feel-good down-home film
from Disney Studios. This is exactly one of those. Alvin is an old guy,
but he's full of life. Facing a struggle, he attacks it with the courage
of the young. The awe and wonderment of a child are still alive within him.
Here's the shocker: it's directed by David Lynch. Yes, David Lynch of
"Blue Velvet" and "Twin Peaks" fame. David Lynch who has delighted in
showing us the perverted underbelly of America now celebrates an
ordinary man. He does it to perfection.
There are a few Lynchian scenes that could have come from his previous
films. A woman hits a deer on the highway and rants about how she loves
deer but this is the 13th one within the past few weeks. Twin lawnmower
repair brothers work on Alvin's vehicle. One of them has a piece of
metal embedded in his cheek and no explaination is offered. Some of the
characters are just a nudge out of kilter.
Somehow they all fit. There are indeed odd people out in the cornfields,
but that doesn't make them any less real. They are more human because of
their weird touches, not less.
Although Farnsworth owns the lion's share of the screen in his best role
since "The Grey Fox", the supporting cast is equally impressive. Sissy
Spacek as his possibly-mentally challenged daughter is totally
believable in her understated role. Harry Dean Stanton as Alvin's
brother Lyle is as convincing as could be. Other bit parts are played by
actors that Lynch could have found out in those Great Plains.
Alvin was lucky. He put off getting right with himself until he was 73.
Some of us might not have so long.
(Michael Redman has been writing this column for nearly two and a half
decades. He plans on being a crotchety old man, but maybe not in the
next couple of weeks. Email tales of cornfields to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 11/11/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at mailto:redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
This week's Y2K article: http://www.indepen.com/
Y2K archives: http://www.indepen.com/y2k.html

Title
Review for Sleepers (1996)
It's about time! After sitting through weeks of decidedly mediocre
films, we've finally got a winner.
Based on the best-selling (and reportedly true) novel and directed by
Barry Levinson ("Diner", "Good Morning Vietnam", "Rain Man", "The
Natural"), this disturbing film is certainly the best thing currently on
the screen. It may be the best movie of the year so far.
Following the life of four men, the story begins in the tough Hell's
Kitchen neighborhood of New York where the boys are treading a fine line
between the influences of their priest Father Bobby (Robert DeNiro) and
King Benny, the local mob chieftain. They're experiencing the typical
city kid life until the hot summer day in 1966 when their lives change
forever.
A petty theft that goes wrong and almost kills a man results in the boys
being sent to the Wilkinson Reform School. While at the detention
center, the boys are abused in every possible way by the guards, lead by
a particularly sinister Kevin Bacon.
The rest of the movie takes place years later in 1981 when two of the
boys, grown to become amoral killers, run into Bacon in a bar, pull out
their guns and murder him where he sits. Their other two friends, a
reporter and an attorney in the district attorneys office, scheme to
set the killers free and expose the evils of the reform school.
The central theme of the film is revenge and how much of a soul is
traded away to achieve it. Is it legitimate to lie, cheat and steal in
order to punish a greater wrong? Father Bobbys decision is especially
agonizing: the man versus the church.
The film is so powerful in its images and concepts that some scenes are
tremendously uncomfortable to watch. The abuses, while not graphic, are
some of the most intensely effective moments in cinema.
Rarely do we see a film with so many elements going for it. The actors,
DeNiro, Dustin Hoffman, Brad Pitt and the rest, are all wonderful. The
story is riveting; the cinematography, excellent and the direction,
engrossing.  It took days to get the pictures out of my mind. And thats
a good thing.
[This appeared in "The Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana,
10/24/96. Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for My Fellow Americans (1996)
After watching this film, I can't get the phrase "The Odd Grumpier Old
Presidential Couple" out of my head. Jack Lemon and James Garner make an
engaging pair in this latest incarnation of quarreling buddies on the
run films. =
The film features more US presidents than you can shake a stick at.
Garner is former Democratic president Matt Douglas, a charming ladies
man who desperately wants another run at the office. Lemon plays former
Republican president Russell Kramer who keeps in the public eye by
writing cookbooks  and making appearances at the drop of a hat. Their
nemesis is current president and Kramer=92s former VP William Haney (Dan
Aykroyd). Haney's second in command and presidential heir apparent Ted
Matthews (John Heard) is a dim bulb that you know couldn't spell potato.
Douglas is promised his party's backing if he can get the goods on a
kickback charge against Kramer. He's disappointed when it turns out that
Kramer is being set up by Haney and then investigation takes a nasty
turn when government agents kill his only witness. =
Their luck deteriorates when the helicopter in which the former chief
executives are traveling explodes out of the sky. Lost in the wilds of
North Carolina, the two are hiding out from the killer G-men as they try
to prove their case.
There aren't many better actors around than Lemon and about the only
more likable screen presence in existence than Garner is Wilfred Brimley
(who has a small part as Demo party chairman). When the two are on the
screen together the movie sings. But when anyone else intrudes into the
scenes, the song turns sour.
Although the film pokes fun at both parties, what passes for political
satire is far too mild. The possibilities are passed by. Especially
tedious is an extended episode where they are given a ride by "ordinary
Americans" who proceed to demonstrate how out of touch politicians are
with the people. Heavy hitting stuff here.
The two hitch a ride on a train full of sports fans which is as
unhumorous as it sounds. Of course there's the obligatory car chase as
they bang into things and knock down even bigger things. All road films
lend themselves to short episodes in various locales. Here they go from
bad to worse.
As good as Lemon and Garner are together, Aykroyd is a stiff. His career
was on fire during his stints at "Saturday Night Live" and as a Blues
Brother, but recently his movie roles have lacked any life. Almost
anyone could have been casted here and been better.
The two stars demonstrate some chemistry together and do the best they
can with a script that could have used some extensive work. This is a
prime example that there are some works of literature so lame that
nothing can make them shine.
[This appeared in the 12/19/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Conspiracy Theory (1997)
Fluoride in the water is a secret government conspiracy to weaken our minds.
NASA attempted to assassinate the president with an earthquake. The Grateful
Dead were actually engaged in clandestine covert operations. Lee Harvey Oswald
didn't act alone. Jack Ruby didn't kill Oswald because Ruby wasn't the gunman
and the victim wasn't Oswald in the first place. The Vietnam War wasn't really
fought to save the world from the evil empire of communism.
Believe any of these? Meet Jerry Fletcher, New York cabbie and self-styled
conspiracy expert. He believes them all - and hundreds more. And he's out to
convince everyone else. Sitting in the back seat of his hack is an exercise in
endurance as his mouth runs faster than the vehicle.
Fletcher (Mel Gibson) is living proof that just because you're paranoid
doesn't mean that "They" aren't out to get you. Shortly after he mails the
latest issue of his conspiracy newsletter to all of the five subscribers, four
of them end up dead and he is kidnapped and tortured in an abandoned lab. He
must have stumbled onto a true one, but he can't figure out which.
Turning to the only person he trusts, Justice Department investigator Alice
Sutton (Julia Roberts), he entices her to help him. What she doesn't know is
that Fletcher has been secretly in love with her since he saved the agent from
a mugging and sits outside her apartment at night watching her jogging on a treadmill.
Pairing Roberts and Gibson is a natural. The attractive but daffy victim and
the brave levelheaded savior is a tried-and-true film formula. The difference
here is that Gibson is the ditz. It's difficult to tel when he is dazed and
confused from the drugs injected by his interrogators and his natural mania.
Half way through the film, the plot takes a left-hand turn and an unlikely
conspiracy that Fletcher never saw coming reveals itself. This new information
explainswell, not everything, but a lot. It also completely changes the
direction of the movie.
Gibson takes his crazed "Lethal Weapon" (also directed by this film's Richard
Donner) character and amps him into over-drive. Although uncomfortable to
watch at times in the same way that being trapped in real life by a motor
mouth who wants to tell you all about it is, his performance is compelling.
Roberts is much more interesting in this type of role than the "Pretty
Woman"esque parts she is popular for. Her character is only a bit more
grounded in reality than Gibson's. For an experienced Federal Agent, she is
remarkably naive, believing outrageous lies by the bad guys and making huge
leaps of faith. Sutton isn't very realistic, but then neither are the
governmental cover-ups in our world.
Patrick Stewart as Dr. Jonas, the ultra-mysterious spook, is surprisingly able
to shed his Captain Piccard image, not an easy task when his voice instantly
brings the "Star Trek" bridge to mind. Jonas is not one of the good guys and
heads a faction of the intelligence community devoted to...something that's
not very nice.
The film rambles at times, but it does so at breakneck speed and intersperses
important developments with the inanity. You need to pay attention to follow
the story. There are problems, but they don't get in the way of the fun. The
ending is too "feel good" however sure to delight audiences. Very little is
realistic, but name a Mel Gibson film that is.
You may not walk away believing all of Jerry Fletcher's ideas, but you will
probably have a suspicion that all is not as it appears. I think you'd
probably be right.
(The Michael Redman who wrote this column is the same one who began writing
them over 21 years ago. Or is he? Even he's not too sure. Email to
mredman@bvoice.com _might_ reach him - or someone.)
[This appeared in the 8/14/97 "Bloominton Voice". Michael Redman can be
reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Snake Eyes (1998)
Personal morals live in a foggy area. Sins for one person are virtues for
another. What would be wrong at one time becomes acceptable under different
circumstances. Our youthful idealism is often compromized as life goes on.
Stealing is dishonest, but there's that proverbial loaf of bread and starving
family. And so it goes. Situational ethics can be a slippery slope and
sometimes there's a deciding moment where a decision must be made.
Atlantic City police detective Nick Santoro (Nicolas Cage) has slid down that
slope about as far as he can. The archetypal corrupt cop, he doesn't just look
the other way, he is the other way. He shakes down a drug dealer, puts big
money on a prize fight, accepts thousands of dollars in bribes and has a
girlfriend that his wife doesn't know about. Strutting about in a Hawaiian
shirt like the loud fast-talking cock of the walk, his ambition is to become
mayor of his "sewer"  of a town. He's not worried about consequences, because
"If there's one thing I know, it's how to cover my ass."
 Clean-cut Navy Commander Kevin Dunne (Gary Sinise) has invited his old buddy
Santoro to the heavyweight fight where Dunne is head of security for the
Secretary Of Defense who is also in attendance.
The action is fast and furious. Hurricane Jezebel rages through the streets
while boxer Lincoln Tyler (Stan Shaw) is defending his title.Dunne is
distracted by a red-head with deep cleavage who doesn't seem "right" and
leaves to follow her. A buxom (this attribute seems as common as poker chips
in the city) blonde sits next to Santoro and turns to talk to the Secretary.
The champ is felled by a phantom blow. Shots ring out from across the arena.
The Secretary is hit. The blonde catches a bullet in the shoulder and flees in
a blood-splattered white blouse. More shots and the assassin falls, dead,
through shattered glass.
Dunne and Santoro take charge of the investigation after bullying the state
officials and lock 14,000 people in the building. It seems that the killer is
a lone gunman, a nutcase political terrorist with a history of making threats. 
It all falls into place quickly but it's a little too easy for the detective.
Something just doesn't make sense to him. He has hung out with enough of them
to know exactly what a rat smells like. Things are not what they seem. People
are not what they seem. Even the blonde is not what she seems.
Most of the actors over-play their roles, but that's part of the
entertainment. Cage is enjoyable in his bigger than life character. He's been
this person before and has the part down. Sinise does well although Dunne is a
bit too stiff to believe. Carla Gugino plays the mysterious faux blonde with a
quirky style that is easy to warm up to.
Taking place in almost real time, the movie doesn't give us a chance to
breathe. If you look away for a few seconds, you're likely to miss important
details. But don't worry, not watching is the last thing the audience will do
as the action jumps off the screen. The film never stops moving.
Veteran director Brian DePalma knows how to set a mood. Beginning with a
single twenty-minute shot of Santoro swaggering through the arena, the camera
is definitely the star of the show. Liberally using a subjective point of
view, he shows us the events through the eyes of several of the participants.
Each gives more clues as to what actually happened. There's a magnificent shot
from the ceiling that slowly moves from hotel room to hotel room. We see empty
rooms, an out-of-control party, intimate moments and finally a blonde washing
blood out of a white top.
There is an interesting point where duty, loyalty and personal ambitions come
into conflict. One of the characters knows the right thing to do. He also
knows the best thing for him. Unfortunately these are not the same. If there
is a theme to the film, this is it. When do you put aside your personal
interests for the benefit of others and the salvation of your own soul?
The scenes are so well constructed and the energy so frenzied that it's easy
to overlook the film's flaws. Until the ending. There are problems before
this. Although the true killer is revealed too soon, it's still great fun But
then there's that last ten minutes.
Without giving too much away, the film completely falls apart. The situation
is dire. Santoro is so beat up he can hardly walk, but he's attempting to save
the damsel in distress. The real killer is following him to eliminate his last
few witnesses. She's locked in a storage room and can't get out. The storm is
worse and explosions from the sky overwhelm the sound track. Electricity
sputters in the wet streets. The situation is tense.
And then? And then, events occur that have nothing to do with anything that
has happened previously and solve everything. Deus ex machina is a technique
used in poor novels and it doesn't work any better in films.
To make matters worse, there's another ending tacked on: a "several days"
later where one of the bad good guys gets his just desserts. If that's not
enough, there's yet another ending after that to provide the happy resolution
that Hollywood thinks audiences need.
Like far too many films, this could have been excellent with just a little
care. As it is, you'll have a good time during ninety percent of the movie,
but you'll leave saying "What were they thinking?"
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and finds that he
still is capable of being disappointed when something goes wrong. Email your
cinematic frustrations to redman@bvoice.com)
[This appeared in the 8/13/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Primal Fear (1996)
Richard Gere can be a commanding actor, but he's not always in great films.
Everything comes together here. Gere is a big time Chicago defense attorney
who takes on a seemingly unwinable case in hopes of even more publicity. It
doesn't go exactly as he expects.
Gere's client, Aaron (Edward Norton), is a shy stuttering Tennessee boy who is
accused of brutally murdering and mutilating a Catholic archbishop. The
evidence is stacked against him. He was caught running from the scene covered
in the bishop's blood. His bloody footprints are all over the murder scene. He
has a relationship with the priest.
Gere talks to the boy, believes that he is actually innocent and sets about
finding the real killer. Despite the lawyer's proclamations that he doesn't
care about the guilt of his clients and that the real thrill is gambling with
people's lives, he becomes involved with Aaron and is determined to free him.
Lots of complications and twists. The prosecuting attorney is Gere's former
co-worker and lover. They both work each other's motives to their legal
advantages and it gets messy. Her boss had major economic dealings with the
archbishop that went sour and seems to have crime connections. Aaron gets
weirder and weirder as the trial goes on. Gere's case is falling apart and he
is faced with about a dozen ethical dilemmas.
Gere is exceptional as the well-dressed reserved counselor, but just once, I
wanted to see him kick back and come out of his "suit" persona. Even when he
loses it, you don't see very far inside. Norton's Aaron is convincing: he
comes across as the backwoods kid misplaced in the big city. The supporting
cast does a fine job of holding together the story.
As with most of the effective courtroom dramas, the cinematography is crisp
and rich. The story will keep you on the edge of your seat. Nothing is what it seems.
[This appeared in the 4/11/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Striptease (1996)
The advertising campaigns for this are at least as interesting as the 
movie itself. First it was a "nekkid Demi Moore shaking her hooters" 
film with the previews demonstrating the two compelling reasons to see 
it. Having captured the male audience, the commercials began a "mother 
fighting for her daughter" approach to appeal to women.
Now it's a "comedy where you least expect it", grasping for yet another 
audience. Among the split personalities, "Striptease" has also been 
touted as "not 'Showgirls'!" Talk about damning with faint praise.
Moore's latest sure-to-be-blockbuster is all this and _less_. 
Erin Grant is a ex-FBI secretary (fired because she made a poor choice 
in husbands) turned stripper in order to win back custody of her 
daughter. The logic in that plan typifies the confusion of the entire 
film.
Among the colorful characters at the Eager Beaver, the club where she 
dances, is a fan who promises to help get her daughter back. He has the 
misfortune to end up floating in a nearby lake. Coincidentally this 
happened just after he tries to blackmail a US congressman sighted at 
the club.
More people associated with the representative end up dead and you begin 
to get the idea that everything may not be on the up and up. Golly! It 
turns out you were right and the Florida congressman is controlled by 
the evil sugar empire.
An almost unrecognizable Burt Reynolds turns in one of the oddest roles 
of his career as the drunken congressman David Dilbeck. Played for 
laughs, the character is occasionally hilarious, but the murders, his 
genuine sleaze and general worthlessness as a human being make it 
difficult to evoke much laughter.
Ving Rhames ("Pulp Fiction", "Mission: Impossible") is one of the few 
actors that come out of this looking good. As Shad, the strip club 
bouncer with a thing for roaches and yogurt, he shows a talent for dark 
comedy. Robert Patrick as Grant's ex livens up the screen: first as a 
frightening total jerk in his encounters with Moore and their daughter 
and then as a farcical total jerk as he mixes canine morphine and 
alcohol and flops from scene to scene.
Moore can act although certainly not well enough to deserve her highest 
paid actress in Hollywood status. Here she and everyone else struggle 
with a butchered script from a reportedly great book. The film moves 
from slapstick comedy to sordid and deadly political scandal to 
heartbreaking mother and daughter scenes without much finesse or 
success.
Despite its shortcomings, this film will surely make the big bucks as 
audiences flock to attend if for no other reasons than to discuss how 
many implants Demi has.
[Note: this appeared in "The Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana, 
7/4/96. Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Multiplicity (1996)
Mr. Mom has a lot on his hands nowadays and can't get to half of it.
His job requires more hours than are in the day and he just got
assigned even more responsibilities. His wife wants him to spend more
time at home and, by the way, could he finish building their
half-completed home? He misses his kids' sporting events and Brownie
graduation.
Sound familiar? Lack of time must be the disease of the nineties. No
one has the schedule to do it all.  Few have the ability to squeeze in
even the essentials, much less have any fun. When Doug Kinney (Michael
Keaton) is asked what he does to relax, he replies "golf". Questioned
about how often he plays, his response is "never". Welcome to the late
20th century, Doug, where all of our obligations and labor-saving
devices have conspired to steadily shrink the time where we do what we
really want to a scant few hours a week.
Doug can't deal and finds his magical way out one day while supervising
construction at a lab. It turns out that the facility specializes in
creating fully grown clones, so Doug takes home another Doug to help
him out. Doug Number Two is sent to work so that the original can get
his duties done at home.
But, even with two of them, there's still not enough time for golf and
Doug Number Three comes into the picture. Later, Two and Three still
can't get it all done so they duplicate Number Four from one of the
clones. As often happens, the copy of a copy isn't quite as sharp as
the original. No matter how many Dougs there are, the work load
increases to more than can be done.
The film wanders around during the first hour trying to set the stage
for the "message" before it finds its course. Only after the clones
exist is there much humor and the yucks are still fewer than you would
hope. The comedy is mostly various send-ups of the "Two dates in the
same night" scene you're well acquainted with. The only hilarious
scenes are with Number Four, but even then you stand the chance of
feeling guilty at laughing at a "special" (Uh oh, that's not the
correct _euphemism_d'_jour_, is it?) person.
Director Harold Ramis ("Ghostbusters", "Groundhog Day") has a feel for
the science fiction comedy and humorous bits, but these scenes (as well 
as "Groundhog Day") don't hold together as a whole.
He does successfully avoid one apparent pitfall in having four exact
copies of Doug. Instead of copies, which would become annoyingly
redundant, they are aspects of Doug, not actual clones. Number Two is
Manly Man Doug; Three, Feminine Side Doug and Four, Inner Child Doug.
This gives Keaton something to work with and he does so with competence
although nothing spectacular.
Andie MacDowell plays Laura, Doug's long-suffering (and never lets him
forget it) wife. The actress is mostly wasted as more a plot object for
the various Dougs to interact with than an actual human being.
MacDowell does nothing much for the film other than look as if she is
about to cry during every minute she's on screen.
Oh yeah, the message? If you want your woman to really love you, build
her a house.
[This originally appeared in "The Bloomington Voice", Bloomington,
Indiana, 7/26/96. Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Extreme Measures (1996)
Hugh Grant desperately wants the movie-going audience to think his first
name is "Cary". First we get the stumbling romantic-comedy leading man
from his past several films. Now we have the Hitchcockian thriller
detective. And he's really not too bad at either of them.
It's unfortunate that the rest of the film doesn't keep pace.
Grant is Guy Luthan, a surgeon in a busy New York hospital on the career
fast track. Everything is going along fine until an emergency room
patient with out of control symptoms and an undiagnosable disease dies.
His curiosity aroused, Luthan attempts to follow up, but finds records
lost, a mystery hospital ID bracelet and a vanished body. Something's
rotten in the state of medical care.
As he delves further into the mystery, Luthan's life is destroyed. The
cops plant drugs in his apartment and he is jailed. He loses his
prestigious position and his friends turn against him. Then it gets even
worse.
The question at the root of the film=92s moral dilemma is given away in
the previews: "If you could cure cancer by killing one person, wouldn't
you have to do it?" It turns out that Dr. Lawrence Myrick (Gene Hackman)
is conducting research on humans in order to further medical research. =
He's not killing just one person and he's not curing cancer, but you=92re=
supposed to consider the ethical costs of medical research. There's not
really much to ponder in this situaation. Despite Hackman's impassioned
speech, he's one of the bad guys.
The movie meanders around, never settling on one direction. For a while
it's a medical mystery, a thriller, a psychological horror film, and
even drifts off into almost a fantasy movie as Luthan is lead to an
underground civilization of "moles". While there are effective episodes
of each genre (the beginning scenes of two naked men clothed only in
strips of plastic running through the streets of New York are
particularly horrific), the different sections don=92t hold together.
Hackman's appearances are brief and not up to his usual skills. Sarah
Jessica Parker, in a stretch from her usual babe role, is cast against
type as Luthan=92s only friend. A courageous decision on her part, it is
not one that works. The rest of the characters are only here to further
the story, not to be people.
This first offering from Grant and girlfriend Elizabeth Hurley's
production company leaves a lot to be desired, but perhaps it serves its
function. When compared to such mediocre filmmaking around him, Grant
looks all the better.
[This review appeared in "The Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana,
10/10/96. Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Courage Under Fire (1996)
Denzel Washington is Lt. Col. Nat Sterling, a tank commander during the
Gulf War who accidentally fires on one of his own tanks, killing a good
friend.  After the war, Sterling is driven to alcoholism and
psychological self-destruction by the guilt. He's also dealing with his
investigation into whether Karen Walden (Meg Ryan), a chopper pilot,
should be awarded the Medal Of Honor posthumously.
Sterling's condition isn't helped by the fact that the rescue mission
Walden lead is shrouded in mystery. Every witness that he interviews
has a different version of the story. With each interview, the war is
replayed over and over to his horror. He pours himself into the puzzle
in order to dull his own pain, but it doesn't work and his
relationships with his wife and children drift further away.
This is the first war movie from the conflict in the Gulf and it does a
credible job of the battle scenes: dramatic and spectacular guns and
explosions juxtaposed with frightened and panicked soldiers trying to
survive.
The story of the investigation is intriguing. For some reason, everyone
is lying about what happened. It's unclear as to if Walden was a hero
or a coward.  As each version of the event is played, and each somewhat
different from the one before, the truth becomes more muddied and yet
adds one more piece of the jigsaw puzzle.
Washington turns in his usual fine performance. Ryan is surprisingly
convincing in a dramatic role, a stretch from her usual romantic comedy
parts. Most of the rest of the cast is excellent, especially Scott
Glenn as the "Washington Post" reporter. An exception is mission member
Lou Diamond Phillips who turns in a good performance but seems like
he's in a different movie.
That's the problem with too much of the film. Often the characters
don't seem as connected as you would expect them to be. Sterling and
his wife were supposedly once very close but now distanced, but there's
not much evidence of that closeness ever having existed. His
interaction with his commanding officer and friend is devoid of
emotion.
The film has a difficult time deciding what it is about. The two main
plots--Walden's story and Sterling's story--would each have been fodder
for a film.  Both in the same is a bit too much.
Great acting and a good tale, but with a few too many flaws to take
this movie where it could have gone.
[This originally appeared in "The Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana,
8/2/96. Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Payback (1999)
There's an ancient occult art know as "glamour". Casting a spell of glamour
creates an illusion that hides the truth. The enchantment can make the plain
appear beautiful and a falsehood seem real. Leading practitioners of glamour
in the late Twentieth Century include make-up manufacturers and those guys who
create film previews.
Trailers for "Payback" look like a light Mel Gibson shoot-'em-up -- "Lethal
Weapon 4 1/2". It's not light. Worse, it's not even entertaining. When the
spell of glamour wears off, the truth rears its ugly head and this truth's
name is "tedium".
Low-life crooks Porter (Gibson), wife Lynn (Deborah Kara Unger) and buddy Val
(Gregg Henry) pull off a successful big-time heist. Successful, that is, until
Lynn shoots him in the back. Miraculously Porter survives and he's not happy.
Working his way up the food chain of the crime "outfit," he's looking for his
$70,000. In typical Gibson fashion, he gets battered, bruised, shot, crippled
and keeps on coming.
This isn't an action film. It's a shoot people in the forehead, smash their
feet with a sledge hammer and kick them while they're down film. Then as an
added bonus, they do it some more, but bloodier.
There's a feeble attempt to create a noir atmosphere, but it rarely works.
It's difficult to care. To have an emotional investment in the characters, the
audience has to be able to identify with them. Anyone who can identify with
Porter is certainly not someone I'd invite over for dinner.
The one sympathetic person in the film is Rosie (Maria Bello). Unfortunately
she's a minor character and an overworked cliche: a high-priced hooker with a
heart of gold for her boyfriend.
Remarkably for a movie that's filled with such ultra-violence, it's a dull
experience. Although there are a few bits that will make you cringe, there's a
sameness to nearly every scene. The exceptions feature Lucy Liu as a flashy
S&M dominatrix. These few stylish moments are such stand-outs they feel
stapled on from another film.
Your mileage may vary. My companions gave "Payback" the high praise of "not
horrible". They were wrong: it is.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and has almost
recovered from a particularly vicious flu that he didn't enjoy much.
Redman@indepen.com) 
[This appeared in the 2/11/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Big Hit, The (1998)
The United States is touted as the great melting pot. In the grand scheme of
things, it's a relatively new country and once those pesky native inhabitants
were corralled, there was plenty of space for immigrants. Peoples from all
nations moved in and brought their cultures with them, mixing and merging with others.
Centuries ago blacks in New Orleans combined west African religions and
Catholicism to create voodoo. Some Native Americans combined their own beliefs
with ancient Celtic traditions and certain New Age tenets emerged. White kids
in southern Indiana of European descent are dressing like inner city New York
black kids of African ancestry. It's a strange world we live in Master Jack.
Sometimes these cultures blend to give birth to wonderful elegant new
creations and at other times the melting pot creates a bizarre gumbo. "The Big
Hit" is a stew with everything in the kitchen tossed in.
Melvin Smiley (Marky Mark Wahlberg who was the supposedly well-endowed lead
in "Boogie Nights") is a nice guy who wants everyone to like him. You might
think that his chosen profession as a hitman would create difficulties in that
goal. You'd be right.
Chantel (Lela Rochon), his black girlfriend is always after him for more
money which he hands right over. Pam (Christina Applegate), his Jewish fiancee
is used to the finer things in life and demands that he provide them. Business
associate Cisco (Lou Diamond Phillips) falsely claims that he made the bonus
kill and Melvin tosses $25,000 to him. Being well-liked is an expensive
proposition for Mr. Smiley and he's constantly swilling Maalox for his ulcers.
During an action-packed hit, Smiley wades in shooting and blowing up dozens
of gangsters while the other members of his team drink coffee outside and then
burst in pumping bullets into thin air. Theirs is an easy life as Melvin does
all the work and they collect their paychecks.
When Cisco comes up with a kidnapping scheme, he enlists his help although
outside activities are strictly forbidden by Paris (Avery Brooks), their boss.
They pick up fellow hitmen Crunch (Bokeem Woodbine), Vinnie (Antonio Sabato,
Jr.) and Gump (Robert Dunne) and head off to snatch Keiko (China Chow),
daughter of a wealthy Japanese businessman.
In the current cinematic tradition of stupid criminals and crimes gone wrong,
the plan falls apart. Keiko's father is recently bankrupt and has no money for
the kidnappers. The note that she is supposed to read into a tape recorder is
full of misspellings and grammatical errors. Smiley has to hide her in his
house as his future in-laws visit. Even worse, it turns out that she is Paris' goddaughter.
Keiko quickly falls victim to the Patty Hearst syndrome and falls for her
captor. After a few humorous romantic moments, they plan to run away together.
When Paris calls in Cisco to find Keiko and "take care of" her abductors, he
fingers Smiley to save his own hide. The rest of the film is filled with an
absurd number of bullets, over-the-top car chases and wacky comedy.
Director Che-Kirk Wong and Executive Producer John Woo ("Face/Off") do their
best to combine the high energy Hong Kong martial arts films with Hollywood
sensibilities and they often succeed. The action scenes are filled with
energetic and physically impossible deeds. As Smiley does double twists
falling through the air, shooting and tossing grenades, he takes out a dozen
opponents. He's one of the few humans in existence who can outrun an explosive
fireball - several times.
Where the film falls down is several of the attempts to incorporate domestic
humor. The scenes of Pam's parents (Elliott Gould and Lainie Kazan) are lame
and you've seen it all before. The synchronized suburban lawn mowers are
straight out of "LA Story". Most of the ineptness was done better by the Coen
brothers. Crunch has discovered the joys of self-love and spends most of the
movie with hand exercise equipment. This grows less funny each time it appears.
Although those are problems, the film's strength is its knowledge that the
action scenes are ridiculous. There is no attempt to play them straight and
often they are hilarious.
Wahlberg does an adequate job as the assassin trapped in the circumstances of
his own choosing. Phillips takes over the screen as he does his best to play
Gary Oldman. Chow shows some promise and is worth keeping an eye on in the
future. The rest of the actors are either underwhelming or wasted in minuscule roles.
The racial mix is exploited for its stereotypes. WASP Smiley's bevy of babes
are true to their caricature versions. Pam's mother forbids their marriage
because he isn't Jewish and they must protect their heritage. Chantel is only
in it for the money. Keiko dresses in the Japanese fetish schoolgirl uniform.
Gold-toothed Lou Diamond Phillips has somehow become a black man in all but
skin color and has the best scenes in the film. One of the hitmen is as white
as can be but attempts to act black although he can't pull it off. 
While this concept could have resulted in some funny low-grade laughs, with
few exceptions they don't work.
The movie industry has fallen in love with the daft hitman in recent years.
It's an offbeat genre but recently we've been treated to "Fargo" and "Grosse
Pointe Blank" among several others. The idea has resulted in some fine films,
but its era has just about passed. Time for a new concept.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and still doesn't
plan to start wearing his pant down around his knees in gangsta style. He has
enough problems as it is. Email fashion tips to redman@bvoice.com)
[This appeared in the 4/30/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Living Out Loud (1998)
Middle-aged Judith Nelson (Holly Hunter) is finally discovering what life is
about. Until this point, she's been sheltered by her own choices. "At least
I'm married. At least I'm safe." Now that her cardiologist husband has left
her for a younger woman, she's on her own and it's frightening.
Like many others in life-changing situations, she becomes numbed. Confused as
to what to do, she sits alone in her apartment watching television and eating
dinners for one. When she ventures out to a jazz club and is accidentally
kissed by a total stranger, she awakens to the world around her.
On returning to her building, she notices elevator operator Pat (Danny DeVito)
for the first time. He's not her type, but they become close friends: two
lonely people huddled together for comfort.
Pat's unrequited lover for Judith is painful to watch. He's willing to do
anything for her although he realizes that there is little chance that she
will ever return his affections. You'll cringe as she sends for a buffed-up
"masseuse" who promises to deliver extra services and Pat has to let him in
and out of the building.
Judith experiments with her new world. She returns to the club in search of
that perfect stranger. She never re-connects with him but does form a
friendship with singer Liz Bailey (Queen Latifah), a woman she would never
have met previously. Later she takes an unidentified drug (probably XTC) and
can't resist briefly touching Pat, giving him false hope. Then she heads out
to a lesbian disco with Liz. She's alive for the first time, but she's not
sure where she's going.
Pat is DeVito's best role to date. Understated, he is a real person: desperate
but not blind. Hunter comes across as a three-dimensional woman. 
Unfortunately she's also something of an irritating character and not nearly
as easy to warm up to as DeVito. Queen Latifah is a surprisingly impressive actress.
First-time director Richard LaGravenese has had extraordinary success as a
scriptwriter with "The Fisher King", "The Horse Whisperer" and "Bridges Of
Madison County". He can add this tale of forlorn people in the early stages of
coming alive to the list.
[This appeared in the 11/12/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Jumanji (1995)
        A compelling board game, buried decades before, is found by a young boy in a
construction site and has more in store for him than a couple hours of parlor
fun. As he discovers when he and a friend begin playing, dice rolls result in
the appearance of jungle creatures. Worse yet, when the youngster lands on a
particularly fateful square, he is literally whisked away to a jungle where he
must remain until another player roles specific numbers.
        Twenty six years later, two more kids discover the game, unplayed since the
disappearance of our hero. They began playing, roll the magic number, and
Robin Williams, grown older in the jungle, materializes.
        The three then discover an overlooked rule. The effects of the game stay
around until the game is finished. With a horde of murderous tropical animals
and insects loosened upon the town, they find Williams' opponent (Bonnie Hunt)
from his childhood and vow to finish. With each roll of the dice, more animals
and disasters show up, but they must continue in order for them to disappear.
        Based on a popular children's book, the film is a lark. The action is
formulaic (roll the dice, monsters appear, run from them, set up the game
again, roll the dice again, and on), but not so much that it gets in the way
of the fun.
        What does detract from the movie is the computer animated animals. Maybe it's
just me, but I hate computer animation of familiar living things. The effects
in Star Wars are dramatic and remarkably successful partially because we
don't have a preconception of those space ships and aliens. They look real to
us because it is the first time that we are seeing them.
        But we all know what monkeys and lions look like. In order for a scene to be
successful, it must involve you seamlessly. You must think: `There's a lion;
it's chasing them and might hurt them'. It can't go: `There's a lion. Oh yeah,
it's computer generated and not a bad job. It looks mostly real, but doesn't
move quite right and has some quirks. It's chasing them and might hurt them.'
The acknowledgment of the existence of the effect pulls you back from the
story and reminds you that you are really just sitting in a theater watching a movie.
        Don't let my rants about the evils of using technology before it has advanced
far enough to actually work deter you from seeing Jumanji. It's an
exciting entertaining film, worth your time.
[This appeared in the 12/22/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Rage: Carrie 2, The (1999)
"There's nothing new under the sun" is a phrase often used when the speaker
actually means "Let's find something to copy."
Of course there are very few completely original ideas. Even earth-shattering
concepts are built upon the vast body of human experience. There is, after
all, no need to re-invent the wheel time after time.
Recently it seems that Hollywood doesn't feel the need to even re-write the script.
My understanding of the word "sequel" is a continuation of the story. The film
industry has defined the word to mean reshooting the original with minor changes.
Have an overwhelming desire to see an inferior version of Brian DePalma's
adaptation of the Steven King novel? This is your dream come true.
Rachel (Emily Bergl), a high school outcast, is beginning to notice weird
things happening around her. Doors slam shut by themselves. Glass globes blow up.
Her mother has severe mental problems and her father is absent. A popular boy
unexpectedly asks her out. The in-crowd conspires to embarrass her at a public event.
Once the audience catches on that this is the same story as "Carrie", there's
little to do but wait for the inevitable ending. The effects are a bit better
this time around, but the film doesn't work nearly as well.
There are a couple of minor plot differences. Rachel lives with foster parents
because her mother is institutionalized. The boys at her school are portrayed
as even more evil than in the original. They keep score of their scoring with
points given for each conquest. And, uh, there must be other story changes but
none stand out.
One nice touch is the casting of Amy Irving again as Sue Snell. Over 20 years
ago she was the one girl who tried to help Carrie. Now a high school
counselor, she befriends Rachel, but her character's potential is squandered.
There's too much about Sue that doesn't make sense. After the slaughter when
Carrie kills most of her classmates, Sue is driven mad and spends time in the
institution that Rachel's mother is in. Still living in the same small town,
the woman with a well-known history of mental problems is hired as a high
school counselor?
Sue tells Rachel that her telekinesis is a genetic disease. This may be the
one original idea in the film, but the reasoning behind describing psychic
powers as a "disease" is never explained.
Sue's eventual fate is an admission by director Katt Shea and writer Rafael
Moreu that they had an interesting character but couldn't figure out what to
do with her. Blink and you'll miss it.
Some of the events are filmed in black and white, but the rationale for this
is unknown. It doesn't add anything and the choice of scenes appears somewhat random.
"The Rage" retains some of the trappings of "Carrie" without the meaning. In
the first film the color red was a motif connected to Carrie's onset of powers
at the same time she began menstruating. Here there's an abundance of red, but
for no apparent purpose.
The casting of high school jocks and cheerleaders as villains is beginning to
wear thin. One might be lead to suspect that most filmmakers were unpopular in
school and the history of teenage films is an extended cinematic revenge of
the nerds.
The biggest mistake the film makes is including clips of the original. Seeing
Sissy Spacek on the screen only points to the quality of that film - and the
flaws in this one.
(Michael Redman has written this column since "Carrie" was released and
thought about just re-writing his review of it for "The Rage". Email copies of
old letters to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 3/18/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Primary Colors (1998)
Clinton...err, Stanton, flies his colors
There's a popular maxim that the American public gets exactly the politicians
that it deserves. It's difficult to judge the truth of that because the masses
never really see these men and women, only their public faces. The demand that
they live the life of saints has created a situation where everyone in office
must lie in order to remain there.
The film from the novel by  (no longer) "Anonymous" (former "Newsweek" writer
Joe Klein) follows the presidential primary campaign of Jack Stanton (John
Travolta), a very thinly disguised Bill Clinton. Although the book is loosely
based on Clinton's 1992 campaign, it would be a mistake to take it as truth.
Some events are drawn from reality; others are completely fictional.
Told from the point of view of Henry (a darker George Stephanopoulos) Burton
(Adrian Lester), the story is one of difficult decisions. Burton is an
idealistic young black man drafted into the position of campaign manager for
the southern governor. At first he is excited about working for a man who
matches his vision. After a series of scandals, he has to re-think his
position and determine how much he is willing to bend to get his candidate elected.
Charismatic Stanton has a thing for the ladies. He's shown bedding down the
head of a teacher's union, accused of fathering the child of a teenage girl
and is the subject of a Gennifer Flowers lookalike's tabloid tale. Although
potentially a fatal flaw for a politician, his uncontrolled libido is not the
moral dilemma at the core of the film.
Is it justifiable for a politician to tell something different from the
truth? What is the high ground in terms of dealing with damaging personal dirt
about your opponent? These are the major issues at stake.
Stanton genuinely cares about the common man. In a scene reminiscent of
Edward Hopper's painting "Nighthawks", he sits in a Krispy Kreme doughnut shop
in the middle of the night listening to the lone employee explain how he has
to work impossibly long hours just to make ends meet. To demonstrate his
concern and get elected, the would-be president fabricates stories about his
past during speeches. They could have been true, they just aren't.
When campaign investigator Libby Holden (Kathy Bates), a stand-in for real
life Betsy Wright, comes up with information that would sink his opponent
there is the question about what to do with it. Stanton has refused to "go
negative" previously, but this material would guarantee his victory.
Is Stanton God or Satan? It turns out, like politicians in the real world,
he's neither. Admirably the film doesn't provide easy answers, but we do see
that idealism and politics are not good bedfellows...although other campaign
workers might be.
That politicians and their staff are human beings might come as a surprise to
many people. The media and the public tend to see them as symbols and forget
that there's flesh and blood there. If a friend has an extra-marital affair,
it's unfortunate, Maybe the couple can work things out and if not, well, it
happens every day. If the President of the United States does the same thing,
there's moral outrage. In "Primary Colors", the characters are people:
sometimes noble and certainly flawed.
Remembering my experiences as a minor staffer during a congressional race
years ago, the behind the scenes look feels realistic. Nothing is as organized
and unified as it appears from the outside. The intense feelings and abrupt
coming and going of staff members seem about right. It's not a shock when
co-workers end up in bed together.
Director Mike Nichols ("The Graduate", "The Birdcage") has a remarkable cast
here. Billy Bob Thornton who has burst on the cinema scene like a house afire
during the past year plays self-proclaimed redneck spin doctor Henry Burton
Jemmons (or maybe it's James Carville). Emma Thompson is Stanton's wife Hilary
-- err, Susan. Florida governor Fred Picker (possibly inspired by Jerry Brown)
is portrayed by Larry Hagman who has turned out to be quite the talent after
his mundane years on television.
Travolta is outstanding as the good ol' boy with an apple fritter in one
hand, a greasy chicken leg in the other and always talking the talk. Gnawing
on a rib held in his hands, you can tell that he's filled with a gusto for
being alive. That zest is what gets him into trouble, but it's also what gets
him elected. Travolta is one of those actors with such a presence that
sometimes he's "John Travolta" rather than the character. It's a testament to
his skills that just minutes after the film starts, you forget the actor and
see Jack Stanton.
The real standout is Bates. Her inspired off-the-wall (judged safe for the
campaign because, after all, she's been out of the mental institution for
months) pistol-toting lesbian has a fire in her belly for truth and justice.
She dominates every scene she's in. Her sexual persuasion is handled well in a
matter of fact manner. When Burton discovers the actual relationship with her
beautiful "assistant" (Stacy Edwards), it gets no more than a raised eyebrow.
Although you can look for Academy Awards acting nominations next spring,
there are odd moments. When the bigger than life Travolta, Thornton or Bates
is on-screen with some of the lesser-skilled others, the contrast is sometimes
jarring.  Lester's adequate performance appears flat when compared.
Clinton's popularity seemingly results from his persona as a real person.
This might mark a turning point in America's future. Politicians as human
beings? Who would have thunk it?
"Michael Redman's thoughtful analysis of the Oscars Presentation"
Only in Hollywood could they take such a lively art form and turn it into
such a boring non-event. It was the "Anti-Titanic".
(Michael Redman has written this column for 23 years and it might be that long
again before he watches another awards show.)
[This appeared in the 3/26/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com)
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Eraser (1996)
Another Arnold Schwarzenegger movie and this time with even _Bigger
Guns_.
(I am tempted to end right here. That one sentence just about says it
all.)
This time around Ah-nold is an FBI agent who specializes in creating new
identities for and guarding high-profile participants in the
government's witness protection program. His assignment is Vanessa
Williams who has a computer disk filled with secrets (doesn't everybody
nowadays?) about her former employer.
The company, along with key officials in the FBI and Defense Department,
is set to sell enormous amounts of the newest high-tech monster
electro-magnetic guns to the big bad terrorist. Our hero and damsel in
distress have to stop them virtually single-handedly.
There's nothing remarkably new here. In fact several key plot elements
are repeated from "Mission Impossible". Not to give too much away, but
there's a mole in the organization, Schwarzenegger is suspect and guess
who the real traitor is. There's even the same scene where he escapes a
situation by shooting through a glass wall and creates a giant flood;
here, complete with alligators.
The role is not a stretch for the body builder. It's not much different
from any of his others, but he has that one persona mastered. Williams
is adequate, but not more, in the obligatory babe in danger identity.
The best acting comes from James Caan, but even he has been better.
James Coburn is charismatic, but has only a bit part.
The comic sidekick is Robert Pastorelli (Elliot in "Murphy Brown") as
Johnny C who brings a group of Mafioso in to help out. More like violent
Three Stooges than threatening crime lords, these wiseguys provide some
of the best scenes.
In order to enjoy a Schwarzenegger film, you have to suspend
disbelief...and logic and the laws of physics and any hope for a story
that makes sense. But if you can do that, you'll enjoy scenes like the
one where he dives out of a jet, catches up with a parachute in midair
and then has a shoot-out with the plane.
Nothing amazing, not even a great Arnold movie, but catch it at a
matinee and it's worth the price of admission if no-brain action is what
you're looking for.
[Note: this appeared in "The Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana,
6/27/96, Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com)

Title
Review for 10 Things I Hate About You (1999)
Love and lust, however they might be combined, are probably the most
fascinating of human endeavors. People will do the strangest things when
obsessed with either. A combination of the two emotions is almost deadly. With
the stars in the eyes, rational thought goes out the window and a beautiful
delirium takes over.
Lovers will reveal their innermost selves to each other and often it's a
person that the outside world never sees. The hard-edged and cruel can turn
into puppy dogs. On the other hand, the nicest person in the world might
become a maelstrom. It's a fascinating thing to watch from the outside and an
alternate dimension from the inside.
Kat Stratford (Julia Stiles) and Heath Ledger (Patrick Verona) are seemingly a
couple made in hell. She's an hot blooded opinionated ill-tempered high school
beauty who has sworn off men. He's the local bad boy, drilling holes in text
books during shop class.
Kat's younger sister Bianca (Larisa Oleynik) is the opposite of her sibling.
She desperately wants to be popular and has her sights set on pretty boy male
model Joey Donner (Andrew Keegan). Her problem is that her dad won't let her
date until Kat does. Kat has no intentions of hanging out with the local male riff-raff.
Nerdish Cameron James (Joseph Gordon-Levitt) is smitten with Bianca and
hatches a plot to toss Kat into the dating pool. He schemes with Joey and they
approach Heath with an offer he can't refuse. They offer him money to take out
the unapproachable Kat.
Loosely based on Shakespeare's "The Taming Of The Shrew", this is a notch
above current teen films. The characters are lively without being
unbelievable; humorous, but not remarkably stupid. There's a definite
chemistry between Stiles and Verona and both could become box office draws.
An aberration for high school films, the adults also have decent roles. Daryl
"Chill" Mitchell has a small but entertaining part as a literature teacher.
("I know Shakespeare is a dead white guy, but he knows his shit.") Larry
Miller is great as the girls' father. Unfortunately he is saddled with lame dialog.
There are other problems with the film. In any good story, the characters
eventually go through changes. Here they appear to transform instantaneously.
Bianca is shallow and self-centered and suddenly she's not. Heath is the
school bully but after 30 seconds with Kat, it turns out he's really an angel.
The biggest flaw is a plot device that must have been old even in the Bard's
time. After being paid to date Kat, Heath falls for her. It doesn't take an
olde English scholar to know that she's going to find out about the conspiracy
and break up with him.
This isn't a perfect film, but after the recent horrendous movies aimed at the
younger market, it's a tiny ray of hope.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 575 fortnights and decided
that he'd write another one even though the perfect light-hearted film remains
elusive. Email tales of love and lust to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 4/15/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Star Wars (1977)
There are some images and stories so ingrained in the human psyche that
they are universal throughout the history of the world. Tales of the
flawed hero's quest, stories of boy versus father, fables of rescuing
the captive princess: these are omnipresent in mankind's legends and
religions. And they are the basis for "Star Wars".
Joseph Campbell who spent a lifetime studying myths and their
commonalties in various traditions had high praise for the film. He
talked about the shared themes between the science fiction movie and
those beliefs that dwell deep within the collective unconsciousness.
The Special Edition has been remastered with new effects and the
inclusion of over four minutes of new footage. As cutting edge as the
film was 20 years ago, director George Lucas was unsatisfied with some
of the effects that were underdone due to budget considerations. Now,
with megabucks in his pockets, he has gone back to polish them up.
Most of the new footage fits in seamlessly. The obvious changes are a
scene where Han Solo (a very young soon-to-be-major-star Harrison Ford)
encounters Jabba The Hut and the backwater Mos Eisley spaceport has
become more of a busy place.
Mucking around with a classic is dangerous business, but Lucas has
succeeded in improving the original. True, Jabba seems less impressive
than he does in the later films (seeing him "walk" is believable, but
ruins the image of the hedonistic despot), but the episode still works.
The minor change when Han kills Greedo is the only failure in the new
version. The visuals are clumsy and there is an unneeded change in
Solo's character.
This film changed the movie industry. Spawning dozens of imitators and
the search for bigger effects and even larger budgets, Lucas is
indirectly responsible for most of the major movies from the past two
decades. Of course that was not all good news. Personal films fell by
the wayside only to begin reappearing in recent years. "Star Wars" was
the harbinger of things to come.
Very few films have become such cultural icons. The only other one that
I can think of that _everyone_ has seen is "The Wizard Of Oz". Both
films are not talked about in terms of if one has experienced it, but,
rather how often. In some ways, "Star Wars" is a reworked "Wizard". The
characters match: the tin man, the large furry animal, the wicked witch
of the Empire, the young adventurer searching for truth and tons of
munchkins. Luke even lives on a farm with his auntie.
It's impossible to talk about "Star Wars" as just a film. It is a
cultural phenomenon. The re-release of the first of the middle trilogy
(nine films are planned in all, the new one opens in a few years) will
be followed by "The Empire Strikes Back" and "Return Of The Jedi" within
the next several weeks.
Many of us saw this when it opened in the summer of 1979. If you were
among those, you'll be surprised at how well it holds up. It's still an
amazing spectacle.
If you have only viewed this on your VCR, you absolutely _must_ get
thyself to a theater. Seeing it on a big screen is a completely
different event and one that needs to be experienced. Go to a packed
house and sit near the front. History awaits you.
[This appeared in the "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana 2/6/96.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for October Sky (1999)
Denial is not just a river in Egypt -- sometimes it's the key to success.
Although current wisdom says that living in that body of water is a bad idea,
at times you have to look reality square in the face and ignore it. Of course
most of the time, you'll probably fail, but every once and a while, a miracle occurs.
Seventeen year-old Homer Hickam (Jake Gyllenhaal) is looking for that miracle.
Growing up in the West Virginia coal mining town of Coalwood in 1957, his
future is seemingly carved in carbon. The only way for boys to escape their
coal dust covered fate is a football scholarship and Homer is no jock. The
most he can hope for is to follow in his father's footsteps as mine superintendent.
Then the Soviet Union launched the tiny Sputnik. Those two or three of who are
still alive and have memories of that day can recall the buzz. The world
realized that things had changed forever. Mankind was no longer imprisoned on
the ground.
Homer's eyes are filled with stars as he stares into the night sky watching
the satellite zoom across the cosmos. He wants to build rockets. And he wants
to escape Coalwood.
Getting ahead in the tiny company town is a tough job. His father discourages
him. The high school principal doesn't think it's a good idea, "Our job is to
give these kids an education, not false hopes." Like many educators, he wants
to prepare Homer to fit in as a good worker.
The junior rocket scientist has one adult ally. His teacher, Miss Riley
(played convincingly albeit low-key by Laura Dern) encourages him to enter the
local science fair. If somehow he were to win the national competition, he'd
have a ticket to college.
Homer crosses a well-defined high school cultural barrier and talks local nerd
Quentin (Chris Owen) into helping him. Rounding up his other buddies, Roy Lee
(William Lee Scott) and O'Dell (Chad Lindberg), he starts gathering supplies.
Mix teenage boys with explosive chemicals and you can imagine the results.
Things blow up right and left. Rockets crash time after time. But slowly the
boys refine their project. Their friendship is heartfelt and reminiscent of
"Stand By Me".
Homer's desire to thwart his destiny is illustrated vividly when he gazes
longingly up to the sky as he descends into the depths of the earth in a
mining elevator. His future lies either buried under tons of dirt or in the stars.
His relationship with his father, John (Chris Cooper from "Lone Star" and
"Matewan") is a complex one. John disapproves of Homer's pie-in-the-sky
dreams. At the same time he's angry because Homer thinks he can be better than
his father, he is reluctantly proud of his son's accomplishments. Gyllenhaal's
scenes with Cooper are realistic in a way that any male with a father can
relate to.
Some of the other relationships aren't quite as realized. Homer's girlfriend
problems are a very minor part of the story and only serve to take up time.
The situation seems to be included only to fulfill the obligatory romance
portion of cinematic formulas.
A couple other sub-plots also serve to slow the film down a bit. A forest fire
and Miss Riley's illness, while presumably historically accurate, feel extraneous.
Based on a true story, the film is a vision of real people. It would have been
easy to present the townies as ignorant hillbillies, but instead, thankfully,
we are shown men and women trapped by their circumstances. Their hopes are
defined by the company.
Surprisingly the down-to-earth tale is directed by Joe Johnston, responsible
for the effects-driven "Jumanji" and "Honey I Shrunk The Kids". Johnson shows
a skill for presenting a touching movie that was missing in his previous films.
Homer is told repeatedly that he can't succeed. Fortunately for him, he
decides to do it anyway. Occasionally we have to turn a blind eye to the facts
and jump off the proverbial cliff. Otherwise we'd never fly.
(Michael Redman didn't start writing this column when Sputnik was launched,
but he did begin looking up. Email locations of promising cliffs to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 2/25/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Bean (1997)
British comic actor Rowan Atkinson is a hit in England with his weekly "Mr.
Bean" television series and now his film hits the United States. Never before
has there been such a vicious retaliation for the American Revolution.
Bean is a guard in London's National Art Gallery where he is despised by the
board of directors but immune from dismissal. To get rid of him, they send the
bumbling grunting mumbler to LA under the guise of an art expert to oversee
the installation of "Whistler's Mother". (You'd think that with all the
authorities in the film that someone would know that the title of the painting
is the mouthful "Arrangement in Black and Gray: The Artist's Mother".)
That's about as much of a plot as we get. Bean is a combination of Pee Wee
Herman and Jim Carrey with a little "Being There" tossed in. As bad as that
sounds, it's even worse.
Most of the so-called comedy is based on making fun of the socially and
possibly mentally inept. The result is cringing in embarrassment for what's on
the screen rather than laughter.
The rest of the humor involves body orifices and what goes into and comes out
of them. Bean stuffs a cigarette lighter up his nose and shoots peanuts from
it. He leaves tissue hanging from it, sneezes on a painting and makes more
noise with it than you want to hear. As a bonus we get urine, vomit  and
laxative jokes. Twelve-year-old boys will love it
Supposedly the movie is very popular in Europe. It's possible. After all there
are those stories about Jerry Lewis and France.
[This appeared in the 11/26/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana

Title
Review for Mystery Men (1999)
League Of Stupid Heroes comes so close
Frustrations. I don't know about you, but they're some of my least favorite
things. And there's so many of them. Lives that might have been. Opportunities
lost. Delayed gratification.
In the context of this column, the most common frustration, and the most
dreaded one, is a movie that almost makes it. Every element seems right, but
they don't fit together. The whole is less than the sum of the parts.
Filmmaking is an art, not a science, and sometimes the best laid plans just
don't quite work.
Based on a little known cult-favorite comic book by Bob Burden (also
responsible for the equally cultish "Flaming Carrot"), the film is a spoof of
super-hero antics. The mystery men are an unnamed group of farm league
characters who don't quite get the idea.
Some of them have super powers -- The Spleen (Paul Reubens aka PeeWee Herman)
can disable a foe from a distance with his deadly, err...gases -- and others
merely think they do. The Invisible Boy's (Kel Mitchell) power is inspired. He
is invisible only as long as no one is looking at him.
The team operates in Champion City, a cross between Gotham City  and
"Bladerunner", but no one takes them seriously. After all, the city already
has a resident hero, Captain Amazing (Greg Kinnear).
The good Captain has done such a good job of cleaning up crime that he has no
foes left to fight. Since this has resulted in a decline in commercial
endorsements, he arranges the release of his arch-enemy Casanova Frankenstein
(Geoffrey Rush). When Frankenstein captures Amazing in a nefarious scheme, the
second-raters must come to the rescue.
The casting is wonderful. Hank Azaria is The Blue Raja who, clad in green, is
an expert at throwing forks and scratching cars. Janeane Garofalo as The
Bowler throws a mean strike with her transparent ball encasing her father's
skull. Ben Stiller's power as The Furious is that he is uncontrollable when he
gets angry. At least that's what he keeps saying. The list goes on.
The real stand-out is William H. Macy as The Shoveler. Using only a shovel as
a weapon, he is the perfect gimmick super-hero. He's committed to his work and
takes it seriously: Batman with a digging tool. Macy is perfect in the role.
He completely captures the dedication of a crime fighter and is hilarious only
because the concept is ludicrous.
This isn't so true with some of the others. Vastly talented Reubens is stuck
in a goofy role and is unable to transcend it. Rush is more tedious than
menacing. Tom Waits as a weapons designer could have been outrageous.
So many of the scenes are hilarious, it's difficult to understand why the film
doesn't deliver more than it does. When the guys realize they need more
firepower, they hold a barbecue tryout for more members. It's a wonderfully
wacky bit.
The heroes refuse to believe that Captain Amazing's secret identity is
millionaire Lance Hunt because Hunt wears glasses. How could he see without
them? When confronted with a super-villain, they dent and scrape his limo.
Their rescue of Amazing doesn't go exactly as planned with an appropriately
ridiculous result.
But overall, the movie feels flat. There's too much of the same scene over and
over. The Bowler's animated ball is entertaining the first time, but after
that, it's repetition. The Spleen's farting is less amusing the more he does it.
In his first feature film, director Kinka Usher exhibits his commercial-making
("Got Milk?", Taco Bell) background as he introduces sub-plots and leaves
them unexplored.
Some of the timing is off. The Furious' attempt at romancing a coffee shop
waitress is so much wasted time. For such an over-the-top movie, some it is
oddly subdued and could do with a bit more flamboyance. As the film draws to
an end, it becomes too much like the movies it makes fun of.
"Mystery Men" is not a bad film. Some portions are marvelous and it's worth
seeing just for those.
Like some frustrations in real life, this movie comes close. So close.
(Michael Redman has written this column for just about 24 years and is
somewhat of a mystery to himself. Email your tales of frustration to
Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 8/12/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Game, The (1997)
The challenge during this film is figuring out who are the players and exactly
what is the game. Ever felt that someone out there is messing with your life
and pulling the strings behind the scenes? Here there really is a "someone"
behind the curtain who's controlling the seemingly accidental.
Nicholas Van Orton (Michael Douglas) is a successful but emotionally dead
businessman who suddenly finds himself having a very weird day. Things happen
out of his control, his life falls apart, he hooks up with a beautiful woman
who leads him astray while pretending to be someone she isn't, people are out
to get him, nothing is what it seems and everywhere he goes he sees strangers
who are plotting against him.
And the amazing thing is that he paid for this! I know people leading this
type of life and they get to do it for free.
Van Orton has taken over his father's business. He spends his day moving money
around and his night pouring over business reports and watching financial
news. His wife left him because he wasn't emotionally available. He lives
alone in an enormous house alone with only a housekeeper for companionship and
she leaves just as he's getting home. He's so detached from humanity that when
someone wishes him "Happy Birthday", it's his secretary who responds "Thank you."
What a birthday it's about to be. It's his 48th: the same age his father was
when young Nick watched him leap from the top of the house to his death. He
works his father's business, lives in his father's house and now he's at the
fateful age. Stoic Nicholas is becoming even more morose.
His younger brother Conrad (Sean Penn) shows up to liven up his life. Leaving
a message at the office from "Seymour Butts", black sheep Conrad makes a
dinner appoint with his older sibling and surprises him with a mysterious
birthday present. He's bought a session of "The Game" and urges Nicholas to play.
After undergoing a grueling several hour session of psychological and physical
tests, he's in the game. The problem is that he doesn't know how it's played
or even what it is. The only thing he's told is that it's like a vacation that
comes to him.
Much like some computer games, it turns out that the objective of the game is
to discover the objective of the game. Going about his everyday humdrum life,
he finds objects -- keys, a handle -- that come in handy later. Minor
incidents that seem random take on a new significance.
It's intriguing at first to Von Orton and then it all goes horribly wrong.
Dangerous car wrecks, betrayals and deadly danger convince him that the game
is just a scam to pull off a major crime with him as the victim.
The film reminds me of several others: the complacent businessman is awakened
to real life by dangers. Michael Douglas' man in a suit in the midst of
adventure is different than Harrison Ford's. Douglas' character that he's
played in a few films is beaten to within an inch of his life and only hangs
on through his tenacity. He's a hero only because he's forced to be.
This is definitely Douglas' film. He's on-screen almost the entire time and a
lesser actor would be unable to pull it off. It's a credit to his skill that
the audience is entranced during the entire film.
Director David Fincher is a mystery himself. His previous films were the two
very different wonderfully crafted "Seven" and the wretchedly disappointing
"Alien 3". This film only shows some resemblance to either of those.  The long
movie (aren't they all now days?) never drags and that's saying a lot.
Is this film realistic? Naw. There's no way that the "Mission Impossible"
plans could be pulled off with the preciseness that they are. But it doesn't
matter. Toss aside your disbelief and go along for the ride. It's worth it.
If there is a problem with the movie, and there is, it's that there is very
little doubt how it will end. If you were allowed to think about it, what is
going on is obvious. Luckily there isn't much time to think and the downfall
of the film is only an afterthought.
I'm not sure I would recommend that people who perceive plots and conspiracies
behind every door see the film. This just might convince them that they are
right. And they're not. Or maybe I'm just lulling them into a false sense of security.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 22 years. At least that's
what he wants you to believe. Email your favorite paranoias to mredman@bvoice.com)
[This appeared in the 9/18/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Twilight (1998)
The lives of older people in the twilight of their years attempting to come to
grips with their shared histories and possible futures is a fascinating topic.
Finding an all-star cast for such a film is a stroke of genius. Combining all
that with a three-time Oscar-winning director (Robert Benton of "Kramer Vs.
Kramer") and creating a decidedly mediocre movie is the stuff of disappointment.
In yet another noir mystery set in Hollywood -- how many of these have we seen
during the past few years? -- the atmosphere is moody, the actors enjoyable to
watch and the story goes nowhere.
Over-70 Harry Ross (Paul Newman) is a washed up cop-turned-private eye-turned
Man Friday trying to figure out how to live what remains of his life. He's
screwed up things pretty well ("I had a wife and daughter. Now, I'm a drunk)
and is at a crossroads.
A couple of years ago, he traveled to Mexico to bring back Mel (Reese
Witherspoon), the under-age daughter of Jack (Gene Hackman) and Catherine
(Susan Sarandon) Ames and now lives with them. The Ames are former movie
stars, past their prime and the three have become fast friends. One gets the
impression that Ross is just hanging out waiting for something to wake him up.
 To fill his time, he does odd jobs for Jack and falls in love with Catherine.
Jack is in even worse shape than Harry. He's dying of cancer with only a year
to live.
Things do turn more exciting when Jack asks Harry to drop off a sealed manila
envelope for him. Instead of the routine errand that Ross expects, he walks
into a barrage of bullets from the gun of another ex-cop who is, himself, full
of bloody holes. This unsettling event gives the former detective a project to
throw himself into and launches an investigation that revolves around the
mysterious disappearance of Catherine's first husband 20 years before.
Through a series of very complex and convoluted plot devices that involve
murder; blackmail; guns; Mel's Mexico traveling partner and his parole
officer; Ross's former cop buddies, ex-lover and would-be sidekick, the tale
finally ends up exactly where everyone expects it to. It's a film noir
tradition that the story twists and turns down side roads for an unexpected
finale, but here the journey meanders towards an ending that no one cares
about. The only surprises are exactly whose face fits which role in the
scenario. By the time they show you, it doesn't matter.
The storyline gets goofier and goofier exemplified in Ross's relationship with
Rubin (Giancarlo Esposito), a partner wannabe. These scenes are obviously
designed to be comic relief, however they are neither. Rubin and Ross have
some past relationship but either it's not explained or I didn't care enough
at that point to remember.
A running joke about where Harry was supposedly shot while in Mexico is
probably meant to mirror his questions about whether he is still able to
perform. It's also not funny, doesn't connect and keeps on showing up long
after it has run its course.
On the positive side, it's often enjoyable to watch the seasoned actors on the
screen. The three leads all have well-deserved Academy Awards and turn in
accomplished, if not extraordinary jobs. Newman is  a grand actor, but doesn't
seem quite suited to the dark film style. He is a bit too clean and
understated to come across as desperate and down and out. Hackman, also
low-key, is believable but lacks sparkle. Sarandon comes across well as an
sultry older babe although she is one-dimensional.
The actors do what they can with lame dialog, but they can't pull the film out
of the hole it's dug for itself. James Garner who plays Ross's old buddy
ex-cop Raymond Hope is always a treat, but even he half-heartedly struggles
through lines like "I'm glad they didn't shoot your pecker off."
The best part of the film is the look at old friends, how their relationships
change over the years and the difficult choices they must make. The genuinely
easy and casual interactions among the actors hint that being on the set was
much more interesting  than what ended up on the screen
The film doesn't run very long before the audience realizes that it's
hopeless. The only reason for watching is the actors. It reminds me of
disaster movies such as "Towering Inferno" where the star power is supposed to
make everyone ignore the film's problems.
In a better world, there would have been second-rate actors in this
second-rate movie and the ones here would have been saved for something
better. Of course, we don't live in that better world, but you could make
yours a little nicer by choosing a different movie.
(Michael Redman has written this column for 23 years and was fascinated to see
that we got a week of winter this year just as spring is due. Email him at
redman@bvoice.com with your witty comments.)
[This appeared in the 3/13/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
Nearly everyone has  exceptional talents of some type and occasional sparks of
genius. It's rare that these skills are ever put to use because there are
thousands of reasons not to. It's so much easier to just keep on keepin' on in
the same old comfortable way.
Will Hunting (Matt Damon) enjoys nothing more than drinking and fighting with
his rowdy buddies from the poor Irish neighborhood of South Boston, but
there's a problem. He's secretly a mathematical genius. Working as a janitor
at MIT, he solves intricate formulas in minutes that took the professors
years. His life changes overnight when his ability is discovered by Professor
Lambeau (Stellan Skarsgard).
Lambeau catches up with him after Hunting has been arrested for assault. He
arranges a release on two conditions: the young man meet with the professor
once a week and also see a psychologist. The former is easy: Will wants to
learn. He isn't much interested in therapy though and burns through several
doctors who refuse to continue seeing him after one session.
As a last resort, the instructor takes him to Sean McGuire (Robin Williams), a
former college friend who now teaches at a junior college. Will and McGuire, a
fellow "Southie", make an instant connection. Both are damaged by their past
and paralyzed in the present. McGuire continues to carry the pain of his
beloved wife's death. Hunting can't get beyond his abusive childhood.
McGuire toils away at his thankless job, going nowhere. Hunting tells himself
that it is noble to continue in his old ways rather than explore possible
futures. Neither can get anywhere because they are more sheltered in the
familiar, as agonizing as it might be. Through their weekly encounters, each
pushes the other out of their complacency.
While Will is trying to decide just what it is he wants to do, he meets Skylar
(Minnie Driver), a Harvard student who steals his heart. Their relationship is
as tumultuous as that between him and McGuire. They fall in love, are filled
with doubts, fight, break up, almost get back together, break up, maybe get
back together...
Damon and Williams have heat in their scenes together. There's something
authentic happening as they challenge each other. As real as the interaction
between the genius and his therapist are, Will's changes don't ring completely
true. It does happen at times that a person thoroughly makes life alterations
as a result of treatment, but it's difficult to accept that it could all
happen so rapidly. McGuire's transformation seems more genuine.
Much more believable is the relationship between Will and Skylar. Director Gus
Van Sant ("My Own Private Idaho", "Even Cowgirls Get The Blues") captures
young love admirably. The intensity of their attractions and their hesitancies
are convincingly passionate. They aren't sure what they are doing and that's
the way that it really is.
Damon looks to be on the fast track towards becoming one of cinema's brightest
bad boys. He's a good looking guy who can look brooding with the best of them,
bringing to mind James Dean and the young Marlon Brando. That alone could
bring him several roles, but the fact that he has impressive acting skills
insure his longevity.
Robin Williams has two modes that he excels in. The first is the manic, no
holds barred wacky guy. The other is Sean McGuire. Similar to his characters
in "Dead Poet's Society" and "Awakenings", Williams plays the therapist with
humanistic depth. He's a human being with genuine emotions.
Ben Afflect ("Chasing Amy" and co-writer of this film along with Damon) is
Will's best friend Chuckie and steals the scenes that he's in. Off-screen
friends, their camaraderie translates to the movie.  Chuckie is a tough kid
complete with gold chains, and is in many ways the more colorful of the two.
As good as Damon is in the role, the film might have been even better with
Afflect as the lead.
The subtext of Bostonian classism is handled oddly. The message that manual
labor is virtuous but only for some people is a strange one. It's fine for
Chuckie to continue living in the old neighborhood and working all the
live-long day, but not for Will. This confuses the issue. Is Will embracing
his potential or betraying his roots? Not everyone can be saved, but is
Chuckie, as he claims, in fact living the fullest life he could? The film
tells us "yes", but well, maybe "no". Maybe those guys carrying bricks are
doing honest virtuous works. Or maybe they're just being told that so they
continue carrying bricks. The movie straddles the fence on the very issue it
attempts to address.
Will's situation at the end is a difficult one, much like real life. He is
forced to choose between his passion or his passion. It's a difficult
decision, but he makes the only one possible for a man who has awakened to
himself. Good for him.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 22 years and has yet to
decide which he believes was the best film of 97. Maybe he never will: stay
tuned. Redman@bvoice.com is one way to influence him.)
[This appeared in the 2/4/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Daylight (1996)
Remember "The Poseidon Adventure"? It was one of the grandfathers of the
modern disaster movies, spawning "Airport", "Towering Inferno" and
zillions more. The latest off-spring takes after its ancestor more than
just in theme.
Somewhere in a small darkened room in LA, a studio executive sat
watching the upside-down ship disaster and had a flash of insight. They
could remake the film, but set it in the Manhattan-New Jersey tunnel and
cast Sylvester Stallone. There would be all of the same elements that
were in the popular movie from over 25 years ago: running for higher
ground to escape drowning in rushing waters, fires burning from the
walls for no apparent reason, hold-your-breath underwater scenes, a
racially and socially mixed group of survivors trying to make their way
to the top while some die on the way. And it will make tons at the box
office.
This is what is known in Hollywood as a "high concept". Out here in the
real world, high concepts often result in what is known as a "bad
movie".
A car-jacking trio of punks decide to make their getaway in the tunnel
-- it=92s easy to understand why they turned to a life of crime since the=
y
obviously couldn=92t get into the college of their choice because they
didn't understand the spatial relationship of how a tunnel works. The
equation 1 Exit =3D Easily Trapped never crosses their minds.
It turns out that it doesn't matter much as a few seconds later, their
vehicle careens into a truck loaded with toxic waste which blows up in a
fireball that shoots down the tunnel much like the scene from
"Independence Day". So much like it that it seems a waste to have spent
all of those big bucks on the special effects when they could have just
clipped film from "ID4".
The blast collapses the tunnel on both ends and kills the crooks and
just about everyone else on the highway except our intrepid band of
barely adequate actors. Stallone is on the outside and must jump through
a series of gigantic fans to come to the rescue. The fans can only be
turned off for a few seconds and each conveniently comes equipped with a
red digital timer installed, I suppose, so that anyone having to vault
through them would know how much time he has left.
He gets in, some people die, some live. Some are brave, some are not.
There's a lot of water and explosions. There=92s a big dog. No one cares.=
[This appeared in the 12/12/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at mredman@bvoice.com

Title
Review for Return of the Jedi (1983)
As I have mentioned before, the "Star Wars" trilogy makes much more
sense as one work than as three separate films. "Jedi" ends the tale
and, taken with the rest, is a part of one of most successful films of
all times. By itself, it is something of a weak ending.
When I saw this during its original release, I couldn't help but feel
disappointed. By that time, the great god "Merchandising" had reared its
ugly head and much of the movie seemed to exist to sell toys. The teddy
bear Ewoks would have contributed much more to the mythos with their
tribal teamwork versus the technology of the Empire if they weren't so
damned cute. But then they wouldn't have sold so many t-shirts.
Some of the problems exist for no reason. One of the strengths of the
project has always been the spectacular special effects, yet someone
must have been asleep when some of the "Jedi" scenes were executed. The
rubber-masked pig-men guards at Jabba's headquarters look like big kids
out trick or treating =97 and are just as convincing. The insipid blue
elephant creature appears as real as someone waving a stuffed animal
back and forth.  In an unfortunate decision, the musical number has been
extended for the Special Edition and works even more poorly than it did
in the original.
The attack on the new Death Star is remarkably similar to the attack on
the first one in "Star Wars".
I will also have to admit that I enjoyed the film much more this time
than during the eighties. Not having such high hopes, I was able to
concentrate on its strengths. Luke has his third (or is it fourth?)
father killed and must stand on his own. The character of the Emperor is
wonderful and the scenes with him, Vader and Luke are filled with
tension.
"Jedi" may be the weak link, but it is still better than 90% of the
other stuff out there.

Title
Review for Con Air (1997)
When talking about summer films, it's a cliche to suggest that the
audience leave their brains at home because the movie is all action and
fun but low on thought. There's a reason why some phrases become
overworked. They're true.
Nicolas Cage plays a convict headed home to his family in "Rambo III: In
The Clouds"...no, that's "Die Hard Behind Bars"...err, whatever they're
calling this year's buff lone wolf defending the helpless against all
odds film. Cage has much depth as an actor than Stallone has ever shown,
but here he does a credible Sly.
Cameron Poe (Cage) is an Army Ranger in the wrong place at the wrong
time who accidentally kills one of a group of men intent on raping his
pregnant wife. After hiring what must be the worst attorney in the
western hemisphere, our hero ends up setting out the next several years
in a federal prison pining away for his wife and Casey, the daughter
he's never seen.
When it's finally his day to go home which just happens to be Casey's
birthday, for some reason he's put aboard the "Jailbird", a plane loaded
with the most dangerous scum of the earth. (Of course the "some reason"
is that without that plot element, we would have no film.) Loaded with
such luminaries as Cyrus The Virus (John Malkovich) and Diamond Dog
(Ving Rhames), the craft is a traveling freak show of depravity.
Unknown to Poe, the rest of the cons have hatched a plot to hijack their
air taxi. During a scheduled stop to pick up new travelers, he has the
opportunity to safely leave but doesn't since his buddy is about to slip
into a diabetic coma because he has no syringe for his insulin. "You
don't leave a fallen man behind."
The latest guest of honor is the ultimate mass murderer Garland Greene
(Steve Buscemi) who once wore the head of a little girl as a hat on a
drive through three states. Trussed up like Hannibal Lector, soft-spoken
Greene is easily the creepiest of the bunch.
Then everything blows up and crashes and gets shot and bursts into
fireballs just like you knew it would.
On the ground US Marshal Vince Larkin (John Cusack) is trying to
recapture the plane while engaging in absurd jurisdiction disputes with
a gung-ho DEA agent who wants to solve the problem with missiles.
There are a few weak moments in the energy. Poe's extended search for a
set of works for his ailing friend gets in the way of the heat. He
spends his time looking through boxes and cabinets while a firefight
rages outside and the medical authenticity for the insulin need is iffy.
Other than that, the explosions are non-stop and it's a thrill-a-minute
excursion. The effects are spectacular especially during the crash
landing.
Cyrus  is the most interesting of the characters as Malkovich once again
is the evil mastermind or as he says "the poster child for the
criminally insane". Although Cyrus gets more screen time, the most
unsettling scene goes to the smiling Greene and a young girl having a
nice little tea party in a decrepit abandoned swimming pool. It's also
the most puzzling piece of the movie as the reason for the resolution of
that moment is left to the imagination of the viewer.
All the actors are in fine form although in the best of all possible
worlds, they would have had more to work with. Everyone's playing the
same characters that they have before and Cage even looks a tad bored
occasionally.
Oh well. It's a good looking movie with a lot of "wow"s. Just the thing
to luxuriate in on these hot dry summer days. That is, if we ever make
it to that season.
[This appeared in the 6/12/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Mercury Rising (1998)
Like every other aspect of human existence, Hollywood prefers to stay with
the familiar tried and true. If something works once, it should work again.
And again and again. Even if it doesn't succeed after a while, at least it's
easier and more comfortable than trying something new.
Of course this leads to failures that feel good. Take a look around. Most
people are following this plan as the default arrangement for their lives.
"Mercury Rising" is a fine example of how this philosophy functions in the
entertainment industry.
FBI agent Art Jeffries (Bruce Willis) is a (gasp!) tough lone wolf. When he's
undercover and a hostage situation goes wrong, two teenage boys are shot dead
by other agents. This pushes Jeffries further into his self-imposed isolation
and the new assignment of baby-sitting a phone tap doesn't help his morale.
His life changes when for some reason unexplained by the film, he is assigned
to help Chicago police investigate an apparent murder-suicide. He discovers
Simon Lynch (Miko Hughes), the dead couple's autistic nine-year old son,
hiding in a crawl space. Before long it's apparent that a hitman was sent to
kill the boy.
Simon is a mathematical savant and has decoded a complex cypher in World
Of Puzzles magazine. He draws attention to himself by calling a phone
number to claim his prize. Unfortunately for him, the phone rings in a NSA
(National Security Agency or, as it's referred to in the film, "No Such
Agency") office. Their newest project is "Mercury", an unbreakable code
designed to protect the identities of double agents around the world.
A couple of computer experts placed the puzzle to check the "geek factor" of
the code. Although Simon cannot logically understand it, the hidden message
comes to him as he stares at it much like Magic Eye pictures pop into view.
He's the only one in the country to solve the enigma.
It doesn't take a psychic to predict that the head of Mercury is a
power-hungry politician who will stop at nothing on his rise to power. Lt.
Colonel Nicholas Kudrow (Alec Baldwin) decides that the best way to deal with
the problem is to eliminate Simon.
When Jeffries learns of the assassination plot, yet another Bruce Willis as
the renegade lawman fighting to save the innocent while everyone is trying to
kill him adventure gets underway. There is an abundance of shooting, loud
noises, speeding trains and close calls. Everything that you've come to expect
and everything that you've seen hundreds of times before.
As one of my guilty cinematic pleasures, I usually enjoy Willis'
performances. He's one of the best there is at what he does, but even I am
beginning to tire of the same old stuff. There are a number of actors that are
essentially the same character film after film, but at least people like Clint
Eastwood have the wisdom to vary plots. Bruce Willis playing Bruce Willis
still works, but it takes a better story than we have here to make it interesting.
Director Harold Becker ("Malice", "Sea Of Love") has filled the movie with
scenes that don't make sense. When Jeffries meets shoe-saleswoman Stacy (Kim
Dickens) in a cafe, she watches Simon and later lets them spend the night in
her apartment although she knows that he's a wanted man. All for no
discernible reason. They never make any real connection. She's in deadly
danger, yet she's willing to become part of the scheme and we never understand why.
The similarity of Jeffries and Simon holds promise early in the film. Each is
cut off from the world: Simon by his autism, Jeffries by his choices. The only
exception to his exile is a friendship with fellow agent Tommy Jordan (Chi
McBride in the mostly lively performance in the film) which provides the few
episodes of personable interactions. As the young boy and his protector spend
time together, they grow closer but not by much. Mostly Jeffries drags the
screaming boy around. To give the film credit, at least Simon doesn't become
magically cured.
Autism is an eerie situation where the person lives mostly internally,
relating to the outside world only when forced to. Hughes does a superb and
very realistic job of portraying a young boy with the affliction. In real life
there is a distance between the autistic and other people. It's difficult to
relate to someone who isn't interested. As fine as Hughes is, on the screen
the barrier is magnified. There's no getting inside his head. We understand no
more about Simon at the end of the film than we did at the beginning.
The rest of the actors are decidedly mediocre. You know what to expect from
Willis. Baldwin walks through his role as if he's reading his lines off a
teleprompter. Dickens almost becomes real, but doesn't make it. The geeky
computer wizes are irritatingly interesting but their characters go nowhere.
The ending is particularly hackneyed. With helicopters fluttering around,
Willis and Baldwin engage in a slugfest atop a skyscraper as Simon wanders
near the edge and lots of big guns shatter glass in the background. Innovation
is not the name of this game.
The title "Mercury Rising" was apparently chosen to impart some sense of heat
to this film. I think someone got the wrong weather report.
(Michael Redman has written about films for 23 years and is often willing to
throw himself in front of bad movies to protect his loyal readers.
Redman@bvoice.com is the electronic connection.)
[This appeared in the 4/23/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for At First Sight (1999)
It must be an overwhelming shock to suddenly awaken one day with an entirely
new view of life. Previously comfortable in our old perceptions and way of
being, the new vision shatters our old world and the new one is an
surrealistic landscape.
Metaphors aside, massage therapist Virgil Adamson (Val Kilmer) experiences
this - literally. Once blind, now he sees and he's not sure he likes it much.
Virgil, blind since childhood, works in a spa in a small New York town and his
life isn't too bad. He takes a bus to work. His sister fixes his dinner. He
has memorized his home so he gets around easily. Then his life is turned
upside down when he meets Amy Benic (Mira Sorvino).
Overworked NYC architect Amy takes a break at the spa and meets Virgil's
tender touch. After a couple sensual encounters, they fall in love. Back in
the city, Amy researches the web and discovers a possible cure for his condition.
Kilmer is credible as a blind man and again demonstrates his increasing acting
skills. Although she has turned in commendable performances in the past,
Sorvino is less successful. Nathan Lane's small role as a sight therapist is
the most human one in the move. Unfortunately we only see a few minutes of him.
When Virgil regains his sight, he can't deal with the new sensations
bombarding his life. Infants learn to visually relate to their surroundings
gradually. Virgil gets it all at once. He doesn't understand perspective and
depth perception. When he sees himself in a mirror, he starts a conversation.
He thinks a picture of an apple _is_ an apple. City streets are perplexing.
If the film had concentrated on Virgil's struggle with his new vision, it
would be more absorbing. Instead it's a love story. Admittedly Virgil and
Amy's early scenes seem like they could lead to something, but when they
become a couple they turn into aliens. The massage between strangers is more
erotic than their love-making. After Virgil can see, their relationship
painfully lacks chemistry. The ending is easily foreseen.
Although the movie is based on a true story, director Irwin Winkler has
concentrated on the least interesting aspects. Creating a movie about sight,
he shows little insight.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and thinks he's
going to go out and look at some stuff. Email your visions to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the Jan. 28, 1999 "Bloomington Indpependent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Red Planet (2000)
Movies can do the two big Es very well: educate and entertain. In the best
of all possible worlds, they accomplish both. On the Red Planet, they fail entirely.
In the near future, a manned mission is sent to Mars to observe primitive
plant growth. This film does a remarkable job of demonstrating exactly how
exciting watching algae grow would be.
After some mumbo-jumbo about an ecological disaster on Earth and an
interminable wait to reach the fourth planet, the ship falls apart almost as
fast as the movie does. The ground crew of people you couldn't care less
about is trapped on the surface without food, water or air and stalked by a
deadly rogue cyberdog. The one potentially interesting character
(Carrie-Anne Moss) spends her time alone in the orbiting ship talking to a computer.
Attempting to graft "2001"esque space mysticism with "Terminator" robot
horror, first time director Antony Hoffman can't seem to figure out what's
going on. Neither can we. Didn't he have anyone who could step back from the
shooting and make sure there was a coherent story? Couldn't he have used the
money saved by only having to pay half a dozen actors to hire a scriptwriter?
There are so many mis-steps. Every opportunity to create dynamic tension is
thwarted by plot holes and lackluster direction. Why introduce the theme of
faith vs. science if the crewman who could comment on it disappears early
only to die _offscreen_?
The audience begins the film waiting for something to happen. Two hours
later, they're still waiting. Despite our greatest hopes, there is no life
on the red planet.
(Michael Redman has written this column for a very long time and finds
observing Mars from the ground much more interesting than anything in this
film. Email your experiences with the cosmos to redman@bluemarble.net.)
[This appeared in the 11/16/2000 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bluemarble.net.]
-- 
mailto:redman@bluemarble.net
Film reviews archive: 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Michael+Redman

Title
Review for One True Thing (1998)
Two great mysteries: death and parents
Removing masks may be the most difficult thing we can do. We all wear them and
many of our relationships are mask to mask rather than human being to human
being. They make life easier. It's much simpler to deal with most of the
people you encounter during the day as personas and not people.
The danger is when we treat our lovers, close friends and other intimate
relationships as their roles, ignoring the reality of the individual. Perhaps
the most difficult barrier to break through is that between parents and
children. These stereotypes are formed so early in life that it's tough for
parents to see their grown children as entities separate from themselves. For
an offspring to view their parents as something other than "Mommy" and "Daddy"
takes a lot of work.
When Ellen Gulden (Renee Zellweger) returns to her small town home, the masks
start to slip a bit. Although she easily falls into old childhood patterns
desperate for her father's approval and disdaining her mother's homemaking,
real people slowly appear. 
Father George (William Hurt), a professor of American Literature, is a cold
perfectionist. Mother Kate (Meryl Streep), a Martha Stewart clone, devotes her
life to her women's group, the "Minnies", decorating the town for every
available holiday. Daughter Ellen is an investigative reporter for "New York"
magazine without a moment to spare.
That's who they are and that's who they remain until Kate discovers that she
is dying of cancer. Then the old model falls apart. Everyone's armor develops
chinks and begins to dissolve as they deal with real life. Ellen starts to
come to grips with her anger at her father and her embarrassment for her
mother when they emerge from their archetypes.
The film is slow at first, but director Carl Franklin ("Devil In A Blue Dress"
seems to have crafted it that way so we can appreciate the characters'
evolution. His choice of presenting the story as a flashback from a scene of
Ellen being questioned about her mother's death is less successful. The
framing scenes are supposed to present a mystery but it is a minor one and not
worth the plot details that are given away.
Streep couldn't be better and that should come as no surprise. As Kate slowly
succumbs to her disease, her transformation is astounding. An Oscar nomination
would be in order. This is Hurt's best performance in a long time, more than
making up for his unfortunate Professor Robinson in "Lost In Space". Although
Zellweger's teary-eyed hurt and angry little girl is tedious occasionally, she
hits the role right on target more often than not.
A few characters appear to have little purpose. Ellen's brother and her
on-again, off-again boyfriend do little for the story. Her New York friend who
visits a few times has an intriguing screen presence but is only seen for a
few minutes. We are left to wonder why these people exist.
The same is true of the subplot concerning Ellen's attempts to track down a
political story. These scenes could have been eliminated without affecting the
film at all.
Meryl Streep films are often not fun. This is no exception. It's real, it's
poignant, it's instructive, but it's certainly not pleasant. And it's not
supposed to be. Great art isn't always a frolic in the sunshine, but it is
always worthwhile. If this motivates us to lose those masks for a little
while, it will have done its job. Maybe it's time to give Mom and Dad a call.
(Michael Redman as written this column for over 23 years and would like to
state for the record that he also didn't have sexual relations with "that
woman" as defined by the legal description. He would like to volunteer himself
as a witness to the fact that he did not observe Bill Clinton engaging in sex
with Monica Lewinsky during the deposition in the present tense while they
were or were not alone. Email a more exciting tale to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 9/24/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
* (out of ****)
In this re-make of the 1954 Japanese monster film, Godzilla is transformed
into a "Jurassic Park" copy who swims from the South Pacific to New York for
no real reason and trashes the town. Although some of the destruction is
entertaining for a while, it gets old fast. 
The film often makes no sense (a several-hundred foot tall beast hides in
subway tunnels), sports second-rate effects (the baby Godzillas seem to be one
computer effect multiplied on the screen), lame jokes (Mayor Ebert and his
assistant Gene are never funny), horrendous acting (even Matthew Broderick is
dull) and an unbelievable love story (why would anyone want to get back
together with Maria Pitillo's character?).
There are other elements of the film that fall flat, but going on would just
be a waste of good words.  Only for die-hard creature feature fans, this
might be fun if you could check your brain at the door. I couldn't.
(Michael Redman has written this column for 23 years and has seldom had a more
disorienting cinematic experience than seeing both "Fear And Loathing" and
"Godzilla" in the same evening.)
[This appeared in the 5/28/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Grosse Pointe Blank (1997)
Heading to his 10-year high school reunion, Martin Blank (John Cusack)
is having something of an early mid-life career crisis. It seems that
his chosen profession of hitman-for-hire just isn't as emotionally
rewarding as he would like for it to be. He's even seeing therapist Dr.
Oatman (Alan Arkin) who's so afraid of him that the sessions are
monologues.
At the urging of his office manager Marcella (sister Joan Cusack) and
Oatman, Blank decides to attend the reunion and patch things up with his
high-school sweetheart that he stood up for the prom just before he
disappeared from sight for a decade. Conveniently he also has a hit
scheduled nearby.
Once back in town, he discovers that you really can't go home again;
especially if they've built a Stop And Rob on the site. He does find his
ex though. Suspicious Debi (Minnie Driver) appropriately keeps him at
arm's length as she perfects her "Don't! Stop! Don't! Stop! Don't stop!
Don't stop!" routine. Odd chemistry that works well on occasion.
To further complicate matters there are several uninvited guests in
town. Rival assassin Grocer (Dan Aykroyd) is attempting to start a
hitman union and Blank doesn't want to join. Grocer decides to
exterminate the scab in the time-honored tradition of the vocation.
Another killer is hanging out to eliminate Blank. Two G-Men are trailing
our hero waiting for him to strike. It's a crowded little rich suburb.
The film milks the most out of every situation. High school reunions are
inherently ripe with comedic possibilities. People who knew each other
for a few years as kids and haven't been in touch for years are
desperate to impress. As everyone else is bragging about their adult
careers, Blank is upfront about his and receives remarkably blase'
responses: "Good for you. Growth industry." 
The dialog is thickly layered. You have to pay attention to catch
everything that is going on as often more than one character is talking
at the same time. When that's not happening, the retorts come fast and
furious. Much of the subtle humor is easy to miss if you're careless.
Despite the commercials promising a light romantic comedy, there's a
very dark tint to the story. At the same time that Cusack's murderer has
us rolling in the aisles, he's killing a gunman by stabbing him with a
ball point pen. Grocer and Blank shoot at each other with a gun in each
hand in a scene (unfortunately, more than one) straight out of a Clint
Eastwood western while blasting away others. The extreme violence goes
hand in hand with the extreme wit.
Although the humor is of the highest level, the movie doesn't provoke
much psychological involvement. Even with her standoffishness, there
isn't much guesswork involved in figuring out if Martin and Debi will
get together. Will Blank survive? You can probably figure it out. Cusack
is a tad too cool for me to care much about him.
But it doesn't matter very much. The comedy is king here and the
characters secondary. Check it out. Watch and listen closely and you'll
be entertained. And that's what you're going to this film for.
[This appeared in the 4/17/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Sgt. Bilko (1996)
Steve Martin is one of the funniest men alive. If you can take that as a true
statement, then your disappointment at this film will equal mine. Martin can
be hilarious, creating some of the best laugh-out-loud experiences that have
ever taken place in movie theaters. You won't find any of them here.
The old television series that this is based on has its moments of humor and
wit. Bilko (and the name isn't an accident) is the head of an army motor pool
group, but his passion is his schemes. Every episode involves the sergeant and
his men in one or another hair-brained plan to get rich quick while outwitting
the officers of the base. "McHale's Navy"'s granddaddy.
That's the idea behind this movie too, but the difference is that, as
far-fetched and usually goofy as the television series was, it was funny.
There is not one laugh in the film. The re-make retains the goofiness, but not
the entertainment.
Everything is just too clean. It was obviously made on a Hollywood back lot
and looks every bit like it. It all looks brand new, even the old beat-up
stuff. Martin is remarkably small in what should have been a bigger than life
role. In the original, Phil Silvers played the huckster with a heart of gold
and more than a touch of sleaziness. Martin's Bilko is a pale imitation.
The only semi-bright spot is Phil Hartman as Bilko's arch-enemy. It's not
saying much, considering Martin's lackluster character, but Hartman leaves him
in the dust.
[This appeared in the 4/4/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Book of Shadows: Blair Witch 2 (2000)
"Book" should have remained in shadows
Certain things in our lives are inevitable. Death, sorrow, love, heartbreak,
pain, joy. We expect these events. We know they're going to happen and some,
we even look forward to. It's part of the human condition.
We have also become accustomed to inevitable occurrences in our society. As
we near the fall election, several of them are hitting us in the face.
Politicians exaggerate their own importance. Our side is always right;
theirs is always wrong. In the end, voters are usually forced to choose the
lesser of two whocares.
In Hollywood the one indisputable inevitable is that if a film makes big
money, there will be a sequel. Even if the original story doesn't merit one.
Even if the first film is complete in itself. Even if success is a fluke.
"The Blair Witch Project" was made with a budget of $1.75 and exploded on
the screen, raking in huge profits. The concept was brilliant. The
filmmakers created a remarkable buzz that the story might be real. The film
itself was even more convincing. The movie _must_ be authentic. Why else
would such amateurish footage be on the big screen?
The first film caught lightning in a bottle. The sequel proves you can't
pour that old lightning into a new bottle.
You have to give this effort some credit. It would have been easy to have
made the same movie again with a new group of kids. It would have been easy,
but of course, it wouldn't have worked.
Instead "Book Of Shadows" acknowledges the first film as a movie and
concentrates on the hysteria following its release. It's a great scheme and
possibly the only entertaining way to do a sequel.
Unfortunately it doesn't work either.
Five kids spend the night in the woods at the scene of the first film. Weird
stuff happens and they retreat to an old factory where one of them lives.
Even weirder stuff happens. Some people die, there's blood and knives and
none of the characters have a lick of common sense.
While supposedly doing serious research, the group sets up a circle of
surveillance cameras in the ruins of the old house in the woods and vows to
stay alert all night awaiting a visitation. Then they proceed to get totally
trashed on drugs and alcohol and party down with very loud, very obnoxious
heavy metal music. It's a bad plan.
The cast shows some early promise. A couple is doing research on a "Blair
Witch" book. The tour guide is a former mental patient turned ebay
aficionado. A Goth amazon princess adds a bit of comedic relief. The
obligatory hot babe is the 2000 spiritual cinematic descendent of the cute
hippie chick, the cute rock and roll chick and the cute disco chick: the
cute Wiccan chick.
The first film's unaccomplished actors came across as real people in a real
situation because hours and hours of video were shot during days in the
woods. This time, these unaccomplished actors just come across as
unaccomplished actors. There's not one character you care about when they
start shouting for no reason.
Although what passes for a plot starts out with a solid idea, it's ruined by
poor execution. The follow-up to one of the most successful horror films
ever is nothing more than a bad slasher movie. They're trapped in an old big
weird house. They stupidly separate into various rooms. There are strange
noises, they see scary apparitions and people disappear. Ever see this movie?
Seasoned documentary director Joe Berlinger should know better. The film
features mostly cheap tricks and unnecessary gore. For a storyline filled
with surprises, it's oddly predicable.
"The Blair Witch Project" was a rare triumph of style over substance. "The
Book Of Shadows" is a triumph of tedium over promise.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 25 years. For the first
time during that period, he's going to vote for someone who might make a
good President. But he'll have to use a pencil to do it. Send vapid
political commentary to redman@bluemarble.net.)
[This appeared in the 11/2/00 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bluemarble.net]

Title
Review for Kundun (1997)
Tibet has entered the American consciousness slowly during the past few years
and burst into the forefront recently. The Dalai Lama has made speaking tours,
Tibetan designs and artifacts are showing up in shops, the plight of the
people has captured the imagination of major actors and artists and now there
are two big budget films within as many months.
"Kundun" ("Presence", a name the monks call the young Dalai Lama) opens in
1937 with the search for the 14th incarnation of the Tibetan leader. A group
of monks enters a village and a two-year-old child catches their attention.
The young boy proves himself by identifying possessions of the previous holy
man as "mine". He and his family are then moved to a monastery in Lhassa where
he is to be prepared to take his position as the religious and political
leader of the country.
He is forced into difficult decisions when China invades the country in 1950.
The peaceful and isolated country is ill-equipped to fight off the intruders
and diplomatic attempts over the next years yield no results. Eventually he
must make the painful choice to flee to neighboring India. 
Comparisons to "Seven Years In Tibet" are inevitable. Both films cover much of
the same ground although the earlier movie does so from a westerner's point of
view and features boxoffice draw Brad Pitt. "Kundun" features only native
actors and is more of an insider's story. In some ways, this makes this film a
superior concept, but it lacks the movement and spark that made "Seven Years"
such an audience-pleaser.
The actors contribute to the realistic feel of the movie (filmed in Morocco
for obvious reasons). The only disappointment is Chairman Mao who looks like a
wax dummy and moves as if he were a computer-generated character.
On an intellectual level, it is interesting to see how two different
approaches handle the same facts. Some events are depicted differently and
Pitt's Austrian mountain-climber who was portrayed as a pivotal influence in
the Dalai Lama's life isn't even mentioned here.
Glossed over in "Seven Years", the problems with the Tibetan political system
is hinted at here as the Dalai Lama muses "We were just about to change
things" after the Chinese attack.
The film is magnificently beautiful thanks primarily to the cinematography of
Roger Deakins. His lingering camera shows the exotic Tibetan culture with
luscious detail. Especially striking is an extreme moving close up of a sand
mandala grain by grain. The visual treats more than make up for the movie's
faults creating a poetic meditation for the audience. Walking out of the
theater you feel like you have awakened from a transcendental experience.
Martin Scorsese, known for his dark tales of the underworld ("Goodfellas",
"Taxi Driver", "Casino") has shifted gears. Something of a thematic follow-up
to his "The Last Temptation Of Christ", this is his slowest film yet. Oddly
enough for a director with a history of graphic violence presenting a history
filled with atrocities by the Chinese, most of these events take place off-screen.
His decision to not over-explain rituals is commendable. The stumbling oracle
who spits out his prophecies while in a trance state is much more effective as
a mystery than if we were spoon-fed interpretations.
Philip Glass's score is impressive although at times it is too overwhelming
and distracting.
I talked to a Tibetan I met outside the theater who had just seen the film and
was walking back in to see it again. Hearing his description of how he escaped
from Tibet at the age of seven and how his father was one of the soldiers
accompanying the Dalai Lama during his trip to India, I was struck by what was
missing in the movie. As grand as it looks and as historically accurate as it
is, there is a distance between the audience and the movie. The film is more
concerned with visuals and history and less so with human beings.
With the exception of a few scenes, involvement with the characters is slight.
One of those exceptions is the portrayal of the young Dalai Lama, shown as a
mischievous boy who can't resist being a kid sometimes. An encounter with his
older brother Thubten J. Norbu (a retired Indiana University professor) who
tells the young leader the Chinese have ordered him to persuade him to accept
Communist rule or kill him is an outstanding moment, but there aren't many of these.
Even with its problems, the "Kundun" experience is phenomenal, but one that I
fear most will miss. Many people who saw "Seven Years In Tibet" will have a
"Been there, done that" attitude. It's likely that the film will miss a
wide-spread appeal and public response will be the sound of one hand clapping.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 22 years: 18 years less than
the Dalai Lama has been in exile. Electronic meditations can go to redman@bvoice.com.)
[This appeared in the 1/22/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Ghost and the Darkness, The (1996)
In a film based on a true story, Val Kilmer and Michael Douglas team up
to hunt down ghostly man-eating lions and build a bridge in turn of the
century Africa. Now there's a high concept.
Bridge-builder John Patterson (Kilmer) is sent to darkest Africa in 1898
to help the British empire win the race to colonize the continent. His
project is going along well until the Indian and African workers start
getting eaten by large cats. And not just ordinary cats. The two deadly
and massive male lions hunt together, drag off full grown men from the
compound, attack in broad daylight and frighten the workers so badly
that they name them the Ghost and the Darkness. 
Patterson is unable to "sort out" the problem so his bosses call in
famed hunter Charles Remington (Douglas), a Confederate States Of
America expatriate. Together the two attempt to put an end to the
devastation only to discover that the killers seem to be something more
than just animals. Plans fall apart, traps fail and the lions appear to
be killing for the pleasure of it.
There's blood wherever you look in the film. Every couple of minutes the
lions are ripping someone apart. People with an aversion to gore might
want to skip this: theres more internal organs here than in a "Friday
The 13th" film.
Patterson and Remington are a study in contrasts. The Englishman is prim
and proper even in the bush country while the southerner dances with the
Masai warriors. Kilmer holds back while Douglas tries to let it all out.
Even with all of his experiences, Patterson is a little too stiff to
even have high tea with. Remington is the unpredictable loud drunken
obnoxious guy that you shy away from at late night parties.
Unfortunately Douglas cant quite pull it off. An admirable actor, he
has the Great White Hunter bit down pat, but doesn't do Wild Man as
well. When dancing with the African lion hunters, he looks like one of
the whitest men in the hemisphere.
Neither of the stars are tremendously likable or believable. Much more
interesting is the supporting cast and, of course, the magnificent
scenery. As dramatic as the story is, it rarely catches fire.
Supernatural lions, death and destruction, midnight hunts, majestic
locale and yet it all just sits there waiting for something to happen.
[This appeared in "The Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana,
10/17/96. Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Entrapment (1999)
If the real world were like some recent Hollywood films, most of the couples
strolling down the street would be 60 year old men with women in their 20s.
The older women and younger guys would be left sitting around playing euchre.
This does happen occasionally although not at the frequency that Sean Connery
and Clint Eastwood would have us believe. What is the appeal? Freud suggests
that women look for their fathers and older men make good big daddies.
The more likely explanation, according to some theories, is the biological
hardwiring left over from prehistoric days. Subconsciously, men seek
childbearing potential and women look for protection from the dangerous
beasties for their offspring. In our society older men are the more powerful.
As Henry Kissinger supposedly observed, "Power is the ultimate aphrodisiac."
(Of course Kissinger's comment was self-serving, he being an extremely
powerful man at the time. It would be like me proposing the idea that writing
movie reviews is the ultimate aphrodisiac - and I can assure you that has
_never_ worked.)
In the alternate dimension of cinema, the explaination is a bit simpler. A
young romantic interest asserts the virility of the leading man and gives the
males in the audience something to look at. As the adventure heroes age, they
still have a box office draw, but need some propping up.
The film industry is slower in recognizing the appeal of mature women. There
are a few roles available (Sigourney Weaver is over 50), but they are rare.
I could go on about this topic and am tempted to. It's much more interesting
than the film this column is supposed to be about.
Connery is Robert "Mac" MacDougal, a famed art thief so successful that now he
pulls jobs just for the thrill of it. When insurance investigator Virginia
Baker (Catherine Zeta-Jones) convinces her boss that Mac is behind a recent
theft, she's on his trail.
She teams up with Mac to catch him in the act. Or is she actually a thief
herself and needs his help? Or is something else entirely going on?
The opening sequence involves a high-tech heist with the thief hanging upside
down outside a skyscraper and breaking in to a heavily protected room. A half
hour later one of the characters drops a supposed bombshell about that scene
that anyone with eyes and half a brain has already figured out. 
Connery is a charismatic as ever. As he ages, he is no longer the agile James
Bond, but his acting skills have only increased. This is certainly not his
greatest role, but it's virtually impossible for him to be uninteresting.
Zeta-Jones captured the imagination of the movie-going public in last year's
"Zorro". She appears to have some talent, but here she's mostly eye candy for
the males in the audience. A scene where she's clad in a skin-tight outfit and
moving snake-like through a series of security lasers appears designed
primarily to show us what an impressive posterior she possesses.
Surprisingly, most of the time there's not a great deal of chemistry between
the two. They connect for a few moments, but usually it's as though they are
in different rooms. This part of the formula doesn't work.
There is an abundance of wasted potential. Ving Rhames, as Mac's partner, is
on screen for only seconds. Will Patton is Virginia's boss but his character
is boring and serves no function. Maury Chaykin is something like you might
expect if Marlon Brando played Jabba The Hutt, but is oddly understated for
such an over-the-top role.
Understated may be the theme for the movie. Much of the action feels lame. The
sexual tension doesn't click. The plot maneuverings are too often transparent.
The film features a few entertaining bits. The climax atop the world's tallest
buildings in Kuala Lumpur features its share of excitement. A New Year's Eve
theft depends upon a bank's last minute Y2K testing making this the first film
to incorporate a millennium bug plot device.
The primary appeal is the two stars. Connery's screen presence is like an old
friend. Zeta-Jones' butt is nice, but I'm not sure its worth the price of a ticket.
(Michael Redman has been writing a film column much like this one for over 23
years but refuses to believe he falls into the "older man" category yet.
Comments about his delusions go to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 5/6/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Ronin (1998)
The people who completely devote themselves to a leader or a cause live with a
double-edged sword. In one sense their life is easy. They are positive about
what is right and justified in doing anything and everything to achieve their
goal. On the other hand, if that to which they are dedicated disappears, they
are lost, without purpose.
In ancient Japan these rogues were called Ronin. Nowadays they are called
former CIA and KGB agents.
When a Japanese feudal lord was killed, his samurai were masterless and often
roamed the countryside selling their skills to the highest bidders. In
Ronin, after the fall of the Soviet Union, the modern homeless samurai
become criminals-for-hire.
Ex-CIA operative Sam (Robert De Niro) is recruited by comely Irish lass
Deirdre (Natascha McElhone) to help engineer a high jacking. No one knows much
about the job. For Seamus (Jonathan Pryce), an unseen employer with an unknown
motive, he's supposed to steal a metallic box with a mystery content from an
unknowable number of men who are somewhere. Sam doesn't care about the
details: he's in it for the bucks.
In Paris, he's joined by ex-KGB computer expert Gregor (Stellan Skarsgard),
weapons specialist Spence (Sean Bean), driver Larry (Skipp Sudduth) and their
local French connection Vincent (Jean Reno). Slowly they find out more about
their mission but never more than they need to know and often not even that much.
The heist becomes more complex than they expected when they have to race an
unidentified group of Russians to the prize while entangled in betrayal,
double and triple-crosses. The audience rarely knows anything more about what
is going on than do the participants. Like the owls in "Twin Peaks", no one is
what they seem.
In the early sixties, director John Frankenheimer gave us two masterpieces of
political suspense, "The Manchurian Candidate" and "Seven Days In May". This
film doesn't live up to its ancestors, but there are aspects that make a
strong stab at it.
"Ronin" has an odd feel throughout. The colors are severely muted, as if it
were shot entirely at twilight on an extremely hazy day. This lends itself to
an indistinct visual aspect that mirrors the hazy plot. It also makes it look
like a washed-out film from decades ago.
As is to be expected in action films, there are plenty of car chases, but they
are the strangest that I can remember. Even though there are explosions and
wrecks galore as a shoot-out takes place racing against traffic on an
expressway, they are remarkably unspectacular. 
Huge trucks overturn and explode, but they're only onscreen for a second. Cars
flip over and over but are only seen out of the corner of your eye. This is
contrary to the current style of focusing on the disasters, seeing them over
and over from different points of view. Although this imparts a participatory
feeling to the action -- after all, if you're in a speeding car you're not
going to spend a lot of time looking in the rear view mirror -- there's a lack
of spectacle which leaves the audience wanting something with a little more oomph.
There's a coldness to the characters that doesn't allow us to get to know any
of them very well. This makes some sense as people in their particular
profession can't afford to let too much out or get very involved. But this
prevents the audience from caring much about them. The one time where the
detachment does work well is when Sam kisses Deirdre to fool passing police.
The ice princess' passionate response has more impact because it is the only
time during the movie that she lets loose with any emotion.
Sam's friendship with Vincent is one of the few human relationships in the
film. Although they know little about each other, they bond out of necessity,
trusting each other with their lives. In the world of the Ronin, you take it
where you can get it but you also know that the next time you meet up, you
might be on opposite sides.
The success of the film lies mostly in the strength of the actors. De Niro is
always a master on screen. His weary but dedicated Sam is exactly what he
should be. Although he's made some questionable choices in his career
("Mission Impossible", "Godzilla"), Reno has a face and presence made for
movies. He's the tough guy that you want to like. The rest of the players are
equally up to the task although you'll find yourself desiring a bit more warmth.
The script, by an uncredited David Mamet, is nothing exceptional but his short
repetitive style fits well in the mouths of the men without a past or future.
The Nice streets and French countryside offer plenty to look at and provide a
picturesque backdrop to the story.
Although it only runs two hours, the film seems long. The car chases are
excessive and become tiresome after a while. Some of them could have been left
on the cutting room floor to leave room for character development.
The end of the cold war resulted in a calmer world, but after seeing "Ronin",
you are left to wonder how many of these loose cannons are running around out
there. I suppose they'll find new masters in time. Let's hope that they end up
working for the good guyswhoever the good guys are.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and is currently
soaking his feet after the Lotus Festival experience. Congratulations to all
involved in one of the best events that Bloomington has to offer.
Redman@indepen.com will probably get important electrons to him.)
[This appeared in the 10/1/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Rich Man's Wife, The (1996)
There's not much worse than expending mental energy trying to follow and
solve a poorly executed thriller. About the only thing I can think of is
if the film ending lets you know that you wasted your time because it
was all a fraud.
Here we have the worst of both possible scenarios.
Josie Potenza (Halle Berry) is trapped in a loveless marriage  or maybe
it's not: it's hard to tell if even this is true. Because of a pre-nup,
if she divorces her rich husband, she gets none of his wealth and having
his money is an important concern to her. She is befriended by Cole
Wilson (Peter Greene), a creepy psycho, who takes seriously their
conversation in a bar that she could have her husband murdered for the
insurance money. 
Maybe this happened; you never know for sure. Remember that sentence
because it applies to everything I will say about the plot.
Wilson kills husband Tony (Christopher McDonald) in what is the only
worthwhile scene in the film. Filmed at night in the rain, he shoots his
prey repeatedly with a gun that continually alternates firing and
jamming. The victim runs, stumbles, is shot again and again in a
frighteningly desperate spectacle. This appears to be a realistic murder
or at least the makings of a nightmare and is wasted in the middle of
what is otherwise a piece of trash.
After the killing, there rest of the film is a torturous slow-moving
mumbo-jumbo of Wilson stalking Josie who seeks help from her lover while
a couple of the stupidest members of the police force try to solve the
mystery.
None of the main actors offer anything that has not been done better in
many other movies. The only stand-out is the ditzy ex-wife (Clea Lewis)
of Jose's lover who livens up the otherwise gray tale for her three
minutes of screen time.
The film is filled with a zillion twists and turns that, in the hands of
a more skilled director and writer, could have been the basis for
something more interesting. In this film, they are just the foundation
for a "Who cares?" attitude as the plot holes engulf the entire movie.
The most disappointing of all is the ending which is obviously meant to
make the audience feel that something clever has been accomplished on
the part of the plot. Instead it completely invalidates everything that
has gone on before.
A despicable story with a cheat for an ending. If you have any
inclination to see this, do anything else (and I mean __anything__ else:
take the dog for a walk, do your dishes, go to the dentist) and youll
have a better time. When the video comes out in about two weeks; rent
it, fast-forward to the murder scene and watch the five minutes of
decent filmmaking and do not succumb to the temptation to view the rest.
Your life will be better for it.
[This appeared in the 9/19/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
This irrelevant romp through a battle with goofy aliens is everything that
"Mars Attacks" promised last summer and failed to deliver: it's comical and
almost has a plot.
Back about the time of the Roswell landing -- or crash dummies in a weather
balloon, depending on which outlandish tale you chose to believe -- the "scum
of the universe" began moving to earth. Now there are 1500 disguised as humans
living mostly in New York City, although anyone who has spent time in the Big
Apple might have estimated a higher number. Think of it as "Casablanca without
the Nazis" as Special Agent K explains.
As with everything else in our brave new world, these offworlders need to be
kept track of and the public protected from itself. That task falls to the Men
In Black, members of an agency so secret that even the government doesn't know
about it. Agents K and J (Tommy Lee Jones and Will Smith) are at the forefront
of immigration control. ("Jones" and "Smith": now those are names that aliens
might take.)
Disguised as humans (notably Newt Gingrich, Dennis Rodman and Sylvester
Stallone) they mostly live normal lives until a viscous insectoid illegal
alien arrives on an assassination mission. Mission completed, the bug goes on
a killing spree while the planet is in danger of destruction.
Director Barry Sonnenfeld ("Addams Family", "Get Shorty") has taken a little
known Malibu comic book and turned out a witty film filled with subtle jests
as well as the expected slapstick and outer space goo. The almost-overlooked
material is as comical as the longer more obvious scenes. J's delivery of the
tenacled baby and  K's shakedown of a reluctant dog are hilarious. So is the
notion that the supermarket tabloids are the only ones to print the truth and
the throwaway "Elvis isn't dead, he's gone home" line.
Jones' deadpan delivery is perfect for the blas agent who's seen too much and
is training his new partner in the ways of the unexpected. (After shooting off
the head of a pawnshop owner who promptly grows it back and reveals a cache of
high-tech weapons hidden behind the jewelry, K asks his associate "Did you
notice anything strange?")
Smith, in his return to the science fiction battles after "Independence Day",
is the tall handsome leading man for the end of the century. If Eddie Murphy
were still making quality movies, he might have had this role. Since Murphy's
career fell apart a few years back due to some bad choices, Smith fills his
wise-cracking over the edge shoes admirably.
The supporting roles are filled with competent actors (Rip Torn, Linda
Fiorentino) but don't get much screen time. The exception is Vincent D'Onofrio
who plays the giant cockroach in ill-fitting redneck skin suit. As his face
constantly slips around and scrunches up in the corners, the bug doesn't quite
have the "walking around in human skin" gig down and steals every scene that
he's in.
There are a few problems. The buddy bit of this buddy film doesn't come
across, the film seems a bit short and some portions underdeveloped. But it's
an energetic comedy and the effects are impressive without burying the humans.
It's one of the few films of the genre that you won't regret seeing.
(Michael Redman as penned these words of wisdom for over 21 years and would
like to congratulate Chet Chmielewski and Jennifer St. Dennis on the birth of
their daughter Kathryn Claire who has nary a tentacle in sight. Electronic
missives shoot directly to mredman@bvoice.com )
[This appeared in the 7/10/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana]
-- 
mailto:mredman@bvoice.com

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
"The universe is not only stranger than you imagine, it's stranger than you
_can_ imagine."
That's been a favorite quote of mine for years, although I don't know who said
it. I would like to think it was Einstein or the Buddha, but in truth it was
probably Spock or Kramer. It doesn't matter where it came from, the reality of
it is apparent. We can't begin to fathom most of the answers. Rarely can we
even ask the questions.
True understanding of the nature of the world is beyond our science. The
occult can only be glimpsed: that's why it's called the occult. Even our own
lives are filled with invisibles that we usually choose to blind ourselves to.
Young eight-year-old Cole Sear (Haley Joel Osmet) can see some of those
unknowns. Everywhere he goes, the restless dead appear. Some even strike up
conversations. Understandably Cole isn't exactly comfortable with the
situation. In fact, he hides in a church and under a make-shift tent in his
bedroom, hoping to avoid the deceased.
Child psychologist Malcolm Crowe (Bruce Willis) is dedicated to helping Cole
cope with what the doctor believes are delusions. Malcolm is also haunted, but
his spectre is the memory of a similar child he was unable to help years ago.
The opening scene of the film is that child, grown to a gaunt spooked adult,
breaking into Malcolm's apartment, blaming him for his misery.
Slowly, the doctor begins to believe Cole's accounts. Maybe the dead really do
want to talk to him. Why?
The film is difficult to talk about for a couple of reasons. The are a few
minutes that completely change the movie and are obviously the most important
scenes in the film. But to discuss them would ruin the flow of the movie for
viewers. Every single person leaving the theater is talking about those
moments. Every one.
I also have very mixed feelings about the movie. There's a heavy oppressive
mood that fits the storyline perfectly, but it rarely lets up. The dramatic
lighting, settings and deliberate slow pacing do exactly what they should, but
halfway through, you're looking for some relief. For some of "Sixth Sense", I
was fighting the urge to view the inside of my eyelids.
But then there are the few minutes that will blow you away.
I was left wondering if those scenes made the rest of the film worthwhile.
Yes, they do. The movie could have been better had more time been spent with
Cole's encounters with his visitors or if there were more breaks from the
melodrama, but it still works.
This is not a scary monster film. The ghosts aren't particularly terrifying.
But there is a point where you must challenge some of your preconceptions
about what is going on. That thought alone is unsettling. What if things
outside the movie different than you believe? What if consensus reality is
wrong? This is the scary stuff.
Osment is a wonder. There aren't many kid actors that could pull off the
horrified, yet resigned to his fate, character. He does it effortlessly. I
happened to catch his appearance on a talk show and was astonished to discover
that he seems to be a normal boy. He's doing real, honest-to-god acting in
this film, not just playing himself like most child actors do.
Willis is always fun to watch, even in the infinite remakes of "Die Hard" with
different names. There are a few films where he steps out of that persona to
become something more real. This is one of those.
Toni Collette as Cole's mother Lynn may be the most believable character in
the movie and offers a down to earth quality to the otherworldliness of the
film. She's a single mom, working too hard, trying to do too much. Lost in her
endless tasks, she feel helpless to deal with her son's retreat from life.
If you are going to see this film, don't let anyone tell you about it. Don't
read any more reviews. Don't ask about those few minutes. There are any number
of things in life that need to be experienced and for which words are
inadequate. This is one of them.
(Michael Redman has written this column for a very long time. You can send any
comments you like to Redman@indepen.com, but he still isn't going to tell you
about those scenes.)
[This appeared in the 8/19/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Amistad (1997)
Slavery is bad. After hundreds of years, we've finally figured that one out.
This almost universal belief is the both the strength and weakness of director
Steven Spielberg's latest "serious" film.
During the late 1830s, a Portuguese slave ship carries a cargo of black men
and women kidnapped from their home on Africa's west coast to Cuba to be sold
into slavery. Fifty-three of them are stuffed into the "La Amistad" (from a
Spanish word for "friendship") by their new Spanish owners.
Freeing himself from his chains, Senge Pieh (Djimon Hounsou), renamed Cinque
by his masters, leads a bloody revolt. After killing most of the crew, the
Africans force the remaining sailors to return them to their home - or so they
think. Instead the ship heads up the coast to the United States.
The Amistad is boarded by an American naval ship and the revolutionaries are
put on trial in Connecticut for murder and piracy. The legal question becomes
are they free men fighting justly for their freedom or are they property. If
they are property, who do they belong to? Their masters? The Spanish
government? Salvage rights of the officers who captured the ship? The US government?
The defendants are pawns in several games. Abolitionists Theodore Joadson
(Morgan Freeman) and Lewis Tappan (Stellan Skarsgard) want to free them, but
Tappan sees them primarily as a means to further the cause. Their lawyer Roger
Baldwin (Matthew McConaughey) views the case as a simple one of property
rights and a chance to make his share of legal fees. South Carolina Senator
John C. Calhoun (Arliss Howard) pursues the case for the political advancement
of the southern states. President Martin Van Buren (Nigel Hawthorne) is
willing to force the result towards his own political ends.
When the verdict looks to free the Africans, Van Buren replaces the judge with
one more sympathetic to his wishes. Even that doesn't work and the new judge
frees the kidnap victims. At the urging of Calhoun, the President then appeals
the case to the Supreme Court, populated by a majority of slave-owners.
This little-known (try finding it in any history text book) incident from
America's past would have gone down a darker path were it not for former
President John Quincy Adams (Anthony Hopkins) who is persuaded to argue the
case before the Supreme Court.
The slavery issue is easy pickin's for Spielberg. Much like his "Shindler's
List" (which followed "Jurassic Park" as this follows "Lost World"), the moral
sides are not difficult ones to choose. Nazis and slave traders: both treat
groups of others as less than human. It's not hard to see who the bad guys
are. Without that question to ponder, the director's job is more difficult. He
has to make the story interesting.
Spielberg succeeds for the most part. The visual aspect of the film is beyond
reproach. Where the movie falls down is a bit more subtle. There are very few
_people_ in the tale. In fact, Cinque is the only character who is fleshed
out. Tappan and Joadson are "abolitionists": symbols but not humans. Van Buren
is a weak politician but nothing else. The rest of the "slaves" barely exist
other than dressing for the set. Like many other films about people of color,
almost all the major players are white.
The film's salvation lies in the acting strength of everyone involved and the
powerful presence of Hounsou. The former model's first major role is a winner.
Without speaking more than five words of English, he conveys more emotion than
most actors with a thousand lines of dialog.
The other stand-out is Hopkins who seems to be making a career out of
portraying American Presidents (he also played the title role in "Nixon"). The
impassioned speech by the doddering old man who phases in and out of
rationality is among the best court-room drama ever on the screen.
There are some other great moments. Especially impressive are the African's
struggle to understand what is going on in the strange land. Their
interpretation of the Bible based solely on the pictures and their own
experiences is poignant.
As grand as the epic is, it would have more impact had it focused more on the
experience from the point of view of the Africans. More humanity in  the fight
for humanity would have made it a four-star film.
(Michael Redman has written this column for a real long time and is just now
getting around to seeing some 1998 films.)
[This appeared in the 2/12/98 "Bloomington Voice" Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Crucible, The (1996)
Arthur Miller's fifties stage play turned nineties film may have a few
problems, but appearance, intensity and mood aren't among them. Foremost
in the intensity arena is star Daniel Day-Lewis.
Brooding Day-Lewis is developing a reputation for his extreme method of
getting into character. For this movie, he lived on isolated Hog Island
for two months getting to "know the land" and helping build by hand the
cabin his character lives in. By the time filming began, he had acquired
a deep farmer's tan, heavily callused hands and an immense 17th century
knife that he used to pass the time during breaks. Apparently he didn't
just get into character, he __became__ character.
After the movie was completed, he married Miller's daughter.
The play was written in 1952 at the height of the anti-communist
McCarthy hearings where entertainment figures, among others, were
pressured into "naming names". Once the names were public, the blacklist
began and public clamor took over. Miller testified but refused to turn
in his supposed comrades and as a result was held in contempt, refused a
passport for five years and almost jailed.
The play, about the Salem witch trials but a thinly veiled allegory
about the McCarthy turmoil, took 45 years to hit the big screen.
In 1692, the Puritans of Salem were gripped in mob hysteria and accused
many of their fellow townspeople of witchcraft resulting in the public
hanging of 19. The film is not very accurate in terms of historic facts,
but certainly captures the feel of those irrational times.
Day-Lewis is John Proctor an upstanding member of the community whose
life is tragically destroyed as the result of an indiscretion with young
Abigail Williams (Winona Ryder).
As the film opens, we see a group of teenage girls and Tituba, a slave
from Barbados, in the forest gathered around a caldron casting love
spells for the objects of the girls' affections. The relatively innocent
scene gathers some steam when Williams kills a chicken and drinks it's
blood and another girl dances nude in the woods -- something you might
not expect in Puritan society.
Their ritual is disturbed when the town minister happens upon them.
Everyone scatters except two young girls who fall into "comas". Certain
that the devil has slipped into Salem, a town meeting is called. The
girls reluctantly admit their activities but point to others in league
with Satan in order to get off the hook.
At first they accuse the most likely: the black slave, midwives and
village eccentrics. But then, infused with power, the girls point to
upstanding citizens and the community elders believe them. Williams sees
this as an opportunity to get rid of her rival, Proctor's wife (Joan
Allen) and eventually implicates Proctor himself.
The sexual heat between Day-Lewis and Ryder isn't as apparent on the
screen as it should be in order for this obsession to work.
(Historically, Proctor was in his sixties and Williams, her mid-teens.)
Aside from this, the film is a wonderfully crafted warning.
[This appeared in the 1/9/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at mredman@bvoice.com

Title
Review for Dragonheart (1996)
Dennis Quaid is a knight of 1000 years ago disillusioned with his vows who
teams up with Draco, the last of the dragons to run a scam on the local
villagers. Draco attacks a village and Quaid collects the gold while
pretending to kill him.
Later he has a change of heart and the two of them lead a peasant revolution
against the nefarious king.
Owing as much to the James Garner 1971 "Skin Game" as to the fantasy genre,
this could have been a wonderful movie. Close but certainly no cigar.
Draco's voice is done by Sean Connery. Connery has a grand sound, but it is
impossible to ever hear the dragon speak without thinking "Oh yeah, him!"
(Just like I always expect James Earl Jones' "This is CNN" to be followed by
"And I'm your father Luke.") This continually pulls you out of the story into
the reality that you are in a movie theater. Not a good thing.
There are too many plot lines that don't make sense. Quaid is a fierce dragon
killer, so skilled that he dispatches one in 10 seconds. But watching Draco in
action, it is impossible to believe that any one man would be much of a match
for the flying lizards.
Equally implausible is the dragon's dialog. Lines like "Yikes!" and irrelevant
unfunny humor get in the way. Every story element meanders.
Nothing remarkable here except Julie Christie's (as the Queen Mother) few
screen moments and a very visually convincing dragon.
[This appeared in the 6/6/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Last Days of Disco, The (1998)
All cultures have their mating rituals: a time and place where the eligible
get together to strut their stuff and pick whose stuff they like being
strutted. In many tribal cultures the men drum at a gathering demonstrating
their skills while the women dance for the drummers portraying theirs.
In the urban United States during the late seventies there were few drumming
circles so the twenty-somethings headed to discos to find their mates - even
very temporary ones. Disco music has been often denigrated as mediocre at best
and with good reason. But that's not the point. The music was always only a
means. The scene was the important aspect.
For a group of recent college graduates, the chosen ritual meeting place is a
club never named but obviously modeled after Club 54 where they gather
(assuming that they look cool enough to make it past the doorman) to dance the
night away under flashing lights. Their throbbing rhythms are mechanically
produced but the ritual is still the same.
Alice (Chloe Sevigny) and Charlotte (Kate Beckinsale) attempt to climb the
corporate ladder at a book publisher by day and work the social ladder in the
evenings. At the club they hang with Josh (Matthew Keeslar), an assistant DA;
Jimmy (MacKenzie Astin), a junior advertising executive and Des (Christopher
Eigeman), the club's assistant manager. They make up a fairly tight-knit group
playing together, dancing together and, you guessed it, sleeping together.
Although the film features the expected disco soundtrack, the stars spend
much more time talking than they do dancing. This is no "Saturday Night Live"
featuring stylized gyrations. Here the dancing is decidedly unglamorized
although for a few seconds now and then there is something interesting
happening on the dance floor.
To be blunt, these people lead a shallow existence. Some events in their
lives are exciting (Josh is investigating the club, Jimmy must sneak clients
in, Des has a coke problem and a parade of girlfriends), but they are just
wandering through.
What they mostly do is talk and when they're done, they talk some more.
Although the conversation is witty, the topics are banal. There's a long
discussion deconstructing Lady And The Tramp leading to the conclusion
that the film is why girls go for bad boys. A couple debates the technical
qualifications of virginity reminding me of numerous deliberations I've heard
about sexual activity and which category an evening fell into. "I did this and
he did that. Did we have sex?"
With the arrogance of youth, Charlotte wonders if people really ever danced
in bars before disco. Josh recounts the beginnings of the musical genre with
"Some people don't consider that 'disco' -- because it's good." Being advised
by her critical friend that throwing in the word "sexy" as often as possible
is a good thing, Alice explains to a one-night stand "there's something sexy
about Scrooge McDuck."
They talk about a couple who are cheating on a trial separation by secretly
seeing each other. Charlotte explains how VD isn't all bad because you have to
inform your previous sexual partners leading to renewed possibilities.
Although the conversations are witty and some of the lines priceless, the
intellectualizing about nothing becomes wearing. They are hanging out waiting
for something to happen and eventually the audience is doing the same. One of
the problems with the movie is that when the plot rears its ugly head, there's
not much there. An undercover investigation of the club's finances just gets
in the way of the film.
The actors do a fine job of portraying authentic characters. They're not very
likable people but they are real. Alice is the closest to someone that you'd
want to spend time with but Sevigny's performance is uneven. Occasionally warm
and human, she's so odd and quirky that it's uncomfortable to watch.
The guys are all clones of each other. They look and act so much alike that I
spent half of the film asking my companion which man was which. In fact nearly
everyone on the dance floor looks alike...except the ones that are dressed as
"Wizard Of Oz" characters or in a leopard print outfit or naked.
The only exception is Dan (Matt Ross), a co-worker at the book publisher. A
political activist, he has a distinctive personality. Until, that is, he is
able to get into the club. Then he becomes one more piece of fodder for the scene.
A companion piece to director Whit Stillman's other two films
("Metropolitan", "Barcelona"), the repartee is enjoyable and the look at group
social dynamics is almost enticing, but it would be nice if these people had
something going in their lives. Oh well, they're young and disco is dying so
maybe there's hope.
(Michael Redman has written this column for 23 years and is brave enough to
admit that he actually went to a disco club -- twice. Email your confessions
to redman@bvoice.com)
[The appeared in the 7/2/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana. Michael
Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Island of Dr. Moreau, The (1996)
Remember the scene near the end of "Apocalypse Now" where the boat
finally makes it to the village? What they find is a hidden society
filled with inhabitants involved in strange rituals and run by the
bigger than life God-King Marlon Brando. This film takes that village
even further into the Twilight Zone.
Edward Douglas (David Thewlis) is rescued from a life raft after
drifting for days in the Java sea when his plane crashed on the way to
his assignment as a UN peace negotiator. He is taken to a lush island by
an increasingly crazed doctor -- or is he a vet? -- Montgomery (Val
Kilmer).  The place is run by Dr. Moreau (Marlon Brando) who is splicing
human and various animal DNA in order to create the perfect non-violent
being.
Of course things fall apart. Montgomery starts the dominos tumbling by
killing a rabbit for dinner, then dead rabbits are found around the
island. A manimal is killed because he killed and dirty dog Hyena takes
over. Trouble in paradise. Almighty Brando can't keep them under control
as they revert more and more to their animal selves.
This is the third film based on the H. G. Wells book and is visually
hypnotizing. Each scene on the island is overflowing with mood and
movement. Men, animals and everything inbetween crowd the dark and
mutable screen. Montgomery's warning to Douglas describes the entire
film, "Be careful, there are a lot of unstable phenomena out there." 
Like much of "Apocalypse Now", there's far too much going on to catch it
all and that's the way it's supposed to be. The over-stimulation crowds
your senses, leaving few details, but creating a massive impression of
foggy and breathtaking eeriness.
Brando's Moreau is beyond outlandish as he is carried on a litter,
dressed in a muumuu, coated with pancake makeup and giving forth the law
while swamped and worshipped by his creations. Kilmer is just a bit less
bizarre as the drug doctor heading into insanity. His Brando Junior
impression is a masterpiece of the grotesque and fantastic.
Yeah, the extravagant make-up, sets and dark and murky feel of the film
are grand, but occasionally the story rears its ugly head and that's the
downfall of the movie. The religious overtones are extremely heavy
handed and the add-on preachy montage at the end is just horrid. Very
little happens for a reason. Characterization is minimal and often
sacrificed for sensationalism. We have no idea who any of these people
are or what lead them to the situation they find themselves in. The
animals are easier to care about than the humans.
See this film if you're up for a disturbing visual treat, but don't
expect anything beyond that.
[This appeared in "The Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana,
8/27/96. Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Contact (1997)
There are many times during this film that are remarkably stunning and
completely captivating. For the first time in what seems to be eons, that
statement applies to something other than the effects in a big budget science
fiction movie. What a relief it is to be fascinated by a film of this genre
with the plot and characters and where the aliens and explosions take a back
seat to the right stuff.
Ellie Arroway (Jodie Foster) is nine years old when she is fascinated by the
stars and by contacting people in far-away places with her ham radio. As she
grows older, she devotes her life to looking for messages from even more
distant locales and joins the SETI (Search for Extraterrestrial Intelligence)
project. Convinced that there is someone out there, she spends her time
listening to static, hoping for something more.
While waiting for the signal in Puerto Rico, she has time to fall into bed for
a brief affair with religious philosopher Palmer Joss (Matthew McConaughey), a
"man of the cloth without the cloth". The contrast between  the woman of
science and the man of god is the archetype for the film's theme.
When the financial rug is pulled out from under SETI, Arroway searches for
funding wherever she can find it. She strikes gold with eccentric zillionaire
S. R. Hadden (played with gusto by John Hurt). With his money in her back
pocket, she rents time on the Very Large Array radio telescope in New Mexico
and years later finally hears what she has been waiting for.
Of course when she announces her discovery, there is a rush by the government
to militarize the undertaking and take control. Suddenly the scientist finds
herself playing second fiddle to the National Security Advisor (James Woods)
and her former mentor David Drumlin (Tom Skerritt) who had pulled the plug on
SETI in Puerto Rico.
Deciphering the message from Vega reveals a video signal. (I kept waiting for
them to find a new tofu recipe from the Vegans) Piggybacked on the television
waves is a blueprint for a transport device for one person to take the trip to
the source of the communication. The question becomes who will go.
At a congressional hearing, Joss, who has become a White House spiritual
leader, asks the litmus test "Do you believe in God?" Arroway's response is
that she hasn't seen proof.
The film is more about that question of faith than it is about aliens. The
astronomer's obsessive conviction that life exists somewhere else is not much
different from religious certitude. When she has a life-changing experience
that she can't explain and has no substantiation for, it reminds us of Paul's
conversion on the road to Damascus.
        Director Robert Zemeckis ("Forrest Gump") has taken Carl Sagan's novel and
borrowed the motifs from "2001" and "Close Encounters" to create one of the
finest films around. 
He often focuses on media. In one scene Arroway is sending email while talking
on the phone and simultaneously receiving a fax: totally wired. Jay Leno,
Larry King, Bryant Gumbel and half the CNN crew play themselves on television
screens throughout the film. This technique creates the feel that you are
watching events as they are actually happening. Unfortunately the couple of
morphed-in Bill Clinton scenes pull you out of the story with an "Oh yeah,
this is a trick".
Jodie Foster has matured into an accomplished actress. Her superb performance
captures the astronomer's emotions with subtle notes. The catch in her voice
and breathing flutters when she is frightened are fine touches.
The movie's ending is a bit frightening. There is a strong possibility that
Zemeckis will blow it with a sugary sweet scene and it looks like he will.
Then there is the relief that he hasn't and all is back on track.
The film is long at two hours and 20 minutes, but surprisingly doesn't feel
strained and could have even taken more time to explore all the implications.
Leaving the theater, the audience was talking about the questions posed: a
good sign.
As Carl Sagan said about the possibility of life out there, "If it's just us,
that seems like an awful waste of space."
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 21 years and has spent about
twice that long looking up and waiting.)
[This appeared in the 7/10/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Rugrats Movie, The (1998)
I've always enjoyed the few minutes that I've caught The Rugrats on
television. It wasn't absorbing enough to watch the entire program, but a
short time with Tommy, Chuckie, Phil, Lil and Angelica was fun.
Unlike animated youngsters of yore, these aren't little angels. They talk
about boogers and laugh at bathroom humor. They stand a good chance of growing
up to become Beavis and Butthead.
In their feature length film debut, the kids get lost in a forest. They meet
up with a vicious wolf, mischievous monkeys and look for a magical "lizard"
who can grant them the wish to go home. Tommy is in charge of taking care of
his newborn baby brother and agonizes over his "sponsibility".
There are some funny bits. Their misunderstanding of adult words makes for an
occasional humorous pun. The phenomenon experienced by every parent of a baby
boy while changing diapers will have the audience laughing despite itself as a
rainbow forms in the misty air of the nursery.
Although their shorts on television are enjoyable, the film feels too long.
Considering the attention span of the target audience, I'm unsure that they
won't be squirming in their seats. When I saw the movie, one young boy had
more fun running to the back of the theater and rolling down the aisle and
then doing it again, and again.
Maybe that's all they want - big cartoon kids on the screen while the kids in
the audience have their own party. It's probably no coincidence that this
opens during Christmas shopping season: built-in mall babysitters.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and doesn't plan on
starting his Christmas shopping for, oh, about four weeks. Email electronic
gifts to Redman@indepen.com)
[This appeared in the 12/03/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Legend of Bagger Vance, The (2000)
At times we all would like a mysterious stranger to emerge from the mists
and impart sage wisdom that sets our life back on the path. And wouldn't it
be great if that guy had the coolness of Will Smith?
Rannulph Junuh (Matt Damon shot through the "Look Like Robert Redford"
camera filter) has just such a stroke of luck. The promising suthuun golf
pro turned shell-shocked ex-GI is enticed to play in a big-time tournament,
but soon discovers that his game don't mean a thing if it ain't got that
swing. Then raggedy man Bagger Vance (Smith) steps out of the night to put
his driver one with the universe.
The film has the feel of director Redford's recent efforts: "The Horse
Whisperer" and "A River Runs Through It". Mysticism mixed with a rough
manliness and topped with feel-good ending.
Cinematographer Michael Ballhaus's work is so beautiful that it's tempting
to ignore the movie's faults as he turns the game of golf into visual feast.
Tempting, but not impossible. Sports as a metaphor for life has to tread a
fine line between inspiration and corn. There's no tightrope walking here.
Redford topples into cartoonsville.
The Savannah town council is so goofy it could have been pulled from "The
Music Man". Junuh is "rescued" from a life of good-time drinking and poker
playing with his buddies. Not too bad a briar patch and it's difficult to
have much sympathy.
We never come to know much about any of these genteel folk. Vance himself is
the only character that works and that's because he isn't supposed to be a
normal human being. A black Zen Master in the Depression-era deep South:
this is not an ordinary traveler.
(You can hear the casting discussion between Redford and Smith: "I'm
supposed to do _what_?" "Well, you gots to shuffle like Steppin Fetchit, but
the upside is that you can almost walk on water.")
It's a pretty pretty film and worth a viewing just for that and Smith's
performance, but come on Bob, give us a story with people next time, huh?
(Michael Redman has written this column for a quarter century and for him,
golf is a game of looking for white Easter eggs in the woods. Pros can send
tips to redman@bluemarble.net.)
[This appeared in the 11/9/2000 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bluemarble.net.]
-- 
mailto:redman@bluemarble.net
Film reviews archive: 
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Wedding Singer, The (1998)
What were they thinking? Nostalgia for the seventies is bad enough, but do we
really need an eighties film?
Robbie Hart (Adam Sandler) used to want to be a rock and roll star, but in
1985 he's singing at weddings and having a good time. A romantic at heart, he
loves weddings and is just about to get married to his high-school sweetie.
When she leaves him waiting at the altar, his tune changes to "Love Stinks".
He meets waitress Julia (Drew Barrymore) who is engaged to a junk-bonds
salesman and you know that they are going to get together. In fact you know
everything that is going to happen during this movie.
Sandler is somewhat adequate in his leading man role, but there is no spark.
Barrymore doesn't seem to be able to convey anything other than a pretty face
with nothing behind it: beauty but no attitude. Both characters are just
there. Bit parts by Steve Buscemi and Jon Lovitz steal the show.
The eighties are shoved in our face. References to DeLoreans, Madonna,
"Dallas", Ivana and Donald, Burt and Loni and "Miami Vice" get old fast. The
filmmakers must have realized that there wasn't much entertainment to the
story and thought they could dazzle the audience with humorous period
allusions. They're not funny and it doesn't work.
With change on all fronts accelerating more and more, nostalgia appears to
have a great appeal, but don't you think we could have more than 14 years
before we yearn for the past. Maybe we can look forward to a film next year
waxing nostalgically about El Nino.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and he knows that
nostalgia is not what it used to be.)
[This appeared in the 3/5/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Krippendorf's Tribe (1998)
Just when we think that we've evolved culturally from our tribal cousins,
we're reminded that the trappings of our customs are just overlays on
primitive rituals. The universality of humanity hasn't changed much in
thousands of years. Lucky for James Krippendorf.
Anthropology professor Krippendorf (Richard Dreyfuss) has been in New Guinea
researching a lost tribe for two years. At least he was supposed to have been.
After his wife died, he spent that time - and the $100,000 grant money - lying
around his house. Now he has to give a presentation documenting his findings
and he has nothing.
At the lecture to reveal all the strange mysteries he has supposedly
discovered, Krippendorf looks at his speech notes which consist of blank pages
and comes up with what he thinks is a brilliant scam.  Inventing the
Shelmikedmu (named after the first few letters of each of his children) people
on the spot, he talks about the uniqueness of the tribe. The family unit of
this culture consists of single fathers. He bases his extemporaneous talk on
his own family's interactions.
The ruse works well until the Shelmikedmu capture the imagination of academia
and the pop anthropology crowd. Krippendorf becomes an over-night celebrity,
sought after by high society and the press. He is forced to invent more and
more about the tribe and to produce his filmed documentaries.
Enlisting the help of his kids, Shelly (Natasha Lyonne), Mikey (Gregory Smith)
and Edmund (Carl Michael Lindner), he dresses them up as tribesmen and throws
together a New Guinea scene in his back yard complete with pigs and huts. At
first the children are reluctant to co-operate. Their relationship with their
father has gone down the tubes since their mother died. Young Edmund hasn't
spoken a word to dad in two years. Then they get into it and the family begins
to pull together for the first time since the tragedy.
Krippendorf is pushed towards the limelight by fellow anthropologist Veronica
Micelli (Jenna Elfman from television's "Dharma And Greg"). Dragged kicking
and screaming before the television cameras, he embellishes his lie with
"facts" and numerous films.
Not everyone is fooled though. Suspicious professor Ruth Allen (Lily Tomlin)
believes something is amiss and sets out to prove that the Shelmikedmu don't exist.
There are some truly hilarious bits in the film. When Mikey constructs a
Shelmikedmu set for his school pageant, the movie works well. Pulling a
miniature grass hut onto a stage, he tells of a ritual where the young virgin
is blessed with pig urine during the time of her first menses. As the parents
storm the stage, his classmate screams that she's not leaving the hut until
she is purified.
There are other scenes that are just as funny. During a lecture, Krippendorf
describes the early morning rituals of the teenage Shelmikedmu girl. As he
talks about how she goes to a small room near the sleeping area to an altar
and douses herself with potions and tonics, the film shows Shelly standing
before the bathroom mirror putting on her make-up.
Where the movie runs into problems is its inability to focus on a target
audience. It shuffles back and forth from being a smart comedy to bland
Disneyesque pap. We get scenes with decidedly adult situations. He is asked by
a woman if he only finds her attractive because she is holding his penis. He
and Veronica get drunk, dress in Shelmikedmu garb and jump into bed while he
secretly films the "mating ritual". Then there are scenes where the kids come
to the rescue as Shelly drives a car for the first time narrowly avoiding
slapstick accidents.
Richard Dreyfuss is always entertaining in his roles. Whether he's the fixated
alien-searcher from "Close Encounters Of The Third Kind" or the inventive
Krippendorf, there's something about him that makes you want to invite him
over for dinner. His friendliness and ability to think on his feet are refreshing.
Elfman is an odd one. Sometimes she is so goofy that you want to cringe. At
other times she has a lanky somewhat gawky energetic appeal. Whatever it is,
it's difficult to take your eyes off her. She holds her own on the screen and
just needs to figure out exactly what her own actually is.
Lily Tomlin is one of the most gifted comedians around, but here she is mostly
wasted. Not given much to do, she only shines in a few scenes.
The kids are...well, they're kids. Cute and occasionally engaging, the actors
do a credible job in their parts, but could have been replaced by any number
of other child actors and the film would have been unchanged.
Director Todd Holland ("The Larry Sanders Show") would have done better to
have jettisoned the child audience and gone for a comedy more on the edge. The
Shelmikedmu with their invented culture pulled together from authentic New
Guinea artifacts and rituals and stapled onto items from Pier One held more
promise than we got.
(Michael Redman has written this column for more years than he can remember
and is currently attempting to recuperate from the Wild Raccoons Party Mardi.
If you email him at Redman@bvoice.com, please do so quietly.)
[This appeared in the 2/26/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Cradle Will Rock (1999)
Whose whore are you? How far are you willing to prostitute yourself in
exchange for comfort?
In one way or another, we all pay for it. "It" in this case being social and
economic security. We work boring dead-end jobs so we can pay the rent. We
attend meaningless vacuous classes so we can get our degrees. Worst of all,
sometimes we compromise our values for financial gain.
In the desperate times of depression-era America, many people were forced
into prostitution of one type or another. With starvation just around the
next corner, we'd be surprised just what we'd be willing to do for a meal.
Out of work actors were standing in long lines to sign up for the federal
WPA theater projects. Most of the WPA workers were out building dams, ponds
and sidewalks, but thousands were putting on plays to entertain the masses.
"Cradle Will Rock" follows several plot lines that intersect at various
points. Orson Welles (Angus MacFadyen) and John Houseman (Cary Elwes) are
producing a pro-union musical by Marc Blitzstein (Hank Azaria). Nelson
Rockefeller (John Cusack) hires radical artist Diego Rivera (Ruben Blades)
to paint a mural at the Rockefeller Center. Congress is investigating
Communists within the theater project. Industrialists are throwing parties
and being wooed by the fascists. People are falling in love and babies,
being born.
Amazingly the numerous tales flow seamlessly into one another. As the camera
zooms in on a piece of background and then pulls back out, you are in a
different place with different characters, but there's never a moment of
confusion about what is going on.
When the opening credits roll with name after name of renowned actors, you
will wonder how they can all fit into one film. Vanessa Redgrave, Joan
Cusack, Bill Murray, Susan Sarandon, John Turturro, Emily Watson: the list
goes on and on. And they're all great -- not a weak link in the bunch.
The underlying question of the film is the wisdom of public and corporate
funding of the arts. It's one big party at the beginning as everyone focuses
on their work. Then the modern Golden Rule ("He who has the gold makes the
rules") raises its ugly head. Rockefeller wants Rivera to eliminate Lenin
from his painting. Congress cuts financing to the pinko plays. Mussolini's
beautiful mistress trades old master paintings to the Philistines for
contributions to the war effort. Even the actors union, formed to protect
its members, gets in the way.
Yet it's all a joy to watch. There are heroes and villains, lovers and
enemies, disasters and triumphs. All against the frantic backdrop of prima
donas vying for position. It's like a Robert Altman film done by the Coen brothers.
Director and writer Tim Robbins is rapidly becoming a major force in
Hollywood. With this, "Bob Roberts" and "Dead Man Walking" to his directoral
credit, and a number of wonderful acting roles, he's one to watch.
His brushstrokes are brilliant but a little broad here. The sets are
magnificent, the costumes authentic and the color schemes, inviting. But
some of the characters are charactures. Perhaps that's inevitable. With so
many things going on, the audience needs some shortcuts.
Some of the scenes are grand. The long single-shot opener follows doe-eyed
street singer Olive Stanton (Watson) from sleeping behind a movie screen,
down an alley out to the street where she washes up from a dripping hydrant
oblivious to pedestrians. Like a deer in the urban forest, she's poor but
free. The camera then moves up to Blitzstein's apartment. Over five minutes
of unedited uncut luxurious filming, it's a pleasure.
The questions the film asks don't belong only in the past. Federal arts
funding are currently under attack. Maplethorpe may not have been a Commie
but he sure was pink. Workers are being thrown out of jobs, sweatshop
conditions abound in other countries, unions are loosing power.
Welcome to the brave new world, same as the old one.
(Michael Redman has been writing this column for a long time, but his
memories of the thirties are a little foggy. He's considering taking up
selling apples on the street corner as a new career. Email your tales of
prostitution to redman@bluemarble.net.)
[This appeared in the 1/27/2000 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bluemarble.net.]

Title
Review for 6th Day, The (2000)
Human cloning appears inevitable. We've cloned sheep. We're mapping the
human genome. Can a clone of a former President who, himself, runs for that
office be far away?
"The Sixth Day" examines the moral implications of copying people. Sorta. It
also tosses in an Arnold Schwarzenegger action film and does neither with
much thought...or action.
Adam Gibson (Schwarzenegger) returns home one day to discover that he's
already there. His duplicate is enjoying his birthday party. Even worse,
he's enjoying his wife in the back seat of their suburban assault vehicle.
In the not-too distant future, cloning is commonplace. "Repet" is a
commercial success assuring your family they never have to suffer the death
of a beloved pet. Rover is back with you, just a clone away. Human copying
has been outlawed but a rogue company is secretly Xeroxing away.
The bad guys have to kill Gibson before they are discovered. Arnold has to
survive, destroy their operation and make everything safe for law-abiding
folk. It's a typical Schwarzenegger movie, but not quite as exciting.
The action scenes lack the punch of earlier Schwarzenegger pictures.
Accustomed to the more highly stylized "Matrix", the audience for
old-fashioned shoot-em-up science fiction films might be disappearing. This
one isn't exactly a box office sensation.
The story feels reminiscent of "Bladerunner" but without the soul. The minor
plot element of which Gibson is "real" (which could be interesting had it
been explored for more than 30 seconds) is handled clumsily compared to the
underlying question of whether Deckard is a replicant. Gibson's mission is
to destroy clones which happen to have a built-in limited life span. Sound
familiar? Compare the final scene with one of the Bladerunner endings.
In this season of Christmas releases, Santa won't be laughing "Ho! Ho! Ho!"
at this film. It'll be more like "Ho! Hum!"
(Michael Redman has written this column for long enough that he can remember
both versions of "Bladerunner". Email redman@bluemarble.net with your
cinematic memories.)
[This appeared in the 12/7/2000 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bluemarble.net.]

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
        There are times in most people's lives for which they are completely
unprepared: nothing they have ever done seems relevant to the experience.
Extraordinary situations sometimes force ordinary people into a mental state
on automatic with no time to think. The most extreme of these circumstances is
probably war.
        Near the beginning of the film is 25 minutes of pure hell. As troop-carrying
ships land on Omaha Beach in Normandy on June 6, 1944, the boys in uniform are
vomiting and shaking. When the doors open, they don't even get the chance to
leave the boats before they are cut to pieces by Nazi machine guns. The air
support that was supposed to have taken out the German weapons missed their
targets and the shore becomes a slaughterhouse.
        Captain John Miller (Tom Hanks) is one of the few that survive the carnage.
The next day he's given an odd mission. Three out of four Ryan brothers were
killed in the war and their mother in Iowa got all three telegrams on the same
day. General George Marshall is determined to send the remaining brother,
James Ryan (Matt Damon), back home and assigns Miller to the rescue operation.
        The Captain assembles a small unit of men and sets off through occupied
France to find the boy. The problem is that Ryan parachuted into the area. The
paratroopers were scattered all over the countryside and no one knows where
anyone is.
        The beach battle and a later one defending a bridge are as close as I want to
come to actual combat. The horror is indescribable and the filmmaking
exceptional. The camera follows one soldier, moves across the scene to another
while obscenities form the background. One man reaches down to pick up his arm
that was shot off and stumbles away. Others writhe in pain with gaping holes
in their bodies. 
        These are probably the most realistic WWII battle scenes ever filmed. As in
the Vietnam films "Platoon" and "Apocalypse Now", we get a glimpse of what war
is actually like. There are no John Waynes here, only civilians forced into a
situation where no one knows what is going on and they are trying to make it
through alive. During the landing, there are no viable options. There is no
place to retreat to. To stay where they are is certain death. To advance into
the machine gun fire is lunacy. The men are so shell-shocked that when Germans
surrender, they are shot down.
        The scenes between the two major battles are not as captivating. With a
couple of exceptions, Miller's men are cliches: a New York Irish smart-aleck,
a southern Bible-quoting sharpshooter, a Jew, a tough Sergeant and so on.
While they are fleshed-out somewhat and become real people as the film
progresses, they begin as the same guys you see in every war film.
        One of the exceptions is Upham (Jeremy Davies), a translator who has never
seen combat and is picked for the squad because he speaks German and French.
The most human of the group, he is scared to death. In a particularly
terrifying scene, he is carrying ammunition and cowers behind a wall as
several enemy soldiers are on the other side. Later he freezes in fear on a
stairway as a German walks by, ignoring him because he is inconsequential.
Although he is everyman, he is also the most easily despised.
        There are apalling scenes that will stay with the audience for a long time.
One especially excruciating one is a close-up of a German slowly sliding a
knife into the chest of one of the soldiers.
        The cinematography is phenomenal. Janusz Kaminski, who also shot "Shindler's
List" uses a personal point of view with muted colors, hand-held cameras and
various film stocks to give us the feel of battle.
        The sound is also spectacular. During the fighting, there is no music.
Especially effective are the times where the sound turns into a roar or
becomes complete silence.
        There are a few things that don't work or don't make sense. Marshall's reason
for risking eight men to save one is unclear. Is it a whim based on his
obsession with Lincoln's letter to a soldier's mother or is it true
compassion? The question of the worth eight men versus that of one is the
primary focus of the film, but is never answered.
        Towards the end of the film, Miller whispers something to Ryan. What he says
is a key point in the movie, but it is barely intelligible. After the
utterance, I saw half the audience turn to the other with "What did he say?"
        The framing episodes in modern France are needless and add nothing to the
movie other than emotional manipulation.
        Even with these problems, the incredible scenes make this a must-see.
        Also troubling is the consequences of mercy. One soldier attempts to rescue a
French child. The squad lets a German captive go that they can't take with
them rather than kill him in cold blood. Both of these acts have disastrous
results ending with deaths. The message seems to be that kindness during times
of war is fatal.
        Director Steven Spielberg seems determined to write history. As our society
knows less and less about the past, he is apparently aware of the power of
cinema. With this, "Shindler's List", "Empire Of The Sun", "The Color Purple"
and "Amistad" our view of history is being formed by one man. The Normandy
invasion will forever be defined by "Saving Private Ryan" in the minds of the
movie-going public.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and still hasn't had
the space to tell of the fire scare during an IMax showing of "Titanic". Maybe
next week...)
[This appeared in the 7/30/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Cruel Intentions (1999)
"Intentions" cruel and unusual punishment
At times, especially the eerily quiet early morning hours, when
working on a project at home, I'll have the television on next to my
computer. Usually I'll slip in a "Northern Exposure" or "Seinfeld"
tape that I've seen a dozen times before. Since I know the shows by
heart, they provide audio companions that don't require much
consideration. It's like having friends over that I don't have to pay
any attention to.
Occasionally I'll channel-surf searching for an innocuous nature
documentary or old sit-com for background chatter. Sometimes around
4:00 am, I'll run into horrendous soap operas that are, for some odd
reason, broadcast while most people sleep. I assume these exist
because the network hopes insomniacs will watch anything in the
wee hours, even faux drama with little plot and less acting talent.
"Cruel Intentions", despite its thematic similarity to these, could
never aspire to be even that good.
Sebastian Valmont (Ryan Phillippe) and his step-sister Kathryn (Sarah
Michelle Gellar) are spoiled rich kids who get their kicks by
manipulating other spoiled rich kids. Sebastian's hobby is bedding
down his female classmates by any means available. Kathryn is out for
revenge on innocent Cecile (Selma Blair) who inadvertently stole her
boyfriend.
Somewhere in the middle of this, the siblings bet on Sebastian's
ability to successfully deflower Annette (Reese Witherspoon), a sweet
young thing who has written a pro-virginity manifesto for a national
teen magazine. If Kathryn wins, she gets his vintage Jaguar. If he
wins, she'll give him the ride he really wants.
Kathryn begins her Machiavellian scheme by pretending to be childlike
Cecile's best friend and turning her into a "bad girl." Advising
Cecile to "sleep with as many people as possible," she sets her up for
Sebastian's alcohol-assisted seduction. Meanwhile he is beginning to
have real feelings for Annette. At least he's supposed to be having
those feelings. You'd never know it from watching the actor.
The plot has some solid ground, based, as it is, on the eighteenth
century "Les Liaisons Dangereuses". The loose re-make of "Dangerous
Liaisons" with younger actors quickly turns that ground into quicksand
as it gets mired down in its own inanity.
There's not an actor in the batch that creates a believable
character. Both Witherspoon and Blair come across as Rebecca of
Sunnybrook Farm but without the depth. Gellar desperately wants to
play a vamp but doesn't have the acting chops to pull it
off. Phillippe struts around looking like a Greek god and prettier
than any of the girls, but doesn't demonstrate any emotions beyond
boredom.
The movie is designed to draw in the young teenage market who are able
to talk their way into an R-rated film. It's filled with gratuitous
sexual supposed-taboos. There's an inter-racial romance, a gay
encounter, almost-incestuous gropings and dirty talk. When Kathryn
teaches Cecile about making out, we're treated to an extended close-up
of the girls French-kissing.
Every action is presented in the most exploitive manner possible. The
film is homophobic, sexist, racist, classist and just about every
other word that ends with "ist."
What else could we expect? Give an involved French novel to director
Roger Kumble, responsible for some of the most uninspired films in
recent history ("Dumb And Dumber", "National Lampoon's Senior Trip"),
aim it towards teens and the outcome is inevitable. If this is what
Hollywood thinks America's youth finds entertaining, the industry is
in troubleor the country is.
The movie is remarkable in its ability to grow more insipid with each
passing moment. It's one of the few that I can remember turning to the
person sitting next to me and asking, in astonishment, if the film
could possibly be as bad as it seemed.
Even the tenth viewing of the episode where George is concerned about
"shrinkage" holds more surprises. And you don't have to sit in a huge
dark room for two hours watching it.
(Michael Redman has written this column for longer than the characters in
"Cruel Intentions" have been alive and thinks that even his reviews would make
a better movie. Email your cinematic disappointments to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 3/11/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Murder at 1600 (1997)
There's a major crime at the White House and the politicians are busy at
work covering it up. This could be either one of many films from the
past couple of years ("Absolute Power", "My Fellow Americans", etc.) or
the headlines from just about any day since the late sixties.
Jumping on the blame-the-government bandwagon, "Murder" is a thriller
that doesn't make much sense...and doesn't need to. Stars Wesley Snipes
and Diane Lane keep it on target even with a plot that has so many
ill-conceived ideas that if you had a chance to stop and think, the most
intelligent comment would be "Huh?"
A young (and coincidentally, beautiful) female staffer is found murdered
in a White House bathroom just an hour after a late night tryst with
someone a few feet from the presidential seal. Virtually every one of
the 30 people in-house are suspects. Or is it 31? Or more?
DC homicide cop Harlan Regis (Snipes) is brought in to make the
investigation "look good" as the Democrats (and you know that this
president is a Democrat: he never served in the army, is dealing with a
hostage crisis and is seen as a wimp) scurry around practicing damage
control. Unfortunately for the spin doctors, Regis is bent on solving
the crime rather than accepting the spoon-fed solution.
Sharpshooter (and coincidentally beautiful) Secret Service agent Nina
Chance (Lane) is assigned to the detective as the official liaison but
it is unclear if she is helping him or hiding the facts. The interaction
between Snipes and Lane is dynamic and their chemistry is hot without
being overtly sexual.
The secondary actors hold up their end admirably. Alan Alda is the
perfect National Security Advisor who is personable and sleazy at the
same time. Ronny Cox plays the President who, although a pivotal player,
has a minor role. Daniel Benzali is the menacing head of White House
security and doesn't turn in much of an acting job, but looks great.
"Saturday Night Live" veteran Dennis Miller has great timing as Regis'
partner: on screen for just a few minutes to provide comedic relief. 
The plot holes? There are so many of them that this column would be
beyond the length limit just to list them. Most notable is the extended
gun fight while our heroes are sloshing through the water in the tunnels
under the White House. They are attempting to get a message to the
President, but there are about a zillion other and  less dangerous
(although also less cinematic) methods to accomplish their task.
Much like last year's "Independence Day", this is an entertaining fun
movie without much other redeeming value. A hunk, a babe, big guns and a
government conspiracy: the summer films are starting early.
[This appeared in the 4/24/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Up Close & Personal (1996)
Robert Redford and Michelle Pfeiffer in a romantic drama about television
news. Wow, two personal faves in a favorite genre and setting. How could it
miss? Read on and find out.
Pfeiffer is a neophyte television reporter hired by Redford, seasoned veteran
who's had his time in the sun and settled into a comfortable production
position. Their mentor/student relationship quickly develops into a romantic
one with all of the difficulties associated with ex-partners and the
instability of the profession.
On her way to the top, the beautiful reporter moves from situation to
situation with the help of her coach until she reaches a position where she
must move from Miami. Redford follows and she arranges a job for him with her
new station. This doesn't set well with his ego. Somewhat of yet another
remake of "A Star Is Born", at least the milieu is different from the previous films.
Although each star has an impressive track record and powerful screen
presence, the chemistry between them is slight. Redford plays the stable older
man but shows virtually no emotion throughout the movie. Until the second
half, Pfeiffer's emotional range runs the range of A through B.
There are two different films here. The first follows the development of
their relationship and her career and is filled with longing gazes, a
VH1-inspired beach scene and unimportant scenes. The other begins when she is
behind the scenes during a prison riot and is much more dynamic. The earlier
portion is an important set-up to the second, but could have done with severe editing.
Not a bad film, just another one where the execution doesn't live up to the promise.
[This appeared in the 3/7/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Flirting with Disaster (1996)
>From the commercials, this looks like a mild-mannered Neil Simonesque tale
with Mary Tyler Moore baring her bra touted as the highlight. Instead it turns
out to be a hilarious film running in high gear from beginning to end.
The concept is deceptively pedestrian. An adult adopted son is looking for his
biological parents and encounters eccentric characters along the way. The
movie demonstrates just how far a good script and actors can take a mundane idea.
The son and his wife take off on the search accompanied by a woman from the
agency who located his parents. Following one dead end lead after another,
each funnier than the previous, they eventually end up in New Mexico with his
real biological parents: Alan Alda and Lily Tomlin.
It's difficult to condense the mile-a-minute plot. Seemingly hundreds of
scenes jump on top of each other without giving you a chance to recover from
the last one.
Without giving too much away, one of the better episodes involves a gay
federal Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms agent attempting an arrest while
tripping on LSD as his bi-sexual partner is upstairs licking the armpit of a
woman while her husband is in the next room seducing their traveling
companion. And it's all done in a fairly clean, almost (well, maybe not
exactly) family fare manner.
A grand cast (Tomlin, Alda, Moore, Ben Stiller, Patricia Arquette, Tea Leoni,
George Segal) interacts in a seamless parade of laughs. Drawing from a more
hyper Woody Allen style, the film succeeds beyond expectations.
[This appeared in the 4/18/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Starship Troopers (1997)
Heinlein novel mutates into Intergalactic Hills 90210
Based on the previews, I walked into the theater expecting to see a mediocre
science fiction film. I was disappointed.
This movie couldn't even aspire to be mediocre.
Although I have read several Heinlein books, I have to confess that I've
skipped "Starship Troopers", but I can't imagine that the author of "Stranger
In A Strange Land" could have written anything as vapid as what show up on the
screen. What we get instead is a film as insipid as the prime time teenage soaps.
In the unspecified, but unmistakably far-flung future, everyone lives happily
under a kindly fascist government where the citizens are allowed to vote only
after two years in the military. The film plays both sides of the coin: both
glorifying the Nazi (and make no mistake, they are Nazis, even down to the SS)
military while at the same time satirizing it.
After graduating high school in Buenos Aires, Carmen Ibanez (Denise Richards)
heads to the Fleet Academy to pilot starships. As is the wont of teenage boys,
her sweetheart Johnny Rico (Casper Van Dien) joins up to impress her, but he
only makes Mobile Infantry. Dizzy Flores (Dina Meyer) who has the hots for
Johnny follows him. Another buddy, Carl Jenkins (Neil Patrick Harris from
Doogie Howser) gets placed in Military Intelligence.
Oddly enough, everyone we see from the South American city is about as WASPy
as they could be and would be more at home in the LA valley. Perhaps in the
future, the United States has taken over the entire western hemisphere. Or
just maybe it was thought that a white cast would draw more of an audience.
While the lovers are separated, Dizzy demonstrates her affection for Johnny
and Carmen sends him a "Dear John" letter after falling for his high school
rival Zander Barcalow (Patrick Muldoon). To make their personal lives even
more complicated, hideous nasty "bugs" from across the galaxy hit their home
town with an asteroid destroying the city.
Earth marshals its forces, sending them light years away to the bug home
planet of Klendathu in an all-out war to obliterate the enemy. Then comes the
scenes you've seen on the commercials. Soldiers shooting and blowing up huge
ugly insectoids while the aliens slicing and dicing the humans.
The film has only two problems: it's boring and it rarely makes sense. 
The first seven or eight hours of the movie focuses on the love quadrangle and
the personal life of the kids. Obviously what director Paul Verhoeven
("Robocop", "Total Recall", "Showgirls") had in mind was to get the audience
emotionally involved with the characters so that we would be concerned about
them when they went into battle. 
Good idea. It's too bad that the concept is so poorly executed that that when
it comes down to life or death, we don't care. The only reason that we side
with the humans is that the bugs are even more bizarre.
Since most of the budget was spent on effects, it's not necessarily a bad
notion to cast primarily unknowns. It would seem, however, that if one would
want to make sure that some of them could act. The stars all __look good__,
but they belong in underwear ads rather than in a major motion picture.
Meyer's Dizzy is the only one who shows any signs of life. Later Gary Busey's
son Jake is entertaining as a fellow soldier. The sole accomplishment of the
first half of the film is to make the audience anxious for the action to start.
When the war does begin, it also __looks good__. The computer generated aliens
are at times among the best effects ever on screen although occasionally they
look almost as fake as the terminally attractive actors.
Many of the effects are as comical as they are visually impressive. The sight
of bugs farting plasma into space destroying star cruisers can't help but
bring laughter.
Speaking of special effects and as interesting as it is, a co-ed shower scene
appears to exist only to flash dozens of breasts. The female and ethnic
characters don't fare well. One woman dies happy because she was finally able
to "have" her love interest the night before.
It's impossible to understand how the civilization advanced so far that it
could travel to distant planets yet be so stupid. The enemy is built like a
tank and as difficult to destroy. What do the military masterminds send
against it? Foot soldiers armed with guns that shoot bullets. 
Bullets? Earth has faster-than-light vehicles yet arms its military with
bullets? Wouldn't you think that weapons would have advanced a bit in the
years? Admittedly they also have hand-held nuclear weapons (which miraculously
the warriors only had to be a few feet away from to avoid damage), but there
no in-between arms. You'd think that they could at least have cans of Raid.
Admittedly I have no military experience, but even I would send in air attacks
before dispatching a few platoons to fight thousands of the monsters. I also
might not encourage a loud drunken party while camped surrounded by the enemy.
Some of the failings come from mucking around with Heinlein's book. His
characters were multi-racial (Johnny was Filipino "Juan"). Flores was changed
from male to female and Barcalow invented for the film so the more
soap-operaish aspects could be exploited. The sex and nudity was also
concocted. His infantry was armed with formidable "power suits".
To be truthful, many critics have raved about the film. Maybe I just don't get
it. The best thing I can find to say is that it is better than Verhoeven's
last offering: the atrocious "Showgirls". Not much better, but as they say:
tiny steps.
(Michael Redman, after over 22 years of writing this column, thinks he would
have learned not to expect much from an effects film but he still remains
hopeful for "Alien Resurrection". Email to the usual address would be useless
right now, so don't even try.)

Title
Review for General's Daughter, The (1999)
We all have skeletons in our closet we'd rather not broadcast to the
world. An ill-advised affair, illegal activities, sexual peccadilloes,
a secret appetite for fried baloney and Velvetta sandwiches: it's a
rare person without dirty laundry.
Most of the time, those clandestine activities are relatively
harmless, proving only embarrassing if revealed. Occasionally though,
they are devastating. Unfortunately the universe abhors secrets even
more than a vacuum and we are usually outed.
Army Captain Elisabeth Campbell (Leslie Stefanson) has mysteries she
will take to the grave. That's exactly when they are exposed.
Warrant Officer Paul Brenner (John Travolta) is finishing an
investigation into weapon sales to a civilian when he stumbles onto an
even more insidious case. Campbell is discovered dead, naked and
staked spread-eagle to tent pegs in the middle of a training area.
And she's the daughter of a three-star general.
Assigned to work with Sarah Sunhill (Madeleine Stowe), rape counselor
and investigator and - not so coincidentally since this is a movie
-- a former lover, Brenner attempts to track down the murderer.
The investigation isn't as straight-forward as it appears it
first. Campbell may have seemed the bright and shiny perfect military
officer, but she had a dark hidden side that complicates matters and
threatens to bring down the entire base.
The film is very nearly a victory of style over substance, but falters
along the way. The story doesn't quite work.
Unless there's an exceptional reason, one of the absolute "musts" of
an involving mystery film is the audience has to have enough clues, if
they are perceptive enough, to solve the crime. It doesn't happen
here.
There is no way anyone can deduce who the murderer is before he is
exposed. On the other hand, some of the participants in Campbell's
secretive past are all too apparent.
Travolta is fun to watch as he struts around in his cock-of-the-walk
role, however his character remains an enigma. We have barely a clue
as to who he is. James Woods has an interesting part as Campbell's
mentor who delights in mind games with Brenner, but drifts into
caricature too often.
Director Simon West has a film that could have been as good as it
looks if only he'd paid a little more attention to what was going on.
(Michael Redman has written this column for so many years, he's run
out of fingers and toes to keep track on. Email your closet skeletons
to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 6/24/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Twister (1996)
As in so many other films, dynamic special effects combine with cardboard
people to create a movie that is as much fun to watch as a Twinkie is to eat
and just as fulfilling.
The all-winners squad of writer Michael Crichton ("Jurassic Park"), director
Jan De Bont ("Speed") and godfather Steven Spielberg (most of the big buck
films from the past two decades) have come up with a force of nature that is
destined to suck money from the pockets of effects addicts. Count me on board.
Bill Paxton and soon-to-be new wife Jami Gertz drop by the tornado chasers to
get Helen Hunt, soon-to-be ex-wife and former partner, to sign final divorce
papers. In what would be an amazing coincidence if this were not a movie, the
mother of all tornadoes is brewing on the horizon. Paxton can't resist one
last hunt.
The bad guys here (besides that evil Mother Nature of course) are a team of
corporate tornado researchers out to steal Paxton's thunder while traveling
around in brand spankin' new black vans. Guess those black helicopters were
all being used by the UN. You don't need to pay much attention to these men.
They don't exist for any reason in the film.
The supposed human drama is supplied by the triangle between man, wife and girlfriend.
The tornadoes from Industrial Light and Magic are overwhelming. Most of the
storms and debris look real, with the exception of a goofy cow that goes
flying by one of the trucks a couple of times. Scary and remarkably forceful
stuff. That yellow and green sky that we've all seen around here will never
look the same to you.
As with "Jurassic Park", the last blockbuster from Spielberg and Crichton, the
monsters are amazing, but the people barely exist. The redeeming factor is
that the action scenes are grand and the talking scenes mercifully short.
Hunt does have some type of odd screen appeal, but appears to have been chosen
for the part because she wears white t-shirts well. Paxton is well-casted as
the obsessive everyman. There is a bit of chemistry between them, but the
script doesn't take it anywhere. Gertz disappears into the background.
The only acting stand-outs are Lois Smith as eccentric Aunt Meg and Philip
Hoffman as one of the wacky storm-chasing team. There are a couple of good
moments with each of them, but only a couple and only moments.
If you're going to see this, make sure you _don't_ wait for the video. On a
small screen there will be nothing there.
[This appeared in the 5/16/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Rock, The (1996)
Summer action films are an odd thing to review. The genre is so narrowly
focused (low on characterization, plot and just about everything else, big
only on the keeping-you-on-the-edge-of-your-seatness), that it's remarkably
rare for it to produce a truly great movie.
The season is usually filled with mediocre -- occasionally downright
horrendous -- offerings and the tendency is to compare: `At least this one
isn't as bad as that one.' 
"The Rock" is definitely different. Starting with wonderful casting and
featuring a mastery of the genre, the film strikes at the heart of summer
excitement with surgical precision. It is so well crafted that you'll be
holding your breath for over two hours and not notice its defects until after
the credits roll. Exactly as it should be.
Ed Harris is a renegade Brigadier General who leads a group of Marines first
in stealing enough deadly gas and rockets to destroy a major city, and then in
taking over Alcatraz along with 81 hostages so they can be in position to take
out the city by the bay. Their demands are on the noble side: money and
recognition for US servicemen killed during illegal military actions.
His very reluctant opponents are the makings of the best odd couple in years.
Stanley Goodspeed (Nicolas Cage) is a  bookish FBI bomb defuser and
self-described chemical `superfreak' drafted into the action hero role. Sean
Connery plays John Mason, a street-wise highly trained British ultra spy who
was in his heyday during the early sixties. (Wait a minute, you don't think he's...?)
Mason was arrested and jailed for 30 years without a trial for stealing
microfilm from J. Edgar Hoover revealing such major US secrets as who really
killed JFK and other nefarious truths. He comes into play here because he is
the only person ever to have escaped Alcatraz. Now he's going to lead the
anti-terrorist squad in.
Mason is exactly the role that Connery is best at: the grand old man still
capable of kicking butt with the best of them. Cage is his perfect foil who
goes by the rules but then loosens up with begrudging admiration for the convict.
Everything starts of with slam-bang action, then goes to big guns, then deadly
gas, then missiles, then more slam-bang, and more big guns and -- you get the
idea. There's not a moment to stop and smell the roses before they get blasted away.
And it's a good thing that you don't have that moment or else you would
realize that the plot is almost exactly the same as "Executive Action", that
some of the filmmaking is sloppy (exactly how many missiles did Cage disarm in
the morgue?) or that "Bad Boys" Michael Bay films the thing like a damned
music video.
But as I said, you never get the time to realize that and Harris, Connery and
Cage are so good that you don't want to and besides it's summer.
[This appeared in the 6/13/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for What Dreams May Come (1998)
Philosopher physician Deepak Chopra has a story about two people who ride a
roller coaster. For the first, this is a frightening experience and it fills
his body with unhealthy adrenaline. The second loves the thrills and his body
creates healthy endorphins. "It's not the ride," he says, "it's the rider."
That we create our own realities is a concept the "New Age" -- whatever that
means -- borrowed from eastern religions and has become accepted as truth even
among the western medical community. Stress and attitude are thought to be the
leading cause of illness. How we see the world is how the world is. We control
the ride, not the other way around.
Chris Nielsen (Robin Williams) can create his own realm. Literally. The only
problem is that he had to die first.
Chris and Annie (Annabella Sciorra) have the perfect marriage. Soulmates, he
is a pediatrician; she, a painter. They have two wonderful children. Then
things fall apart. The kids are killed in a tragic car wreck and full-of-life
Annie is devastated with all of her joy wrenched away. After an attempted
suicide, she is institutionalized.
Four years later Annie has recovered and is back at work. Chris stops to help
an accident victim and is killed when a car flips over onto him. When he comes
to, he is in a wondrous afterlife where anything he imagines comes true. He
can have anything he wants. Except Annie.
The death of her life partner sends Annie into a depression spiral and she
succeeds in her second suicide attempt. People who kill themselves don't go to
the same place that Chris did. He's informed that he can never see her again.
Chris refuses to accept this and begins his Orpheus-like journey into the
underworld to rescue his lover.
Before I go on, I have to tell you that this is the most visually stunning
film in recent memory. The movie is extraordinary. Far too often, special
effects cause the audience to think "That's cool. I wonder how they did it."
More successful movies evoke "That's cool" without pulling you out of the
film. "Dreams" only allows "That's" as you sit, mouth agape, in astonishment.
You are not watching the film, you _are_ the film.
Chris' heaven is based on paintings. Before he understands how it works, his
Monet surroundings not only look like paint, they _are_ paint and not quite
dry. When he picks and squeezes a brilliant blue flower, it liquefies into
pigment. As he runs down a hill stepping on bright reds and yellows, the
ground squishes beneath his feet flowing into streams of combined colors. At
first his world looks like someone went overboard with Photoshop on a Macintosh.
The heavenly city is a wonderful living Maxfield Parrish poster. Hell is a
frightening combination of H. R. Giger and German Expressionism. The hundreds
of condemned souls surrounding Chris' boat is more chilling than even the
similar scene in "Titanic". When he reaches Annie, the color palate becomes
monochromatic reflecting her state of mind. 
The team of director Vincent Ward ("The Navigator"), effects supervisors Ellen
Ward, production designer Eugenio Zanetti and cinematographer Eduardo Serra
have given us a film that visually is beyond words. I'm wearing out my
thesaurus looking up synonyms for "awesome."
Like myths of old, the story is a metaphor for life. Chris' afterlife is
brilliant and full of wonders because that is how he sees the world. Annie's
is gloomy and without hope because that's her view. The one message that I
have doubts is that it is possible to save the damned by joining them in hell.
That path leads not to salvation, but madness. 
Annie's willingness to accept responsibility for the deaths (her housekeeper
drove the children on their fatal trip because Annie was too busy, Chris was
running an errand for her) is symptomatic of the depressed. She believes that
she is so powerful that everything is her fault.
Every actor in the film is excellent. Williams exhibits none of his manic
over-the-top personality yet is intense, determined and at the same time
filled with joy. Sciorra is remarkable as Annie sinks further and further into
the depths. Before her melancholy, there is a scene on a hill near Switzerland
where, dressed in gauze, she is one of the most alluring women in cinematic history.
Chris' first heavenly guide is Albert, played likably by Cuba Gooding, Jr. In
another excellent effect, when he first appears, he is blurry, out of synch
with Chris. As he comes more into focus, he explains to Chris that "Thought is
real. Physical is the illusion. Ironic, isn't it?"
Max von Sydow is the "Tracker," Chris' guide through hell. His extreme screen
presence prepares us for the trip into the abyss. In another film he would
stand out but here there is no character that it is possible to take your eyes
off of.
Like the movie itself, the reviews for this are all over the spectrum from
people who hated it to those who were amazed. Aside from obvious technical
aspects, movie-going is often a subjective experience. What one person finds
trite, another may experience as profound. What you bring into the theater is
an important part of what you take out.
I suppose that I was ready for this film. There are problems: the final scene
is a bit corny, some of the truisms are simplistic. But I didn't care. It blew
me away.
After leaving the movie, I was in no shape to drive home. Walking over to the
edge of the parking lot and gazing into the moonlit forest across the street,
I lighted a cigarette and wondered why so often we chose to live in the gray
world of hell when there is so much Maxfield Parrish out there.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and has never seen
anything like this on the screen before. You are free to disagree if you like,
but you'd be wrong. Send spectacular visions to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 10/8/98 "Bloomington Indpependent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Fathers' Day (1997)
This film has just about everything going for it. Writers Lowell Ganz
and Babaloo Mandel are responsible for two of the wittiest comedies of
recent years:  "City Slickers" and "Parenthood". Producer/director Ivan
Reitman has "Ghostbusters" to his credit. Some of the supporting cast
are well respected (Nastassja Kinski, Julia Louis-Dreyfus of "Seinfeld"
fame). It's a nice touch that a film entitled "Father's Day" is released
on Mother's Day weekend.
But the real reason that it looks great is the inspired teaming of Robin
Williams and Billy Crystal, two of the top comedic actors working today.
You can easily imagine them bouncing off of each other with quips and ad
libs and movie-goers want to get in on some of the fun. The scene in the
previews where Crystal is trying to explain who Lou Gehrig is ("The guy
who died of Lou Gehrig's Disease." "Wow! What are the odds of that?") is
inspired.
Based on the 1984 French "Les Comperes", the movie is an odd couple
buddy road trip film. Happily married Collette (Kinski) is disparate to
find her runaway 16 year old son. Being a friendly sort 17 years ago,
she knew both Jack (Crystal) and Dale (Williams) in the Biblical sense.
Calling and telling each of them that they are the father of her son,
she begs them to find him.
Of course both of the fathers accidentally discover the other and pair
up to find missing Scott (Charlie Hofheimer). Their journey takes them
from a tough auto repair shop to a tough rock tour via encounters with
tough drug dealers.
Jack is a sophisticated LA lawyer with a talent for head-butting. Dale,
a San Francisco poet with a history of suicide attempts, bursts into
tears at the slightest provocation. Both actors are perfectly suited to
their roles and pull them off with style.
It just doesn't work. The story is old hat. Most of the shticks have
been done before and often. The middle-aged man at a rock concert was
funnier on the "Simpsons". With a few exceptions, the jokes fall flat on
their faces even though Crystal and Williams do their best to grab them
out of the muck.
Part of the problem is that Hofheimer is remarkably uninspiring as the
16-year-old with too many hormones and too little money. Kinski is
adequate but nothing special as she exhibits none of the steaming
sexuality that has always been her forte and could have been used in a
role that is defined by her irresistibility. Louis-Dreyfus does better
with Jerry, George and Kramer or perhaps she needs a project with
genuinely humorous moments.
Crystal and Williams __must__ have been a hoot on the set, but
unfortunately there's not much evidence of that on the screen. There are
a few times where their chemistry shows through the mess and those
meager minutes are what saves the film from being a total waste of time.
The hotel shower scene is occasionally hilarious, but you've seen it
before. I get the feeling that the better movie was left on the cutting
room floor as outtakes.
If this were ranked on a "Living Up To Potential" scale, it would rate a
Zero. 
[This appeared in the 5/19/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Smilla's Sense of Snow (1997)
Julia Ormond (Smilla) is in her chilly element as a Greenland Inuit
loner now residing unhappily in Copenhagen. Her only friend is a young
boy who lives in her apartment building. When she finds him dead from a
fall from the roof, it is the beginning of a mystery.
The film is heavy in atmospheric mood and engrossing. For the first
two-thirds that is. Then things get weird and the movie jumps sideways
into an "X-Files" story.  The switch from a riddle involving corporate
cover-ups (seems to be all the rage) to a science fiction plot is a bit
too much to take and the film falls apart at the end.
Wonderful cinematography and settings do their best to keep interest
alive and succeed although it would have been nice to have watched the
ending to the film that I saw the beginning of.
[This appeared in the 4/24/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Civil Action, A (1998)
A very rare number of people, at very rare times, are living their everyday
lives when they meet God on the road to Damascus. They're going to work.
They're shopping for groceries. They're paying bills. Suddenly there's a
blinding light and their reality changes completely.
They experience something that triggers a transformation in the way they view
the world. Old perceptions are out the window and a new way of being takes
over. Their previous life vanishes as a new passion overwhelms all.
Boston ambulance chaser Jan Schlichtmann (John Travolta) has his revelation on
the road to Woburn. Stopped for his second speeding ticket on the same bridge
on the same day, Jan glances out on the Aberjona River and soon everything is different.
The attorney is a high profile personal injury lawyer. Named one of the ten
most eligible bachelors in the city, he dresses sharp and aims for the
jugular. With his eye on the financial prize, he has reduced his clients to
dollar signs.
He wheels a crippled man down the courtroom hall and his voice-over explains
the worth of a human being in the civil legal system. A living man is worth
more than a dead one. A man, more than a woman. White, more than black. A dead
child is worth the least of all.
A partner presents the firm with a possible case. Eight children have died of
leukemia in the small industrial town of Woburn. The families suspect the
water is contaminated and they want someone to apologize.
Jan meets with the parents and explains legal reality to them. For him to take
the case, there must be someone to sue...someone with a hefty bank account.
With no big bucks in sight, he's not going to do anything about it.
Looking down the river on the way back, Jan decides to take a walk. He finds
two factories on the shore that may be responsible for polluting the water
supply. Then he notices something on the side of a truck that changes his mind
about the case. A sign says that one of the businesses is "a division of
Beatrice." He's found his deep pockets.
The tiny firm takes on Beatrice Foods and W.R. Grace & Co., two of the
country's largest corporations, in a classic David versus Goliath battle. In
this war, the weapons aren't stones but dollars. As Jan explains, in a big
civil case the plan is to spend more than you need in order to make it bigger,
"The first side that comes to their senses loses."
As the case wears on, the lawyers for the families are running out of
ammunition. They borrow money, mortgage their houses, buy lottery tickets and
finally sell the furniture. In one scene, they're sitting on the floor in
empty offices with no desks trying to figure out how they can dig themselves
out of their financial hole.
They are in it for the pot of gold at the end of the rainbow. If they win this
one, they win big. Jan, however, has a different obsession. He's lost sight of
the money and wants the companies brought to justice. Even after the trial
becomes a black hole for his legal firm, dragging down everyone, he refuses a
$25 million settlement offer because he wants the companies to admit responsibility.
Based on a true story that took place in the eighties, the film is an
indictment of the civil legal system. The account makes it clear that cases
aren't about truth, but rather theatrics, manipulations of the court and
negotiations between the sides. Although indeed they may have been, it's never
shown that Beatrice and W.R. Grace were responsible for the deaths. Despite
that, they were willing to lie in court, falsify evidence and spend huge
amounts of money for damage control. As Joni Mitchell sings, justice is often
"just ice."
Director and screenwriter Steven Zaillian ("Searching For Bobby Fischer" and
screenwriter of "Schindler's List") has done an admirable job assembling a
first-rate cast. There's not a weak link among the actors.
John Lithgow is Judge Walter Skinner, the somewhat self-righteous magistrate
who seems to be part of a good ole boys network with the opposing attorneys.
Dan Hedaya plays a smarmy owner of a tannery that has spilled toxic waste.
Kathleen Quinlan and David Thornton are touching as parents of children who
have died. William H. Macy's accountant James Gordon is a man under siege as
he tries to salvage the firm.
Robert Duvall, as Jerome Fancher, lawyer for Beatrice, is the standout of the
movie. Fancher is an eccentric who listens to baseball games on a cheap
transistor radio and carries a beat-up briefcase adorned with cartoon
stick-ons. His disarming bumpkin charm hides a shrewd legal mind. He is easy
to like although he works for the wrong side. Duvall nails the role and steals
the film.
Travolta is appropriately larger than life playing the flamboyant attorney,
but his character has a problem. Although we are supposed to believe that he
has abandoned his greed for a search for justice, we never see the change
happen. His actions are different, but he never warms up.
The cinematography and lighting create a moody feel in even the most mundane
scenes. Interviews with the parents are mostly talking heads, but are
riveting. During the explanation of a boy's death on the way to the hospital,
a shot of blinking taillights on a car stopped by the side of the road in the
rain is positively chilling.
The theme of water as a dangerous product works well. Water glasses take on
the same sinister image as our feathered friends did in "Birds". Especially in
this town where toxic waste threatening the water supply has been a concern
for decades, you won't be able to fill a glass from the faucet without having
second thoughts.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and is going out now
to buy some bottled water. Email your liquid thoughts to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 1/14/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Siege, The (1998)
There's a siege mentality in the United States today. The federal government
believes that militia groups are dedicated to bringing it down. The militia is
convinced that Washington is a threat to their lives and freedom. Liberals see
a rapid erosion of the Bill Of Rights under the guise of law and order.
FBI agent Anthony Hubbard (Denzel Washington) is under attack from all sides.
Terrorists are blowing up New York. Hardened CIA operative Elise Kraft
(Annette Bening) is attempting to take away his case. The US Army is invading
the city. It's not a good day for our hero.
As the film opens, an unidentified US agency abducts Sheik Ahmed Bin Talal,
the suspected head of a Palestinian terrorist organization. Soon bombs start
going off in New York. Hubbard is called in to deal with the situation but
butts heads with Kraft who has a hidden private agenda.
When the situation worsens, the President invokes the War Powers Act, declares
martial law and sends in the Army to occupy Brooklyn. Although General William
Devereaux (Bruce Willis) argues against the decision ("The Army is a
broadsword, not a scalpel. You don't want us in an American city."), when the
tanks roll across the Brooklyn Bridge, he's gung-ho.
All Arab men are rounded up and imprisoned in internment camps much like
Japanese-Americans were during World War II. Military vehicles patrol the city
streets. In order to prevent the terrorists from killing innocent people, the
Army moves in and kills innocent people.
Washington turns in his usual excellent job as the admirable yet all-business
G-Man. Bening's character is enticing but remains something of a mystery
throughout the film. Willis is adequate although his role is a minor one. Tony
Shalhoub as Hubbard's Arab-American partner is a stand-out and provides the
brief touches of humanity and humor in the story.
Based on the previews, you might expect the movie to be either an intelligent
examination of the dangers of military involvement in internal matters or a
Bruce Willis action film. It is neither.
What could be an opportunity to examine the tricky issues of individual
freedoms versus law enforcement is missed when director Edward Zwick ("Glory",
"Courage Under Fire") plays it safe.
Which liberties are worth giving up in order to feel safe? In the real world,
is the Department Of Justice's wish list for new powers as dangerous as it
sounds? (They succeeded in allowing "roving" wiretaps.) Hubbard's assertion
that the terrorists have won if "we throw out the Constitution" is a powerful
statement but the film only gives us easy answers.
There are a few impressive dramatic scenes, but they don't hold the film
together as either a shoot-em-up or a thoughtful suspense tale. The fight
between the CIA, FBI and Army for control shows some promise but doesn't go
much further than the simplistic. The story seems incomplete: there are too
many loose ends unresolved. You'll leave wanting the rest of the story.
(Michael Redman has written this column for well over 23 years and sometimes
believes that he is under siege by just about everyone. Email your paranoias
to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 11/12/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Private Parts (1997)
First off I should confess that I am not a Howard Stern fan. I primarily
attribute this to the fact that I have not lived in a market where I
could hear him on the radio. I'll also have to admit that I never
thought that my life was incomplete due to this lack of experience.
Until this film, "Howard Stern" was more of a concept than a person. Now
we see the man behind the shock jock  =97 at least we see the image  that=
the man behind the shock jock wants us to see. Although it's impossible
to determine the truth of the person, there is one fact that is
indisputable: Stern is certainly the virtuoso of self-promotion.
>From a very early age, the outrageous radio personality wanted to be
famous and discovered that scandal was a sure way to achieve that goal.
After overcoming his initial on-air shyness, "Howierd" hit the country
by storm although like most overnight sensations, it took him years to
get there.
The rally where he accepts the honor of being New York's most popular DJ
in front of thousands of screaming (and semi-nude) fans occupies a major
point in the film and was obviously a major highlight in his life.
Stern's public persona is the man who pushes the envelope of decency as
far as, if not further than, it can go. He sneaks the words you can't
say on radio into a quiz show skit ("Complete the phrase: 'Blank
Willow'."). He has radio sex with one of his listeners on air by having
her sit on her speaker with the bass turned up as he hums into the
microphone. He conducts the world's first radio interview with a naked
woman while she massages him on the studio floor.
His epic battles with the powers that be at NBC, especially his nemesis
"Pig Vomit", are at the heart of the Howard Stern The Hero portion of
the film. You can't help but root for the everyman jerk as he takes on
the corporate jerks.
Now we have his new public image. He's also the man who fell in love and
has stayed faithful to the same woman for over 20 years. He's the
devoted father of a brood of lovely children. He's probably even kind to
dogs. Methinks reality lies somewhere inbetween.
Stern plays himself as does his on-air team. They are all naturals at
being themselves: a task undoubtedly more difficult than it seems. He
and his partners-in-crime Robin Quivers and Fred Norris are often
hilarious even as they go for the lowest level of humor possible.
With this film, Stern has made his splash in yet another medium. It
remains to be seen if he can portray anyone other than himself, but he
is magnificent in this role. Its the one he was born to play.
There are many similarities between "Private Parts" and "The People
Versus Larry Flynt". Both feature men who are public sleazeballs shoving
the limits of free speech, but privately have a heart of gold. Both are
about figures that publicly treat women in a less than PC fashion, but
behind closed doors conduct long term loving relationships.
Perhaps we are seeing the beginning of a new trend in films. I can't
help but wonder if the next thing to look forward to is "Rush Limbaugh:
The Movie".
[This appeared in the 3/20/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
Maybe this mission should have been scrubbed
There's a world of difference between artists and technicians. The
artist has a vision to create something new. He may not do it well, it
might be sloppy, but it's something you've never seen before. A good
technician can make it look good, but without direction from his own
inner artist or someone else, it's going to be just a Xerox. Obviously
successful films need both skills.
Brian De Palma is a masterful technician. He's spent his career copying
others, most notably Hitchcock. He usually knows exactly what to do to
make a scene work, but only because he has learned it by rote. Aside
from rare flashes of originality, his films are often soul-dead.
In De Palma's latest, he turns his attention to Stanley Kubrick. To tell
the truth, I enjoyed portions of this movie, but I liked it a lot better
over 30 years ago when it was called "2001". I enjoyed it even more when
it was titled "Close Encounters".
NASA has set its sights for Mars. When the first crew meets with
disaster, a rescue mission is sent to the red planet. They don't do so
well either, but eventually meet up the lone surviving
astronaut-gone-Rasta and solve the mysteries of the universe. And it's
all so boring.
There are so many scenes that just don't work, it's difficult to begin.
When the first crew is a few feet away from a raging massive upside-down
Martian tornado (which looks remarkably like a sandworm from "Dune")
destroying everything in its path, they just hang out watching. Error.
The most interesting character (and that's not saying much) is killed
off. Error. The alien is laughable. Error. The rest of the characters
are the dullest people imaginable. Error.
There's some nice eyecandy. The face on Mars, which turns out to be a
giant metal Thai Buddha head, looks cool. A three-dimensional
holographic planetarium is more fun to watch than anything at Disney
World. Maneuvering in space suits outside the ship seems realistic.
But there's so much more that feels as if we've been there before. From
"2001", there's the rotating space station, the blinding white room.
>From "Close Encounters", they solve a sound puzzle and play it to the
aliens. The list goes on.
The actors are mostly mobile wooden statues. Even Gary Sinise and Tim
Robbins can't muster enough emotion to convince us they are breathing.
No one seems to care about anything that happens. You won't either.
The absolutely worst sin is the blatant product placement as Dr. Pepper,
with a 20 foot tall logo, saves the day. They should save the
commercials for those insipid bits before the film.
(Michael Redman has written this column since before Mars was discovered
and if that planet is as exciting as this film, he thinks he'll just
stay home. Email your Martian chronicles to redman@bluemarble.net.)
[This appeared in the 3/16/2000 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bluemarble.net.]
-- 
mailto:redman@bluemarble.net
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for 54 (1998)
There are some people who, no matter how good a time they're having, no matter
how great a place they're at, are convinced that somewhere, someone is having
more fun than they are. There must be a better party elsewhere and they're
going to find it. Obviously it's an endless quest.
In the late seventies Studio 54 was that better party for the world. Whatever
was going on there must be the ultimate revelry. All the glitteratti were
there and it was all so decedent.
Nineteen-year-old Jersey boy Shane O'Shea (Ryan Phillippe) is hanging out with
his dull friends at the same old dull discos and desperately wants to see the
bright lights. He convinces his buddies to drive across the river in hopes of
catching a glimpse of his fantasy girl, soap actress Julie Black (Neve Campbell).
Star-watching in front of the club, Shane impresses owner Steve Rubell (Mike
Myers) with his angelic looks and is allowed access to the zone forbidden to
mere mortals. Figuratively and literally leaving his friends behind, he enters nirvana.
Our ambitious, but non-too-bright hero is willing to do anything to get ahead.
With the help of his new pals, buser Greg (Brecklin Meyer) and his wife
coat-check girl Anita (Salma Hayek), Shane soon rises to the sought-after
position of bartender. Christened "Shane 54", he has all the drugs and women
he can abuse.
Let me get my prejudices out of the way up front. Disco barely qualifies as
music and the late seventies were an ugly time. Fashions, culture, the mood of
the nation: ugly, ugly, ugly. With that in mind, here's my opinion of the movie:
Did the shirtless busboys really look that bad in their short shorts? Beneath
the glitz, was it all that lifeless? 
Although the club is filled with Andy Warhol, fifteen-minute celebrities,
flashing lights, pounding music, sex and drugs on the dance floor, sex and
drugs on the balcony and sex and drugs in the basement, it's fairly boring.
Somehow I had the feeling that Studio 54 was more exciting. This film makes
decadence look downright listless. Like many people, they're doing the same
thing every night and not really enjoying it very much.
The club is the place to be seen and everyone is working the crowd or trying
to. Anita wants to be a singer and is willing to sleep with whoever she has
to. Julie wants better roles and is willing to sleep with whoever she has to.
You get the idea.
With one exception, the actors are disappointing. Phillippe certainly looks
the role of the fallen cherub, but "confused" is the only passion that he can
summon. The women are beautiful, but, as in the real world, that only goes so
far. Some personality would be nice. 
People are introduced, almost become interesting and then disappear. Sela Ward
is a record executive with a fondness for nose candy and younger men and the
potential for characterization, but where does she go? Ellen Dow plays an
elderly disco grandma who might be a human being, but turns into a cliche.
The exception is Myers' Rubell. Known for "Wayne's World" and "Austin Powers",
this role is a change of pace for the comedian. The ultimate host of the party
that never ended, Rubell is pathetic. Wallowing on a bed filled with cash, he
is propositioning a young busboy but has to pause for a moment to vomit on the
money. He's the rich guy with lots of friends because he has cool stuff, but
no one really wants to spend much time with him. Myers does a grand job with
the character. As unpleasant as he is, the movie only comes to life when he is onscreen.
You feel sorry for Rubell. He wants so much to be liked. Pity and
embarrassment are the primary emotions that nearly every character inspires.
Poor Shane. He doesn't fit with the "in" crowd. Poor Shane. Now he does fit in.
The plot is a thinly-disguised old one. Small-town boy goes to the big city,
is seduced by the glitter but finds out that the old values are the true ones.
According to this film, Blake was wrong. The road of excess doesn't lead to
the palace of wisdom, it goes nowhere. Surprise, surprise, the folks were
right. Sex and drugs are bad things. Come home Shane.
Like a disco, the film is fascinating and looks great for the first half hour.
Then nothing happens. As the third and lessor seventies movie after "Boogie
Nights" and "The Last Days Of Disco", "54" may be the one to finally put that
decade to rest. Hopefully the movie-going public is discoed-out.
If everyone wanted to be at Studio 54, I wonder where the people who were
there wanted to be. Surely there was a better party somewhere else.
Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and doesn't have the
time to think about why disco died. He's trying to figure out where the summer
of 1998 went. Email your theories to Redman@indepen.com.
[This appeared in the 9/03/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Vegas Vacation (1997)
Years ago the announcement of a film starring Chevy Chase and produced
by the hilarious "National Lampoon" magazine generated anticipation of a
hilarious time. That was then, this is now.
The fourth "Vacation" film continues the downhill slide. The first movie
featuring the Griswold family and their misadventures heading towards
Wally World was a comedic hit. Based on that success, we've been
subjected to the all-American "Father Knows Worst" family in Europe, at
Christmas and now gambling their life savings away. 
Remarkably enough, in a city that is a parody of everything American,
the movie finds little to laugh at. It's one lame sight gag (in every
sense of the word) after another. The Christy Brinkley in a convertible
scene from the earlier film is even recycled with a meaningless punch
line. Honed to a fine art on "Saturday Night Live", Chase's fumbling and
bumbling are still well-timed, but now are old hat.
When the Griswolds arrive in the city of blinking lights, Clark (Chase)
works desperately at being the worst gambler in the western hemisphere.
His wife Ellen (Beverly D'Angelo) flirts with the notion of an affair
with heartthrob Wayne Newton (played in his sleep by himself). Son Rusty
(Ethan Embry, the fourth actor to portray the boy) picks up a fake ID
from a street vendor and lucks his way into riches. Daughter Audrey
(Marisol Nichols, also the fourth) learns social skills from her
stripper cousin.
The sit-ups sound great and in another film might have been the basis
for comedy. Here they lay the foundation for humor that is tepid at
best.
The film promo shows a Hoover Dam tour guide. The pseudo-amusement is
based on the similarity of the words "dam" and "damn". If you think
that's feeble, remember: they pick the best for commercials.
Fortunately for the audience, there are a few high points. Randy Quaid
returns in his role as cousin Eddie who has moved to a trailer in the
midst of the scenic H-bomb testing grounds. Eddie is so upfront
degenerate that he provides a welcome relief to the tedium.
The only truly funny scenes come when Clark wanders into a "different"
type of casino. Specializing in Coin Toss,  Rock-Paper-Scissors and
Guess The Number; the establishment is what you might expect in Las
Vegas on the Bizarro world. Even here, the struggling Mr. Griswold can't
get a break. He loses the Coin Toss, although there may be some shady
dealings since the players never see the result. He can't even guess the
number between one and ten.
Futile hope springs eternal when a new "Vacation" film comes out, but to
no avail. Hopefully this is the last of them to dash those hopes into
the ground with its hobnailed boots of mediocrity. You never know, maybe
that would force Chevy into choosing a movie with something more than
potential.
Unless you're looking for something to waste your time, skip this. Wait
until the video comes out, fast-forward for an hour and a half and watch
the five minutes in the alien casino and then turn the machine off.
You'll thank me forever.
[This appeared in The "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana,
2/13/97. Michael Redman can be contacted at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Election (1999)
Far too often when we step into the voting booth, we are forced to choose the
lesser of evils. It's a fact of jaded modern life that we rarely feel there is
a "best person" we want to win. It's no different in high school.
At George Washington Carver High School (with hardly a person of color in
sight), Tracy Flick (Reese Witherspoon) is destined to win the student body
election. There is no one running against her.
Her error is reminding faculty advisor Jim McAllister (Matthew Broderick) that
when she wins, they will be spending a lot of time together. Remembering the
previous year when the beautiful teen took a colleague of his into the
darkroom to see what developed and thinking of his secret collection of
cheerleader porn, McAllister can see the ominous writing on the wall.
Determined to avoid his fate, he convinces star jock Paul Metzler (Chris
Klein) to run against Tracy. Paul stumbles into trouble when his sister
Tammy's (Jessica Campbell) supposed lesbian lover jumps into his bed. Tammy
decides to run against Paul for revenge.
The issues are gray rather than black and white. There are no demons or
saints, just people. Director Alexander Payne must remember what high school
was really like.
Even better, it's hilarious. When prim and proper Tracy is wearing an
over-sized campaign button and giving away cupcakes, all saying "Pick FLICK",
it's a reminder of why her last name is a typographer's nightmare and
broadcasts her secret attitude.
The actors are in fine form. It's fun to watch Broderick on the other side of
the desk from his Ferris Bueller role. Witherspoon is flawless as the
pursed-lipped and driven over-achiever. The film is something of a satire of
the 1992 elections and her character is loosely based on Bill Clinton
(Campbell is Ross Perot), but she seems more like potential contender
Elizabeth Dole. Klein and Campbell are perfect in their roles.
Unlike any other teen film of recent years, "Election" is both humorous and
thoughtful. A fine combination.
[The appeared in the 6/3/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Fargo (1996)
The first thing you notice about this movie is that it's cold. Placed in
Minnesota and North Dakota during the winter, many of the scenes take place
outside with long scenes of snow-covered ground against a background of white.
Just what we need as Bloomington struggles out of the endless long cold night.
As with most Coen brothers films, this features outlandish characters in
nefarious schemes, each of which works out in the oddest way possible. A car
salesman hires a couple of hoods to kidnap his wife so that he can collect the
ransom from her father. Along the way everything that can possibly go wrong
does. In brief scenes of vicious violence, people get shot through the head,
in the back, face, chest and various other areas of the anatomy. There is also
one of the most unpleasant body disposal scenes yet seen on the screen.
Remarkably enough, most of the movie is played for laughs.
The only likable person in the film is the very pregnant sheriff (Frances
McDormand) who hunts down the killers while eating at every possible opportunity.
With every good film the audience gains new knowledge. Here you learn _two_
things. Everyone in Minnesota speaks in an annoying whining accent that would
drive you crazy. And don't do violent illegal business with low-life amoral
degenerate scum-sucking losers. Oh yeah, if you get shot in the face, using a
brightly decorated napkin to stop the bleeding just makes you look goofy.
[This appeared in the 4/18/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Big Momma's House (2000)
"It's June," said the walrus to the carpenter, "and it's time to talk of
excruciatingly bad movies."
Every summer, the film industry, trusting in the belief supposedly held by
P. T. Barnum about how often suckers are brought into this world, dumps a
seemingly infinite number of movies into the nation's theaters.
Each of these cinematic offerings, most with a budget roughly equivalent to
the GNP of a small industrialized country, are touted as the "Big Summer
Blockbuster!" (TM).
There are movies that are hyped as hilarious: you'll be close to a heart
attack from laughter. Others are supposed to be the most exciting time
you've spent in the dark since your prom date in high school.
Unfortunately the vast majority are better suited for providing an
air-conditioned location for napping. The studios are banking on you having
so much free time during the warmer months that you'll be willing to fork
over a few bucks just to do _something_.
Of course there are the exceptions. Some of the best action films, funniest
comedies and even a few exceptional dramas are released while the sun
shines. But these are rare.
"Big Momma's House" is not one of these. It's not even an acceptable
time-waster. In fact, if it weren't for "Battlefield Earth", it could be in
the running for most disappointing film of the season.
FBI agent Malcolm Turner (Martin Lawrence), master of disguise, is sent to
stake out Big Momma's house in a small southern town. Big Momma's
granddaughter Sherry (Nia Long) just might come a'visiting along with
millions in bank loot and her escaped convict boyfriend.
When the very large matriarch is suddenly called out of town, Malcolm dons a
latex Big Momma suit to try to get Sherry to spill the beans.
You can probably guess the rest: a lot of fat jokes, fart jokes, old woman
jokes and then Malcolm falls for Sherry. Not one bit of which is even
remotely humorous.
The only potentially funny bits are telegraphed well in advance or have been
given away in commercials. It's a fewer-than-one-joke film.
Malcolm's disguise looks like a hyper-inflated Cabbage Patch Kid and could
only fool someone who has never seen a human being before.
Even Lawrence who has been amusing in other films, comes across as a
low-rent Eddie Murphy. The "real" Big Momma ((Ella Mitchell), a huge feisty
woman, would have been a much more interesting star. She's fiery and has
some energy about her. On the other hand, Lawrence, despite his padding, is
smaller than life.
It's a mystery what director Raja Gosnell had in mind. Perhaps he was
attempting to recapture the magic that was his directoral debut: "Home Alone 3".
Supposedly screenwriter Darryl Quarles pitched this with a one-line idea and
then went home to write it. The result looks like he never got beyond that
one line.
The film reminds me of an extended version of the failed sit-com pilots the
networks toss into the television schedules to fill time rather than show
reruns -- only not as entertaining.
The best part of this film? It's showing at the new Showplace West and the
seats are comfortable.
(Michael Redman has written this column for a very long time and you'd think
he'd come to know what to expect when the days get longer. But futile hope
springs eternal. Email your tales of better times to redman@bluemarble.net.)
[This appeared in the 6/8/2000 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bluemarble.net.]
-- 
mailto:redman@bluemarble.net
Film reviews archive: 
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Spawn (1997)
The entry into the world of feature length films by the hero of the
best-seller comic book and highly acclaimed HBO half hour animated series
clearly demonstrates the old adage that length doesn't necessarily equal quality.
Spawn's daddy Todd McFarlane, the renegade comic book artist that quit Marvel
comics at the height of his popularity to form an independent company has
marketed his creation masterfully. There are several comic series, trading
cards, the cartoons, t-shirts and wonderful toys: all produced with care and
an artistic vision.
And now comes Spawn The Movie, a different kettle of fish.
Al Simmons (Michael Jai White) is a top assassin for a shadowy US government
agency who decides to hang up his big guns in exchange for a nice quiet family
life. His boss Jason Wynn (Martin Sheen in a wasted role), in league with the
devil, gives Simmons the usual retirement for people who know too much.
Waking up in Hell, he agrees to lead the armies of darkness against the forces
of light in exchange for seeing his beloved wife Wanda again. The Hellspawn
returns to Earth five years later confused and bewildered. His new supervisor,
Clown (John Leguizamo in a fat suit) is a wise-cracking motor-mouth from the
netherworld. On his other shoulder is Cogliostro (Nicol Williamson) who
attempts to convince him that Good is the true path.
The film is filled with good intentions gone bad and not just in the
motivations of the characters. Many of the movie elements don't work as they
are intended.
Spawn carries huge guns and rides a motorcycle. Presumably this is to show
that he is not familiar with his enormous abilities and at first relies on his
old techniques. What actually happens is that the all-powerful agent of Satan
looks goofy riding a bike through the city streets.
The devil himself is visually exceptional but for some reason is unable to
move his mouth when talking. Giving the filmmakers the benefit of the doubt,
perhaps he is communicating telepathically and has no need of a mobile jaw,
but it comes across as bad animation.
The effects are often exceptional, but just as often look like clumsy student
projects. The images of Hell are stunning, but fall apart the longer they are
on screen.
The film doesn't live up to its promise of a stunning look at the morally
ambiguous lead character torn between good and evil. What we get instead is
another tepid walk though flash with little substance.
[This appeared in the 8/7/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for AntiTrust (2001)
The cultural phenomena of the rise to power of the computer geeks over the
past several years has been fascinating to observe. Those loner kids with
skin tones missing any trace of color from sitting in their rooms hunched
over a keyboard are now billionaires and rule the world. In a complete
turn-about, head-hunters are searching high school yearbooks for members of
the Chess Club and the AV Crew.
You would think that Hollywood would recognize the vast audience of young
people in touch with that scene and release films that appealed to them. And
you would be wrong. Instead they give us "Antitrust" which appeals to
teenage girls in touch with how pretty Ryan Phillippe is.
Stealing most of its plot from "The Net" and "The Firm", this film is old
hat. Young computer genius Milo (Phillippe) is seduced by Bill Gates
lookalike Gary Winston (Tim Robbins) away from his buddies and into the
world of corporate code-writing.
In short order, Milo discovers the underbelly of Winston's evil empire and
sets out to put everything right with the world. Not a bad concept, but it
fails on almost every level.
Admittedly it's difficult to make typing seem exciting even on the big
screen, but the opportunities to generate tension are ignored. This is a
prime example of one of the worst film genres: the thrill-less thriller. The
scene where Milo discovers the secret plan is remarkably lifeless.
Maybe I've seen too many films. I found myself annoying my companions by
predicting the rest of the movie during the first 15 minutes and was only
able to stop after repeated beatings. In a story where people are supposedly
not who they appear to be and shocks await around every corner, it's
probably not such a great idea to make everything so obvious. This might
work with the target audience of young girls who may not be acquainted with
the hundreds of films this one copies, but for anyone else, it flops.
The one bright spot is Robbins' portrayal of the amoral software
gazillionaire. Why this multi-talented man is in this movie is a mystery for
the ages, but he does Bill Gates to a T.
Geeks in the audience will be searching in vain for the "Restart" key
minutes after it starts. But there is no hope. Nothing to do except watch
the program crash and burn.
(Michael Redman has written this column since before computers became
domesticated and had more fun de-fragging a hard drive than watching this
movie. Email tales of geekdom to redman@bluemarble.net.)
[This appeared in the 1/18/2001 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bluemarble.net.]
-- 
mailto:redman@bluemarble.net
Film reviews archive: 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Michael+Redman

Title
Review for Mother (1996/II)
Albert Brooks' new film is aimed at anyone who has ever had, ever been
or is thinking of ever becoming a mother. While admittedly this is a
fairly large segment of the movie-going public and the film is often
extremely charming, "Mother" is not for everyone.
There are no explosions, car chases or visible big guns. Broad slapstick
comedy is at a minimum. There aren't even very many outrageous rolling
on the floor laughing scenes. What there is, is an abundance of wit and
humanity that produce knowing smiles and chuckles. Looking around, you
can see the thought balloons floating above the audience members, "Yeah,
my mom does exactly the same thing."
Brooks plays John Henderson, a science fiction author ("Planet Seven"
and "Planet Eight" -- care to guess the title of his next book?) hitting
his mid-life crisis head on as he concludes his second divorce.
Realizing that all of his relationships with women are based on the
first woman in his life, he decides to move back in with mom to try and
figure out what's wrong.
Mother (Debbie Reynolds in her first leading role in over 25 years)
doesn't exactly understand what John calls his "Experiment", but goes
along with it good-naturedly albeit with something of a suspicious
attitude. Emptying out his old bedroom which has become a sewing room
(read "storage shed", because mother doesn't really sew), sonny boy digs
out his posters and trophies from high school. Shortly it looks like a
typical teenager's room in the sixties.
Except for a small part by John's younger, more successful and still
tied to mommy, brother (Rob Morrow), the film belongs to Brooks and
Reynolds. One or both are almost constantly on-screen and they do their
characters wonderfully. Reynolds shines as the over-bearing mother when
she offers her son antique generic orange sherbet with its "protective
ice coating" and slices a piece of frozen cheese off a block big enough
to clog the arteries of an entire town.
Morrow's whinny brother is adequately performed, but the actor hasn't
captured a character with much enthusiasm since his days as Dr. Joel on
"Northern Exposure".
Occasionally you can see the ghost of Woody Allen in the background as
Brooks, who also directed and co-wrote, mines the same relationship
territory. Although Brooks doesn't have the same timing genius, he does
seem tapped into life outside the big city more than Woody. Set in
Sausalito, the ultimate Yuppie west coast village, the film feels more
open and universally accessible that Allen's New York geocentrism.
There are some rough points in the film. Part of the appeal is that many
scenes are underplayed, almost like real life; but at times you will be
disappointed that the bigger pay-off is missing. The ending is tied up a
bit too neatly and could have used a little more time. 
The story explores the subtle and sometimes not-so subtle ways that the
mother and son treat each other as symbols and archetypes rather than as
people. John's revelation comes when he realizes that his mother is not
just someone who does things to him, but an individual with hopes,
dreams and disappointments. 
The theme of seeing beyond the masks is food for thought. The film's
message is that until adult children can do this, every day of their
life will be "mother's day".
[This appeared in the "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana 1/31/97.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Sleepers (1996)
It's about time! After sitting through weeks of decidedly mediocre
films, we've finally got a winner.
Based on the best-selling (and reportedly true) novel and directed by
Barry Levinson ("Diner", "Good Morning Vietnam", "Rain Man", "The
Natural"), this disturbing film is certainly the best thing currently on
the screen. It may be the best movie of the year so far.
Following the life of four men, the story begins in the tough Hell's
Kitchen neighborhood of New York where the boys are treading a fine line
between the influences of their priest Father Bobby (Robert DeNiro) and
King Benny, the local mob chieftain. They're experiencing the typical
city kid life until the hot summer day in 1966 when their lives change
forever.
A petty theft that goes wrong and almost kills a man results in the boys
being sent to the Wilkinson Reform School. While at the detention
center, the boys are abused in every possible way by the guards, lead by
a particularly sinister Kevin Bacon.
The rest of the movie takes place years later in 1981 when two of the
boys, grown to become amoral killers, run into Bacon in a bar, pull out
their guns and murder him where he sits. Their other two friends, a
reporter and an attorney in the district attorney's office, scheme to
set the killers free and expose the evils of the reform school.
The central theme of the film is revenge and how much of a soul is
traded away to achieve it. Is it legitimate to lie, cheat and steal in
order to punish a greater wrong? Father Bobby's decision is especially
agonizing: the man versus the church.
The film is so powerful in its images and concepts that some scenes are
tremendously uncomfortable to watch. The abuses, while not graphic, are
some of the most intensely effective moments in cinema.
Rarely do we see a film with so many elements going for it. The actors,
DeNiro, Dustin Hoffman, Brad Pitt and the rest, are all wonderful. The
story is riveting; the cinematography, excellent and the direction,
engrossing.  It took days to get the pictures out of my mind. And that's
a good thing.
[This review appeared in The Bloomington Voice, Bloomington, Indiana,
10/24/96. Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Addicted to Love (1997)
Sam and Maggie start off their relationship on an odd note. Hiding out
in a tumbling down building opposite their former lovers' apartment;
they watch visions projected on a whitewashed wall and listen to their
orgasms blasting out of loudspeakers while plotting their demise.
Well, it may not be much more bizarre than the beginning of many
relationships, but this one features Matthew Broderick and Meg Ryan not
your best friend and new paramour.
Astronomer Sam (Broderick) is shocked when he receives a Dear John
letter from long-time love Linda (Kelly Preston) who is far away in New
York for a two-month teaching workshop. Stunned, he hops the first plane
to the Big Apple and tracks her down by going from hotel to hotel.
(Don't try this at home kids, it's a little more difficult in real
life.)
Discovering that she has shacked up with French chef Anton (Tcheky
Karyo), Sam breaks into the abandoned tenement across the street and
sets up his personal observatory. Constructing the world's best camera
obscura, he watches their comings and goings and takes copious notes
hoping to scientifically predict their breakup.
His dedicated study is interrupted by breaking glass and the entry of
leather-clad motorcycle-riding babe Maggie (Ryan). She isn't interested
in waiting around so that he can reclaim her former sweetheart as Sam is
doing. Maggie wants to inflict pain on the man who dumped her. Revenge
is her motive.
Bugging the apartment, she brings sound to Sam's pictures and adds
artistic passion to his scientific rationality. Their spy station
complete, they are content for a while to be voyeurs. Then they slip
into a more active mode; plotting to destroy the relationship, bugging
(in another sense) Anton's restaurant, getting it shut down and
virtually destroying his life.
All along, as is inevitable, Sam and Maggie fall in love despite their
best efforts not to. Bad Girl Maggie The Cat is just the person to wake
Sam up and he brings hope to her life.
The stars are among the most appealing people working in films today.
>From a man's point of view, Meg Ryan is beautiful and overtly sexual
without having the typical Hollywood overly-endowed body by "Playboy"
and Broderick is the guy you'd like to have as a best buddy.
Occasionally there's some very heavy chemistry between them, but
sometimes it is strangely lacking.
Ryan's role is a stretch for her from her usual romantic roles ("When
Harry Met Sally") but she's up to the task. Maggie is out for blood and
although sensuous in a severe way, she's no naive Sally. Broderick is
his usual nice guy, but even he shows a talent for the sadistic.
There are several dazzling visuals, many of which involve the projected
images as Sam and Maggie stand with moving pictures of their past
significant others covering their bodies. In one particularly striking
moment, the astronomer is painting the wall white as parts of Linda's
likeness begin to sparkle with vitality.
Preston's character is nothing more than a place-holder for the plot,
but Karyo's is a different matter. For the first half of the film, he is
not much more, but when the movie shifts into the farce mode, he becomes
the center of attention.
It is this French farce component that is the weak point of the film. If
it is true that the French worship Jerry Lewis, then this section is for
them. Not being a huge Lewis-imitator fan, the bumblings around in a
body cast scenes fall flat for me.
It's damning with faint praise to say that, for all of its darkness,
this is one of the best romantic comedies recently. It's worth a watch,
but not as memorable a one as it could have been.
[This appeared in the 6/6/97 issue of the "Bloomington Voice",
Bloomington, Indiana. Michael Redman can be reached at
mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Lost in Space (1998)
There are movies that are an artistic vision, struggle to get made and are
released without regard to public desires. Often these are the best films ever
made. And then there's "Lost In Space", the movie that pushed "Titanic" off
the top of the boxoffice.
Everything about this film appears calculated to make money. The
merchandising potential is obvious. Most characters look like potential action
figures. Many scenes seem to exist only to inspire video games. The rest are
toy designs.
The more subtle manipulation is an attempt to draw in every possible audience
segment. Baby Boomers will be attracted to nostalgia for the television
series. Twenty-somethings will follow "Friends" star Matt LeBlanc into the
theaters. Teens want to see zippy space ships and big explosions. Adolescents
have rebellious Penny Robinson to identify with. For the "Home Alone" crowd,
Will Robinson has become several years younger than he was on television.
While it's no sin to appeal to everyone, such a strategy serves to dilute the
product. Appealing to the lowest common denominators of several different
groups satisfies no one.
Earth of 2058 is in trouble. Man has trashed all of its natural resources and
needs another planet to use up. Professor John Robinson (William Hurt) is the
man with a plan. His hypergate will allow the population to instantly
transport to Alpha Prime, a hospitable planet millions of miles away. To
achieve this, he needs to take a 10-year trip there to construct a hypergate.
Seeing himself as a devoted family man although he is too busy to ever spend
time with them, he takes everyone along. Wife Maureen (Mimi Rogers),
biochemist daughter Judy (Heather Graham), reluctant daughter Penny (Lacey
Chabert) and boy-genius son Will (Jack Johnson) all suit up for the family
vacation of a lifetime. Military pilot Don West (LeBlanc) is assigned to get
them to where they are going safe and sound.
The plan falls through when Dr. Zachary Smith (Gary Oldman) is paid off by
the Global Sedition, a group dedicated to preventing the hypergate, to
sabotage their ship. Smith is betrayed by his employers and becomes an
unwilling stowaway.
When the damaged starcraft starts to fall into the sun, West shifts into
hyperspace to escape their imminent destruction. Unfortunately without a
hypergate, they have no control over where they go. Materializing in an
unknown area of the universe, they are -- you guessed it -- lost in space.
Based on the sixties television program (which in turn was apparently stolen
from the "Space Family Robinson" comic book), the film attempts to update the
30-year old series with mixed success.
The original had a number of problems itself. After the first few episodes
that were played somewhat seriously, the focus changed to "camp". Will, Dr.
Smith and the nameless robot fell into one silly situation after another each
week. Viewing the episodes decades after they first aired, they are
entertaining _because_ they are so goofy. Back then, they were frequently painful.
There's no intentional foolishness in the 1998 version. A few years before
the Millennium, we want our escapism dark. Dr. Smith is no longer merely
selfish, now he's purely evil as a lifestyle choice. The warm family relations
have given way to the dysfunctional family of the nineties. Professor Robinson
ignores his kids and his long-suffering wife. Penny is an angry pre-teen. Will
wants only his father's approval. Judy isn't much of anything. Even the robot
starts off as a destructive force.
All the nonsense in the film is apparently unwitting. The story is weak and
falls apart. The beginning half hour designed to establish the characters is
dull and they never become real people. The time-travel mysterious plot device
towards the end is supposed to contain surprises but doesn't. Supposedly the
family is lost, but no one appears to care about getting back home. Director
Stephen Hopkins ("Predator 2") doesn't deliver.
The acting is genuinely second-rate with rare exceptions. Hurt and Rogers are
both capable of superior performances, but don't seem to even try. Chabert has
an appealing punk appearance, but when she opens her mouth, her helium-powered
squeaky voice sounds as if it's been recorded at the wrong speed. Only Oldman
and Johnson show any acting chops.
Of course even the best actors can't do anything with a disastrous script.
Screenwriter Akiva Goldsman (responsible for that other calamity "Batman And
Robin") offers them nothing to work with.
With a record number of special effects, you'd expect that there would at
least be some eye candy. But, no. The deadly spiders are a joke. The alien
space-monkey that doesn't look like it exists in the same place as anything
else and has no function in the film. It might as well have been an
infomercial for a new toy...which is probably is.
Not everything is horrendous. There are a few bright spots. Will operates the
robot via a virtual reality set-up and it looks like someone for at least a
few minutes is having fun. The cameos by the original cast are fun although
presumably Billy Mumy (Will) is too busy with "Babylon 5" to show up. Dr.
Smith's cloaked incarnation is handled well but when he sheds the wrap, it's
the same ol' same ole.
Watching the closing credits is like experiencing a bad Sega game. I was so
convinced that the film only existed to inspire toys, that I stopped by the
theater lobby to see if the had a "Lost In Space" video game.  They didn't.
Not yet.
(As a teenager, Michael Redman, writer of this column for 23 years, never
would have believed that he could write these words: the "Lost In Space"
television series was better.)
[This appeared in the 4/8/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Shine (1996)
An Australian child prodigy, bullied by his father to succeed, is on his
way to world fame by virtue of his remarkable skill at the piano. He
wins contests, impresses the right people and teachers stand in line to
work with him. Then it all falls apart amidst sweat, insanity and
Rachmaninoff's "Piano Concerto No. 3".
Based on the true story of David Helfgott life, the film has earned
numerous awards (Best Actor from New York Film Critics Association, Best
Picture from others). It is a powerful portrayal of madness but there is
also a certain "emptiness" to it that prevents the film from reaching
inside the audience with the intensity that the tale begs for.
Helfgott's journey from childhood through his breakdown to a comeback in
his forties is one of triumph over mental illness, however the viewer's
emotional involvement often remains detached. And that's too bad.
Whatever it is that just doesn't "click" stands in the way of this fine
movie being a magnificent one.
Geoffrey Rush who portrays the musician as an adult is wild and right on
target as the rambling fast-talking genius-in-left-field. His inspired
take on the deranged rivals Dustin Hoffman's Rainman. You'll be unable
to take your eyes off him while he is eating up the screen.
One of the problems is that Helfgott condition is never very clear. We
see him as a beaten child dominated by his monster father but driven to
excel at the keyboard. We watch as he gains more and more skill,
learning to use the piano as a means of self-expression. All along, his
eye is on his father's Holy Grail: performing the seemingly un-playable
"Rach 3".
After masterfully performing the piece, he collapses on stage. The next
thing we know, he's institutionalized: a shattered man. Slowly coming
back to life, during the next few years the pianist begins to regain his
sanity. What happened? It's never very clear and that missing piece of
the jigsaw puzzle leaves the picture incomplete.
There are some wonderful scenes between Rush and Helfgott
savior/lover/astrologer (Lynn Redgrave) and some truly frightening ones
featuring the boy and his father. Based on the reviews and awards,
perhaps others see something that I don't, but I couldn't help wanting
more.
[This appeared in The "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana,
2/27/97. Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Apostle, The (1997)
Fanatics are odd birds. They eat, breathe and sleep their obsession and will
grab any possible opportunity to tell you all about it. Commendable in their
energy and devotion, they are usually best admired at a safe distance. Up
close and personal, they're too up close and personal.
Pentecostal minister Euliss F. "Sonny" Dewey (Robert Duvall) is full of the
Lord, full of fire & brimstone and he's also full of contradictions. Looking
like a rock star in his white suit and shades, he hits the revival circuit in
the deep south like a locomotive with a full head of steam. A devoted family
man, he hits the sheets with his conquests with the same passion. He's a man
of peace, but hitting comes natural.
In the middle of the night, he senses that something is amiss. Jumping in his
car and racing home, he discovers his long-suffering wife Jessie (Farrah
Fawcett) bedding down the local youth minister Horace (Todd Allen). 
Hot-headed Sonny doesn't take the situation well. Besides his philandering and
ignoring his wife in favor of his ministry, there are obviously other problems
in their relationship. Jessie's flinch reflex whenever he reaches towards her
is telling. In the business of saving souls, he has been unable to save his marriage.
To make matters worse, Jessie has manipulated the church bylaws to take his
congregation away from him. Seeing her and her lover together at his son's
softball game sends Sonny over the edge and in a fit of rage he takes a
baseball bat to Horace's head.
Realizing that he has done a _wrong_thing_, Sonny dumps his car and wallet in
a river. He is born again again, dubs himself "The Apostle E.F." and sets out
to redeem his life. Leaving Texas and lead by the Lord to Bayou Boutte, a
small Louisiana town, he meets up with Brother Blackwell (John Beasley).
Blackwell has retired from preaching after two heart attacks, but still has an
empty church. He is convinced of E.F.'s dedication and gives him the building
to use. The Apostle takes on his new church "One Way Road To Heaven" with a
vengeance: rebuilding the chapel, creating a church bus out of scrap and
gathering his flock. Soon they are singing, clapping and testifying.
This film is Duvall's baby. After attempting to get a studio interested in it
for over a decade, he put up the money himself. He also directed,
executive-produced, wrote it and is in every scene. In the hands of a lesser
actor, it would be a disaster. Instead, it is a masterpiece.
E.F. is a complicated man. Cinema's treatment of Christianity has generally
concentrated on one-dimensional squeaky clean folk or corrupt money-grubbing
evangelists with no room for anyone in-between. Duvall gives us a real and
certainly imperfect person. Sonny is filled with energy. He doesn't walk
anywhere: he struts, jumps and dances wherever he goes. Running away from or
towards something, he doesn't have to time to saunter. His enthusiasm for his
god is unmistakable as is the fact that he's a guy with some serious problems.
There ain't none of us saints.
With a strong cast (including June Carter Cash, Billy Bob Thornton and an
under-used Miranda Richardson) backing him up, Duvall shows us a personal tale
of a very flawed man. If there is a problem with the characters, it is that,
other than E.F., they are underdeveloped. Everyone exists only as a connection
to the preacher, but then, this is his story from his eyes.
Using church-goers and evangelists rather than professional actors as extras,
the film has an air of authenticity. The "Amen"s feel real. The revivals are
energized. E.F.'s final sermon is a wonder of ebullience.
I don't have much patience for religious snake-oil salesmen, but this film
isn't about religion. It's about the Apostle E.F. lost and found; redeemed but
tainted. As those preachers of a different faith said, it's a long strange trip.
[This appeared in the 3/5/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil (1997)
MORE COLOR TO GARDEN THAN JUST FLOWERS
There's something about the American South that has always captured the
imagination of the rest of the country. Perhaps it's the easy-going tranquil
lifestyle, almost-courtly manners and abundance of charming eccentrics that
are so appealing. Or maybe it's the knowledge that just beneath the surface of
all that, there's a whole lot of _other things_ going on.
New York writer John Kelso (John Cusack) arrives in Savannah, Georgia to do a
500-word "postcard" article about the former. He's to attend the exclusive
elegant Christmas party of nouveau riche Jim "But it's the riche that matters"
Williams (Kevin Spacey) and describe the city's finest for "Town And Country"
magazine. The moneyed antique dealer is instantly personable in that "Here
have a drink and let me show you what else I own" way.
After the party it turns out that the journalist has a rendezvous with the
latter when his refined host kills a young hustler with a Luger he keeps in
his desk drawer. It is revealed that Williams' victim is his gay lover who has
been servicing many of society's elite of both sexes. Kelso smells a book
possibility and stays on. He agrees to investigate the case in exchange for
exclusive literary rights after Williams is tossed into jail and scheduled for trial.
What he uncovers is more than just what's going on under the sheets of the
beautiful sleepy delta town spared by General Sherman during his march to the
sea. The cast of colorful characters wouldn't seem out of place in an episode
of "Twin Peaks".
An elderly black man who walks an invisible long-dead Labrador with a visible
leash every morning. Society matrons discuss the handguns their husbands used
to commit suicide. A disbarred attorney-turned piano player whose life is an
eternal party and serves hors d'oeuvres outside the murder scene lives next
door to Williams' block-long mansion. An inventor screwed out of his royalties
keeps a swarm of pet horseflies with him, attached by strings to his clothes.
Minerva (Irma P. Hall), the local Voodoo priestess conducts a midnight ritual
at the grave of the murdered boy.
Best of all is a professional drag queen, the Lady Chablis (played by
her...err...himself). An outspoken bad girl with and a sense of drama and
style that leaves most of the real women in the dust, the lady is unsuccessful
in tempting Kelso to sample her "candy", although the two form an unlikely friendship.
As the writer tells his editor "Everyone here is drunk and heavily armed. New
York is boring!"
Based on John Berendt's massive best-selling book about his real life
experiences in the eighties, the film attempts to be a mixture of mystery,
courtroom drama and a search for morality. It's not snappy enough to succeed
as a detective tale. Although Williams' lawyer, the smooth good ol' boy Sonny
Seiler (Jack Thompson) has his moments, the trial scenes also don't have much
of a punch.
Thank heaven for the offbeat personalities. Like a lazy southern river, the
film is not in any hurry and meanders here and there, rounding this bend and
spending a little time before drifting elsewhere. The only reason it works as
well as it does is that there is so much to look at and take in. The
experience is like being a tourist wandering through unfamiliar territory. If
the movie relied solely on its plot, it would be a riverboat dead in the water
on a sand bar.
Clint Eastwood seems determined to direct films that are opposites of the ones
he starred in. No one could mistake this or his "The Bridges Of Madison
County" for a Dirty Harry movie.
Cusack puts in a fine performance as the wide-eyed big city Yankee constantly
demonstrating his awe at each new weirdness. He's accumulated quite a history
of roles and is becoming a personal favorite. Spacey is also in top form and
pulls off the difficult fusion of likable genteel socialite with a sleazy
underbelly. Hall's font of wisdom is endearing when she pops up throughout the
film talking to the dead boy and squirrels. Eastwood's daughter Alison is
enticing as Kelso's love interest although the role doesn't add much to the movie.
It is the Lady Chablis that steals the show. Just as you are starting to watch
the film through half-closed eyes, she appears on the scene with a burst of
energy. The lady has sparks shooting off of her wherever she goes. In a city
where everyone else strolls down the boulevard, she struts loud and proud.
At well over two hours, the film could have used some editing, but then it
wouldn't have that languid southern charm. It makes you wish that movie
theaters came equipped with verandas and mint juleps so you could sit back
with your feet up and feast your eyes.
[This appeared in the 11/26/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana]

Title
Review for Hanging Up (2000)
If you'd like to make a call, please hang up and try again
What is the poet said about humans and rodents and how their plans usually
gets screwed up?
The distance between how a project looks in our head and how it acts in real
life is often so vast that even the best ideas can't make the leap. We spend
hours and hours working out the scheme, detailing the minutia and then it just
doesn't work.
Not surprisingly our expectations and hopes are so high that we can't even see
that it's not workingfor a while at least. We want the thing to be good so it
looks good to us. Until the slow realization of reality sinks in.
That's exactly what happens with "Hanging Up". It sounds great and has all the
elements to be a wonderful movie. I expected and wanted to enjoy it. But then
chaos theory set in. A butterfly flaps its wings in Japan and the film falls.
Eve (Meg Ryan) has a full life running her own business and taking care of her
family, but her obsession is caring for her dying alcoholic father (Walter
Matthau). Her self-absorbed sisters Georgia (Diane Keaton) and Maddy (Lisa
Kudrow) aren't much help. Georgia carries on a love affair with her cell phone
while publishing her women's magazine (entitled, what else, "Georgia").
Maddy's life revolves around her soap opera role.
This all must have looked so good on paper. What an ultimate "chick flick"!
Screenwriter Nora Ephron has a string of hits. Keaton, who also directs, has
good instincts and her directoral efforts have earned prestigious awards.
The casting of the women was genius. All three have at least partially built
their careers on playing the same scattered but appealing hot babe. It's not a
stretch to imagine a younger Keaton in "When Harry Met Sally". Or a younger
Ryan fitting in with the cast of "Friends". Keaton and Ryan both captivate the
screen in most of their roles and Kudrow isn't too annoying in small doses.
Matthau has spent half of his life playing crotchety old men and he does it
better than anyone. No one else can so convincingly lie in a hospital bed yet
still have the energy to grab asses.
There are a few touching moments. Dad comes home drunk during young Eve's
birthday party and everyone in the audience feels her pain and embarrassment.
When absent mother (Cloris Leachman) explains she left the family because
motherhood just didn't take and Eve returns home, your heart sinks. You know
she's going to take her mother's place in the family and the emotional deadend
that leads to. Her relationship with her father is the one convincing aspect
of the film, although you would think that sometime during the past 10 years
she would have run into one of those thousands of books on codependency.
What goes wrong? Just about everything. The actors are all more than adequate
but with the exception of Ryan and Matthau, no one really connects with each
other. Rarely do the women come across as sisters. Maddy and Georgia aren't
fully fleshed-out characters. None of the men are anything other than
place-holders. Matthau is great, but he's merely a cartoon.
The script contributes little towards creating real people. Most of the time
the conversations fall flat even when supposedly passionate. The story ("I've
devoted my life to my father and now he's dying") has the potential for a deep
look into the human psyche and connecting with a large number of the audience
but seldom gets beyond superficial.
The film isn't horrendous. The dangers of being electronically and/or
emotionally overly connected and at everyone's beck and call 24 hours a day
says something to the modern American. The actors are fun to watch and some of
the scenes work well. Occasionally the humor hits home.
Unfortunately none of it clicks together as a whole. Bits and pieces, but not
a satisfying film. Oddly enough, for a movie that supposedly deals with how we
relate to each other, what we have here is a failure to communicate.
(Michael Redman has written this column since before the dawn of time and has
to confess that, for possibly the first time, his favorite film of last year
was nominated for an Oscar. Comments about "American Beauty" can be sent to redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the Feb. 24, 2000 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at mailto:redman@indepen.com ]

Title
Review for Mod Squad, The (1999)
This film is extraordinarily horrendous and I'm not going to waste any more
words on it.
[This appeared in the 4/1/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Boogie Nights (1997)
"Everyone's blessed with one special thing," explains Eddie Adams. Eddie's
blessing is his extraordinarily endowed "special thing".
Set in the seventies and eighties, Adams' (Mark Wahlberg of Marky Mark fame)
journey into the porn industry is the center point for this comedic yet dark
film. Reminiscent of Robert Altman's "Nashville", the movie also follows a
gaggle of other characters, each more damaged than the next.
Adult film auteur Jack Horner (Burt Reynolds) notices Eddie in a nightclub and
recognizes the possibilities that the young man possesses when he tells him "I
have the feeling that behind those jeans is something wonderful just waiting
to get out." Fresh from being kicked out of his parent's house because he will
never amount to anything, Eddie accepts the invitation into Horner's film
production dysfunctional family.
It looks like the good life. Full-tilt partying, easy sex, drugs, platform
shoes, the chance to be a movie star: what more could a kid in the seventies
want? As you might expect, no good time goes unpunished. As the eighties start
off with a bang (in all meanings of the word), things fall apart. Hedonism
turns to violence, crime and drug addiction. The good life isn't.
As with many current films, this one is long. Often the story is so engrossing
that you won't notice the length, but occasionally the rambling plot makes you
feel all two and a half hours. There are scenes that could have been exorcised
and we wouldn't have lost a thing.
Invoking the seventies is one of the most successful aspects of the movie and
also one of its most irritating. There are so many icons that bring to mind
that time period and the film has all of them right. The problem is that it's
shoved in our face. When porn star/stereo salesman Buck Swope (Don Cheadle)
shoves an eight-track into a player, he has to _tell_ us it's an eight-track.
"Seventies! Seventies! It's the seventies!" everyone screams. Yeah, we get the idea.
The hindsight of looking back 20 years provides some of the humor. When Eddie
(now renamed Dirk Diggler) brags about his "authentic imported Italian nylon"
shirt, we all know how comfortable plastic clothes turned out to be. Dancing
in platform shoes in the disco doesn't look cool anymore, it looks ludicrous.
Director Paul Thomas Anderson calls that decade "a wonderful period of music
and fashion." Anderson is 26. His memories are those of a 6-year-old.
But the era is only the backdrop to the real drama. When Eddie is sucked into
Horner's oxymoronic kindly and paternal sleazy clan, he finds the home that he
needs. Along with numerous other hangers-on, they provide support for each
other. Even when the gold turns to sludge, they still try to hold things
together -- they just don't know how.
Wahlberg is the perfect combination of youth and determined naivete to play
the up and coming stud. Like most of the characters, his Eddie is all drive
and little skill. In their microcosm, the horrendous "Mod Squad" knockoff
action-adventure porn series wins awards. Eddie's abortive rock and roll
career is doomed from the start.
Burt Reynolds turns in his most successful role in years. His laid back
director wants to produce "artistic" porn that will keep the audience in their
seats after they have enjoyed the film in the traditional manner. His nemesis
is video tape. As VCRs invade the American home and adult films are being
produced by everyone who can pick up a camera, Horner attempts to hold out for
quality. In the kingdom of the blind, the one-eyed man is king.
The rest of the cast is equally capable. Julianne Moore as Amber Waves is an
especially sympathetic character. Besides acting in the films, Waves is the
substitute mother to the rest, compensating for her biological son who was
taken away from her.
Rollergirl (Heather Graham), a teenage runaway, doesn't have much of a
personality until the final half, but is amusing zooming through the scenes in
her roller skates -- which she _never_ removes. 
Little Bill (William H. Macy) is outstanding as the grim crew member whose
wife cheats on him at the drop of a hat. At one party, he walks up to her as
she is naked in the middle of a crowd entertaining a gentleman friend on the
driveway. When he attempts to talk to her, she replies "Shut up Bill. You're
embarrassing me." He is powerless to change his life and lets it build up until...
A film about the porn industry without any real porn? Although there is full
frontal (and full backal) nudity, the sex scenes are mostly portrayed in
facial expressions of the onlookers. Even Eddie's revelation of his famous
gift (made possible with a prosthesis for Wahlberg, in case you're interested)
is not played for thrills.
The message here will play well nowadays. Have too much fun and you'll trash
yourself. There's some truth to that, but finding the middle road between the
mundane and the extreme is a difficult one. Good luck.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 22 years and is enjoying the
crisp colorful southern Indiana autumn instead of staying inside watching
adult videos. mredman@bvoice.com is the eaddress for recommendations of either activity.)
[This appeared in the 11/5/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]
-- 
mailto:mredman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Instinct (1999)
The most dangerous threat to modern civilization isn't nuclear war. Nor is it
corrupt politicians, greedy big business or economic collapse. The biggest
danger, the thing that could bring our society as we know it to a screeching
halt, is if people were to wake up.
A sleeping population is what greases the wheels of modern commerce. If the
guys flipping burgers were to suddenly realize how they're spending most of
their lives, you'd never get a Big Mac again. If everyone who hated their jobs
decided to do something more meaningful to them, we'd find empty offices and stores.
Noted anthropologist and primatologist Ethan Powell (Anthony Hopkins) gets in
touch with what is really real -- and he goes to live with the apes.
As the film opens, Powell is being transferred from a horrid prison in Rwanda
to American authorities. Charged with attacking a group of men and killing two
of them, he is then incarcerated in an equally barbaric prison for the
criminally insane in the US. He refuses to speak, even to defend himself.
Ambitious young psychiatrist Theo Caulder (Cuba Gooding, Jr.) sees Powell as
his ticket to ride the career fast track and volunteers to perform his
evaluation. Attempting to get inside the former researcher's head, he tracks
down Powell's estranged daughter for clues. Along the way, he has to do battle
with cruel prison guards, his icy mentor and the frustrated ineffectual prison psychiatrist.
When Caulder finally gets the wild man to communicate, he discovers there's
more going on than psychosis and often becomes Powell's student. He slowly
learns to see beyond the illusions he's been indoctrinated with.
Loosely based on the novel Ishmael, this is a tale of just how thin the
veneer of civilization is and what we have given up. After years of observing
gorillas in the wild, Powell is accepted as one of them. Spending more and
more time with the apes, he doesn't return to his camp to sleep one night. In
a powerful scene, he leaves his binoculars and machete behind, joins the
gorilla family and doesn't go to work anymore.
Hopkins is a remarkable actor. The audience hangs on his every word and
slightest movement. He isn't just playing the part of a scientist gone native,
he becomes that character. Gooding, he of the most furrowed brow in cinema, is
completely believable as the obstinate analyst forced to examine his own life.
The jungle scenery is beautiful and the gorillas more authentic than anything
seen before.
This could have been a four-star film but there are some elements that seem
overly familiar. A few scenes and characters are lifted directly from "One
Flew Over The Cuckoo's Nest". Director Jon Turteltaub ("Phenomenon") borrows
liberally from "Silence Of The Lambs", "Tarzan", "Gorillas In The Mist" and
prison reform films such as "Brubaker".
The mystery of why Powell kills is a key plot element but it isn't much of a
puzzle. 
There are a few film cliches. The guards are evil and uncaring. A couple of
insane murderers are cute and cuddly. Prison is a bad place. Animals are noble
savages and humans, marauding destroyers. Occasionally the pacing falters. It
does avoid one trap. A potential obligatory love interest turns, instead, into
a friendship.
For any other film, these flaws might have ruined the movie. Here, Hopkins is
so commanding that you'll fall right into the story, forgetting the artistic
problems. His performance and the powerful underlying message overwhelm the
structural defects.
Very few people are going to give up their successful professional careers to
run off and live with the beasts. The metaphor for what Joseph Campbell calls
"following your bliss" won't be taken to heart by many. Most of us are too
satisfied with bread and circuses to take that type of chance. But what if we did?
(Michael Redman has written this column for almost 24 years and is heading out
the door to live in the wilds of southern Indiana with the raccoons. He'll
probably still get email at Redman@indepen.com)
[This appeared in the 6/10/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Devil's Advocate, The (1997)
Al Pacino is one actor that usually looks as if he is enjoying his job. His
over-the-top performances are a joy to behold and this one is about as hot as
they get. Think Scent Of A Woman meets Rosemary's Baby.
Kevin Lomax (Keanu Reeves) is a southern lawyer who just can't lose a case.
Recruited by big city lawyer John Milton (Pacino in a not very subtly named
role) for his law firm, Lomax is unaware that he is in for the ride of his life.
Everyone who's seen the previews knows that Milton is actually old Scratch
himself and out to seduce the young idealistic attorney over to the dark side.
And the wrong path has never looked so inviting. Satan lives the good life
rolling in the dough in a penthouse apartment with a gorgeous babe on each arm.
Until the finale, the special effects are kept to a minimum, but well used.
People change to demons out of the corner of your eye for just a second. Other
scenes drip with evil and sex which is one of the aspects that made me a bit
uneasy. Sex, voodoo and Asian ways are connected with the Devil throughout the
film equating them through guilt by association. Of course The Archfiend as a
lawyer is an easy metaphor, as unfair as it might be.
Although Reeves can't hold a candle to Pacino, he doesn't come off badly. In
fact, this may be the first film that he demonstrates any acting ability. It
must be that proverbial cold day down below.
[This appeared in the 11/20/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana]

Title
Review for Face/Off (1997)
Nicolas Cage is on an action film roll. Following the dynamic but flawed
Con Air by just a few weeks, "Face/Off" pulls out all the stops for over
two hours of non-stop intensity. Director John Woo ("Broken Arrow" and many
Hong Kong high-action films) doesn't give the audience a minute to catch their breath.
FBI agent Sean Archer (John Travolta) has spent years of his career hunting
Castor Troy (Cage) after the criminal accidentally killed Archer's young son
while attempting to kill the agent. In a blinding episode of a blaze of
bullets, an airplane crash and more blood than you'd see in an ER; the
criminal is captured and in a coma. It's time for celebration, or so they think.
It turns out that there's a megabomb hidden somewhere and the only person who
know its location is Troy's psychotic brother Pollux (Alessandro Nivola). In
order to get the information, Archer undergoes a science-fictiony transplant
of Troy's face.
While the lawman is in a secret high security prison as Troy, the real
criminal mastermind awakens from his coma literally faceless. Finding Archer's
face floating in a jar, he forces the surgeon to attach it to him and then
burns the lab and everyone who knows about the operation. This leaves no
evidence as to who's actually who.
Archer (now Cage) is stuck in lock-up while Troy (now Travolta) is taking his
place in his job and at his home with his wife (Joan Allen). When the
agent-who-looks-like-the-criminal inevitably breaks out, he becomes the
desperado with his cronies and his babe-with-a-gun (Gina Gershon).
It is to Woo's credit that the movie is as easy to follow as it is. The two
actors are also responsible for masterful work. Not only does each have to
play his character, he has to play his character playing the other man. Even
more difficult, each has to imitate the other actor. Cage and Travolta are
both wonders at this, but it is Travolta who has the meatier role. With
Archer's face, he is the FBI agent but with Troy's personality, even capturing
some of Cage's acting quirks. When he no longer has to masquerade as Archer,
but still with his face, Travolta's sneers and whoops are a delight.
Although movies of this genre very rarely pick up Oscars, Travolta certainly
deserves one. In a difficult role, the former sweathog gets a chance to strut
his stuff.
Climbing into each other's life is a study in shadows for the two men. Troy is
obviously touched at the graveside of Archer's son. Archer becomes attached to
Troy's young son. Each man is the shadow of the other: they are more alike
than they would want to admit. In one scene, wearing each other's likeness
they stand on opposite sides of a mirror aiming their guns at themselves but
as images of their enemies. If not for the other, they would only be half a person.
Woo's signature style is in full bloom. Blood splatters everywhere, bodies
fall like flies, Troy is blown down a tunnel by a jet engine, Archer escapes
from a police copter by diving hundreds of feet into the ocean. There are more
bullets in this film than are fired in a major military battle. Oddly enough
for two men who live by the gun, thousands of shots fired at each other fail
to find their targets.
"Face/Off" looks to be the best action this summer. There may be 
better films, but it's difficult to imagine any more thrilling.
[This appeared in the 7/3/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Time to Kill, A (1996)
Strongly reminiscent of "To Kill A Mockingbird", this is an incongruent
combination of riveting performances, a controversial topic, compelling
tear-jerking, one dimensional characters and overly simplistic political
statements. The film is based on John Grisman's first novel, and feels
much like the rest of his books turned films ("The Firm", "Pelican
Brief", "The Client").
A young black girl is brutally raped, beaten and left for dead by two
southern rednecks. Arrested and lead through the courthouse, they are
gunned down by the girl's father, Carl Lee Hailey (Samuel L. Jackson)
who has learned they would probably be released in less than 10 years
because she is black and they are white.  The remainder of the
two-and-a-half hour film features his trial and the question of whether
a black man can get a fair trial in Mississippi with an all-white jury.
Hailey's white lawyer Jake Brigance is played by Matthew McConaughey,
Hollywood's latest instant star and the focus of the film. In a twist,
this particular golden boy's hype is justified and he is one of the high
points of the movie. Aided by his alcoholic mentor (Donald Sutherland),
sleazy buddy (Oliver Platt) and sexy plucky northern legal aide (Sandra
Bullock); Brigance sets out to find a way out of what looks like a
no-win situation.
The film addresses heavy questions concerning racism in a bizarre mix of
some very human situations and a few cartoonish scenes. Jackson gives a
great performance in his talks with McConaughey concerning his view of
black and white relations. Contrast this with the caricature of the
self-serving NAACP representatives and the cinematic short-cut of white
racism as evidenced by the KKK, both of which are peopled by cardboard
characters.
The acting and casting are also a mixed bag. Jackson and McConaughey are
notable in their roles. Bullock, a personal unfavorite, turns in one of
her better performances (faint praise indeed), but for a strong female
role, she is sure dressed as if she=B9s fulfilling the babe role. It=B9s
entertaining to see Donald Sutherland on one side and son Keifer on the
other, but they are both one-note characters. Sutherland The Younger is
a KKK member in yet another of his (surprise!) psycho roles.
Platt has a fascinating screen presence and could have contributed much
to the film, but is casted in a throwaway role. There are far too many
characters who clutter up the story and could have been dropped from the
movie without affecting the story at all.
The strong acting makes up for the film's flaws, but leaves you
wondering how it would have worked if the rest of the elements had
measured up.
[This appeared in "The Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana,
8/15/96. Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Man on the Moon (1999)
The greatest and most important piece of art that any artist can produce is
his or her life. There is no single painting, song, book or poem that can
compare to the journey one makes and the body of work that is evidence of it.
The truths discovered along the path, the path as a whole: these are the
destiny of an artist. The products they leave behind are merely artifacts
through which we might be able to glimpse what they have found.
Andy Kaufman's lifework was indeed his life. Sometimes his performances were
wondrous inventions from outside anything the audience would expect.
Occasionally they were hilarious. And of course, as with anyone doing
something new, they sometimes didn't work at all.
Let me get my prejudices out up front. I belong to the school that thinks
Kaufman was a genius. Although billed as a comedian, he actually was a
performance artist and delighted in screwing with our minds. More power to him.
I also recognize that much of the public just didn't `get it'. When a
supposedly funny man walked on stage, they wanted jokes. Kaufman didn't tell
jokes. As he admitted, he didn't even know what was funny.
The film is more of a series of episodes from his life than it is a story. We
get to see re-enactments of his "Taxi" years (complete with the original
cast), the "Saturday Night Live" shows, appearances with David Letterman and
the infamous wrestling bits.
Many of these pieces are uncanny. If you remember the Letterman shows, the
film seems as you are there, albeit Dave looks a little older. The behind the
scenes look at "Taxi" are worth the price of admission. Christopher Lloyd's
expressions are priceless.
Kaufman (played with an amazing accuracy by Jim Carrey) is best known for his
Latka character on "Taxi", which although a high point of the series is the
least of his creations. At the time, it didn't make much sense that the same
person performing on-the-edge pieces would be involved in a sit-com. The film
makes it clear. It was a means to an end. Latka made him popular enough that
he could do the work he wanted.
Although there are some insights mixed in with the looks at his career, the
film falls as flat as some of Kaufman's less successful performances. We see
what Andy did, but rarely get any idea of why he did it.
We never meet the real Andy Kaufman. We're shown the comedian, the wrestler
and the artist but we don't get many clues as to what made him tick. In some
ways this is consistent with his life. He kept us guessing then and the movie
keeps us guessing now.
His girlfriend  Lynn (Courtney Love) tells him there is `no real you'. It's a
great line and certainly describes his public persona, but without knowing
more about who he was, the film doesn't hold together.
The two scenes where we do see something of the real are the best in the film.
When he announces to his friends and family he has lung cancer, they think
it's another stunt. Later he visits a psychic surgeon in the Caribbean and is
amazed to find a kindred soul.
Carrey is remarkable in his portrayal. He has all of Kaufman's nuances. He
even looks like him. At times you will forget that it's Carrey on the screen.
His career has had an odd run from the hilarious but little-known Duck
Factory television series to far too many insipid films to this one. With
his last couple of movies, we are beginning to see his true talents. Perhaps
Jim Carrey is now popular enough that he can do what he wants.
I walked into the theater wanting to love this film. But I didn't. It could
have been a great movie, but director Milos Forman only gives us the tip of
the iceberg.
There is a few-minute prologue at the beginning that is perfectly
Kaufmanesque. If that piecea had been followed by 90 minutes of white screen,
it would have been grand. No one would have ever gone to see it, but it would
have been the real Andy Kaufman.
(Michael Redman has written this column for more years than some of you have
been alive. He's looking forward to the new millennium. In about a year.
Redman@indepen.com seems to be a functional entity once more.)
[This appeared in the 12/30/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
This week's Y2K article: http://www.indepen.com/
Y2K archives: http://www.indepen.com/y2k.html

Title
Review for Playing God (1997)
One would think that David Duchovny, star of the cult favorite "X-Files"
would be very careful in choosing his leading man cinema roles. At least one
would hope so. One would be seriously incorrect.
Eugene Sands (Duchovny) is a surgeon so dedicated to his craft that he
becomes addicted to amphetamines to stay awake and work more. It turns out to
be a bad plan when he loses a patient and his license while under the influence.
Ten months later, in a seedy bar to score synthetic heroin, the doctor gets a
chance to ply his trade when assassins gun down a customer. Using a plastic
water bottle and bar tubing, Sands operates and saves his life. Smalltime
hoodlum Raymond Blossom (Timothy Hutton) is impressed with the cutlery skills
on his associate. He kidnaps and then offers down-and-out Eugene a position in
his organization.
Blossom needs a doctor to patch up gunshot victims that would be problematic
at a hospital. Sand's temptation is that this will give him a chance to
practice medicine again albeit illegally, big chunks of cash to fuel his habit
and close proximity to the gangster's womanfriend Claire (Angelina Jolie),
this film's babe factor.
The would-be big time operator is desperately in need of help. On the run
from Russian mobsters (the bad guys that seem to be all the rage in this
year's films) and trying to cut a pirate software deal with the Chinese Mafia,
Blossom is surrounded by blood.
After a few medical misadventures, the physician grows disenchanted with his
employment. An encounter with a couple of psycho surfer dudes who threaten to
blow him away unless he "fixes" their dead buddy cements his feeling that he
is in the wrong line of work. When the FBI visits and forces him to become an
informant, there is no question that he needs to be somewhere else.
Oddly enough, these seem like they could be exciting scenes. The film
disproves that assumption.
Then a bunch of other uninteresting things happen. Writing this only two days
after seeing the film, its a struggle to remember the events. You can take
that as a solid lack of recommendation.
For all the coolness that Duchovny exhibits in "X-Files", it's a surprise
that his big screen presence is so lacking in charisma. The doctor is
particularly bland and dull. Even the cold turkey bit which is rife with
dramatic possibilities come across as banal. A little chocolate and minor
sweats get him through heroin withdrawal. Like virtually everything else in
the film, it's a missed opportunity. The Fox Mulder detachment doesn't work here.
Oscar-winner Hutton's manic mobster is much more difficult to get a handle
on. Played partially for comedy and partially as crazed killer, Blossom almost
becomes real, but then sinks into goofiness. Most of the time Hutton looks as
if he's searching for his character and coming up empty.
Jolie also makes a few false moves towards creating a three-dimensional human
being before giving up and turning into scenery. The most interesting aspect
of her performance is watching her pouty lips threaten to take over the screen.
The rest aren't any better. Michael Massee's eccentric FBI agent never revs
up. One of Blossom's henchmen steals a few moments of the show as a quirky
gunman reminiscent of Val Kilmer's Doc Holliday in "Tombstone". His
two-gunned blasting as he does a bizarre dance is the high point of the film.
But that 15 seconds isn't worth sitting through the other 90 minutes.
First time film director Andy Wilson (known for his work on the British
television series "Cracker") appears to be attempting to jump on the
"Pulp Fiction" bandwagon. The best of these movies combine a sense of
style and flash with significant substance. The second-rate ones concentrate
on just one of these aspects. "Playing God" does neither well.
The basic idea of the film is solid. And then it goes nowhere. Even worse, it
plods back and forth, up and down a long and winding road before it ends up
nowhere. Fox fails yet again in his search for intelligent life.
(After over 22 years of writing this column, Michael Redman is still shocked
when good actors and a sound premise combine to create a wretched film. You'd
think he'd learn. Lesson plans can be sent to mredman@bvoice.com )
[This appeared in the 10/23/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Postman, The (1997)
THE POSTMAN DELIVERS BUT NOT FIRST CLASS
[Warning: My opinion of this film is definitely in the minority of reviewers
perhaps because it hits so many of my cinematic buttons: post-apocalypse
stories, hope in a desperate situation, grassroots uprisings and Kevin
Costner. Even worse, I thought that "Waterworld" was watchable. Read the
following with those particular grains of salt.]
It's the year 2013 and things have fallen apart. Due to a world war in the
late nineties, the resulting three-year winter and a devastating plague, life
in the former United States has been reduced to isolated primitive fiefdoms. 
Although this is the future, it looks like a western. As the film opens, Kevin
Costner (his character's name is never revealed) is wandering the Utah
wastelands with only his mule Bill for company.
Giving extraordinarily bad Shakespearean performances in exchange for food and
lodging, Costner is an outsider in a land of outsiders. Running into even
worse luck, he is forcibly conscripted into the racially pure Holnist army of
General Bethlehem (Will Patton). The rag-tag retro-futuristic cavalry is the
descendent of militia groups and is even called the "clan"
After a brutal boot camp, he (and you can see this coming a mile away)
escapes. Taking shelter in a wrecked Postal truck, he liberates the uniform
and mail bag from the skeleton in the cab who no longer has a use for either.
Once he reaches Oregon, land of beautiful women, bright youngsters and rock
and roll; he pretends to be a representative from the "Restored Congress Of
The United States of America".
This scam gets him inside the walled towns where the promise of mail delivery
renews optimism in the hearts of the inhabitants. Food and other opportunities
come his way in the form of spirited Abby (Olivia Williams) who wants him to
father a child because her husband is sterile. Shortly her husband is killed
by Bethlehem and she and The Postman (as Costner is referred to for the rest
of the film) become a reluctant item.
Although The Postman knows he's running a fraud, the concept of renewed
communications sets the kids' imagination afire (especially Ford Lincoln
Mercury (Larenz Tate), his second-in-command) and they form a new Pony Express
dedicated to getting the mail through. The revived Postal Service doubles as
an army to fight the Holnists' tyranny. The Postman has become a symbol for
hope in a Rube Goldberg manner.
Although the movie appeals to my sensibilities, there are so many things wrong
with it that they can hardly be counted. It's derivitive of Costner's own
"Waterworld" and Clint Eastwood westerns. There's little here that we haven't
seen dozens of times before.
The film is often down-right corny. A scene where The Postman is on horseback
and grabs a letter from the hands of a bright-eyed child is embarrassing in
its slow-motion banality. The film's final few minutes should have been left
on the cutting room floor.
Despite the film's excessive three hour length, several things are never
explained. What was the war about? How did civilization change so rapidly?
Everyone has horses: where did all they come from? The "Law Of Eights" that
Bethlehem lives by seems to have its origins somewhere beyond the film, but
where? Are we to believe that the rest of the world is in the same shape and
hasn't made their way west to help or conquer?
There is some jumbled symbolism here that doesn't appear to make sense. The
tale is obviously saying that communication can defeat evil in much the same
way that the internet has the potential to topple governments, but beyond that
there are some oddities. 
The evil army is called "Holnists" which sounds coincidentally like the New
Age "Holism", but why? Is it another coincidence that it takes place in 2013,
just one year after many ancient prophesies (including the ending of the Mayan
calendar) predict a new world for mankind? Why is the general named
"Bethlehem"? There seems to be some reason for that, but what?
Sometimes the movie feels like a joke. An army of Postal workers armed with
guns? Considering the headlines of recent years, it takes a tremendous leap of
faith to cheer for these guys. 
It's even more difficult to accept those re-powering the federal government as
the heroes. Given the current climate of the country and the distrust of big
government, it's asking a lot for the audience to get behind the film's nationalism.
Even with its numerous flaws,  the movie all comes together, if only for those
who have the same weaknesses that I have. It's doubtful that "The Postman" is
going to find much of an audience, but a few of us are going to have a good
time. Besides we're all awaiting the fall of civilization caused by the Year
2000 millennium computer bug.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 22 years and would like to
announce that the "Michael Redman" arrested near Indianapolis last week for
accepting an illicit package from Federal Express is, to the best of his
knowledge, not him. Perhaps this similarly-named person should have used Kevin
Costner's Postal Service.)
[This appeared in the 12/30/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Wonder Boys (2000)
For many people, procrastination isn't a problem to overcome, it's a
high art. We'll do just about anything to put off a task. When the
deadline for this column nears, it's the only time during the week 
dishes get washed and the bed made and laundry done and plants watered and...
Eventually, hopefully, sometimes, there's a breakthrough and we actually
get down to work. Amazingly it's almost always easier than we dreaded
and after finishing, that sense of oppressive apprehension melts away.
And then, the next time, we do it all again.
English professor Grady Tripp (Michael Douglas) is a master. Seven years
ago, his first book was a hit. He's been working on his second -- a
short 200-page piece -- since then. Fearful that he can't live up to the
first, he can't bring himself to finish it. No writer's block, he's
nearing 3,000 pages with no end in sight.
Now he's having a particularly difficult day. The college's annual
writers conference is bringing in accomplished novelists reminding Tripp
that other people are finishing _their_ books. During the first day, his
wife has left him, his married girlfriend informs him she's pregnant and
his agent is in town with a six-foot transvestite in tow.
By the evening, our besieged writer is driving though the snow-covered
streets of Pittsburgh with a suicidal student beside him, a stolen
jacket that Marilyn Monroe wore on her wedding day in the back seat and
a murdered blind dog stuffed in the trunk. This could be a pivotal point
in his mid-life crisis.
There's a lot to like about this movie. There are no huge explosions,
shattering glass or computer-generated dinosaurs to distract from the
very real human issues. Grady is caught up in the curse of people who
accomplish great things early in their career. In the world of "what
have you done for me lately?", he knows his second book has to be better
than his first. Instead of finding out, he drifts, comfortable in the
insular cocoon of academic Peter Panhood.
He doesn't have much of a life and neither does his star pupil James
Leer (Tobey Maguire). James may be suicidal and psychotic. Certainly
everything that comes out of his mouth is a lie. He makes up a past of
working clash anguish because the truth of wealth and comfort just isn't
interesting enough.
As the weekend progresses, they are both forced to fully engage life.
That's the question they must face: comfort or real experiences?
The film takes some interesting chances. Non-traditional relationships
are presented as matter-of-fact. Extra-marital, gay, interracial,
professor-student: here they aren't judged, merely choices.
The actors are all first-rate. Douglas triumphs, playing against type as
he spends most of his time disheveled, unshaven and clad in a pink
women's house robe. Maguire's disengaged alienation works perfectly
here. Robert Downey Jr. as Grady's agent livens up his scenes.
Director Curtis Hanson ("L.A. Confidential") makes a few missteps. The
women are underused. Frances McDormand does a good job of her limited
role of Sara, Grady's married lover but we never understand much of who
she is. The chemistry between the two of them is non-existent which
makes some of the ending unconvincing.
Katie Holmes is a student with a major crush on the professor, but her
character goes nowhere. We never even see Grady's exiting wife.
This is very much a guy's film. The varied relationships between the men
are much more convincing than any of the others. Grady's alternating
mentoring and rejection of James is the centerpoint of the film, not him
and Sara.
As the boomers age, expect to see more mid-life crisis films to catch
the attention of that demographic. Eventually it'll probably become
cliche, but right now we've got a winner.
I'll finish this in a second. Right now I have to grab some paint. I
noticed some trim in the other room that needs a little touch-up.
(Michael Redman has written this column for so long that he's made
mid-life crisis a career choice.)
[This appeared in the 3/2/2000 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bluemarble.net.]
-- 
mailto:redman@bluemarble.net
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Psycho (1998)
Of all the questions that have puzzled mankind over the years, "Why?" is the
most difficult to answer. Philosophers struggle with the Why of human
existence. For journalists the rest of the big "W"s are simple compared to
that one.
Newspaper articles ask "Why did Bill Clinton act like a 16-year old kid in
heat instead of being a little more careful?" Your young daughter questions
"Why did God let my kitten die?" Your lover wants to know "Why do you have to
be the way you are?"
In many situations there are no real answers or at least none that we can ever
know. Van Morrison's studied response is "It ain't why, why, why, why, why. It
just is." When asked why he chose to redo "Psycho", director Gus Van Sant
paraphrases the great philosophical jeans commercial: "Why ask why?"
He also explains that he'd like to bring the great Hitchcock film to a new
generation of audiences that have never seen it. He wants to introduce color
to the classic. None of these reasons wash.
Re-issuing the original on the big screen would allow new viewers to see the
film...it seems to have worked for The Wizard Of Oz. If the first
version had been destroyed, this might make more sense, but it's still around
and it's still a great film. Color would be a good excuse if it added anything
to the movie. It doesn't.
"Psycho" is one of those films that have become a part of modern western
mythology. Nearly everyone knows the story. When someone stabs the air with a
clinched fist accompanied by screeching noises, you get the reference. Years
ago, explaining a trip to Madison, Wisconsin, I mentioned to friends that I'd
spent a night in the Bates Motel. They all understood.
In case there's anyone who isn't familiar with the plot, here's the "Reader's
Digest" version. Marion Crane (Anne Heche) steals a ton of money from her
boss. Making a poor choice in lodging, she checks into a motel run by Norman
Bates (Vince Vaughn) who has a very odd relationship with his mother. After
she disappears, her boyfriend and sister come looking for her.
Touted as a shot-by-shot recreation of the original, it's really not. Camera
angles are different. The script has been slightly re-written by original
screenwriter Joseph Stefano. Although Van Sant has done a credible job of
maintaining Hitchcock's scenes, he loses the spirit. The film is lifeless.
There are two primary audiences for this film. Those that have seen the
original and want to compare the two and those that have never viewed the
first one and are seeing the story for the first time. It doesn't work very
well for either.
Even for teenagers who haven't experienced the 1960's version, most know about
the shower scene and Norman's mom. These work most effectively as surprises.
After untold slasher films, the killings here aren't as terrifying as they
were 40 years ago.
The story hasn't been updated enough to provide much entertainment for people
who want a new version. The few new items don't add much. Norman indulges in a
very personal activity while watching Marion disrobe through his peep hole.
The shower scene is a bit more revealing. There are a few lines of dialog that
Hitchcock wanted and weren't in the original but they're minimal.
Some scenes don't make sense. A couple extremely short hallucinations occur
during a killing. So brief that they are difficult to catch -- maybe a
semi-clad woman on a couch, some animal in a fog perhaps on train tracks --
they feel tossed in for no reason.
The bizarre combination of the sixties and nineties is distracting. Private
detective Milton Arbogast (William H. Macy) is well-played but his dialog is
anachronistic and his suit and hat are out of some time that films have never
seen. Computers sit on a desk in an office that could have been designed in
1950. Lila (Julianne Moore), Marion's sister mentions that she has to get her
Walkman, prompting a laugh from the audience only because it is so out of place.
All of this would be minor if the film worked. But it mostly doesn't.
Everything is flat. The original shower was extraordinary. The editing in the
newer version isn't as effective and now it's just one more murder scene. 
Heche does a good job of portraying the conflicted Marion, but she often comes
across as searching for her character. Vaughn is never menacing. Viggo
Mortensen as Marion's lover occasionally appears to have taken lessons from
the Dick Tracy villain Mumbles. Moore is one exception, playing Lila as a
lively hard-edged modern woman.
I got the feeling that most of the audience was watching the movie while
replaying the original in their minds. It is almost impossible to do
otherwise. Watching for similarities and differences is fun for a while, but
it doesn't carry the entire film. After that limited entertainment value wears
off, you're just marking time until the end. If you have any doubts as to the
popularity of the Compare The Films game, try to rent a copy of the original.
Good luck finding one in stock.
The film is an academic exercise. It's like a beginning painting assignment:
re-paint Van Gogh's sunflowers brush stroke by brush stroke, but this time
make them blue. I'm sure that Van Sant learned a lot about Hitchcock during
his experience, but that doesn't make it any more interesting for the rest of us.
The film reminds me of Shakespeare's answer as to the "why" of life: "...full
of sound and fury, signifying nothing."
(Michael Redman has written this column for well over 23 years and he's
working on a painting of Mona Lisa but without the smile. Email your
suggestions of classics that need redone to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 12/10/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Opposite of Sex, The (1998)
Life is weird. The longer I'm around the more I think that statement is a
given. Even if you lead what could pass as a "normal" existence, the little
oddnesses seep in and it's inevitable that occasionally the ground disappears
completely. If you live on the edge, at times it's like being in the Twilight Zone.
On the outside Bill (Martin Donovan) is your typical high school teacher in a
small peaceful Indiana town. When he catches a student writing graffiti about
him on a restroom wall, he corrects the grammar. His eccentricity is that he
is gay. Tom, his lover died a year before, leaving him with a batch of money
and a nice house.
Bill's personal Rod Serling episode begins when his 16 year-old half-sister
DeeDee (Christina Ricci) runs away from her Louisiana home and comes to visit.
Lil sis is not a nice girl. As she explains in her introductory voice-over, "I
don't have a heart of gold and I don't grow one later."
DeeDee's first order of business is to seduce Bill's current live-in Matt
(Ivan Sergei) convincing him that not to have sex with her would be an act of
discrimination. Matt's about as bright as the average box of rocks and falls
for the line. Afterwards he announces that he's bi-sexual. Tom's sister Lucia
(Lisa Kudrow) -- pronounced "Losha" -- insists that he's mistaken, "I went to
a Bar Mitzvah once. That doesn't make me Jewish."
DeeDee says in another voice-over "things get complicated very quick," and
she's right on target. In short order she announces that she's pregnant and
Matt's the father. They steal $10,000 and Tom's ashes from her brother and
take off for LA. Matt's jilted ex-lover Jason shows up and publicly falsely
accuses Bill of molesting him when he was a student. There's a trip to Canada
with Bill trying to find Matt and Lucia chasing him and Sheriff Carl Tippett
(Lyle Lovett) chasing her. There's a killing and police involvement. Every few
minutes something new and unexpected happens.
The story is truly complicated but miraculously easy to follow.
Writer/director Don Roos has crafted a fine film with a fascinating plot and
believable albeit offbeat scenes but the strength is the characters. He has
atoned for his screenplay of the atrocious remake of "Diabolique".
Many of the characters are unlikable in the traditional sense, but the
audience learns to appreciate them dispite, or perhaps because of, their
failings. Even DeeDee, the little girl old beyond her years who uses sex and
her ample endowments as weapons, grows on you.
All of the actors fill their roles well. Ricci is exceptional. With this,
"Fear And Loathing In Las Vegas" and "Icestorm" under her belt, she has left
her "Addams Family" and "Casper" roles far behind. Surprisingly another
standout is "Friend's" Kudrow. Her sexually-repressed bitter
old-woman-before-her-time is the opposite of her television role and she has
the best lines in the film.
The film is decidedly anti-politically correct. DeeDee's observations on the
gay lifestyle are none too kind. She refers to her brother's former partner as
"Bill The Dead Guy". When her white trash former boyfriend berates her for
hanging out with "homersexuals" and turning away from the path of God, she
asks "So when I was giving you a [slang term for sexual contact illegal in
some states] in the backseat, that was the stairway to heaven?"
Sheriff Carl (who has a thing for Lucia)'s observations on sex are especially
interesting. He says that sex isn't for procreation or recreation, but rather
for concentration. When two people are together, they pay attention to only
each other. At one point he asks Lucia "What's the point of sleeping with you
if it doesn't get your attention?"
The biggest risk in the film is the voice-over. If it had failed, it would
have pulled the entire movie down with it. DeeDee's lines are smartly written
and delivered as she talks to the audience about the film. When a gun is
shown, she tells us to pay attention to it, "Duh. It's foreshadowing."
DeeDee warns that "sex always ends in kids or disease or, like, you know,
relationships. Maybe some of those are not always bad things.
(Michael Redman has written this column for, like, you know, about 23 years
and he thinks that the opposite of sex might be, like, you know, boredom.)
[This appeared in the 7/16/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Batman & Robin (1997)
(Note: Beginning in my single digit
years, I grew up with Batman in the comic book form. I survived the
goofy Batman of the late fifties and early sixties and the "pop"ular
Batman of the mid-sixties, cringed in embarrassment at the "Pow! Zap!"
Batman of the television series and finally found _my_ version in
the grim dark night avenger which reprised the original version of the
character. Having a well-defined Batman in my imagination for decades
definitely colors my view of the cinematic Batmans. You've been
warned.)
The film version of Batman has never been done right and they are
getting worse over the years. As the series of films continue, the tone
of the movies appears to draw more from the television series of 30
years ago than from the comic book. Obviously the slam-bang antics we
see on the screen draw in more thrill-seekers than would the deadly
serious vigilante.
George "I'm not a doctor, but I play one on TV" Clooney is the latest
in the never-ending series of actors to slip on the cowl and he's really
not too bad at filling in the rubber suit. He looks good: much better
than Michael Keaton who was surprisingly adequate himself and equal to
Val Kilmer. Of course, with the acting skills called upon by the role,
just about anyone could fit the role as long as he possessed the
required strong jaw.
One of the many problems with this film is that we now have a kinder
and gentler Batman. Rather than the shadowy brooding character that
supposedly populated the first three films, our hero here is a
wise-cracking Father Knows Best. Not the best persona for a champion who
chose the bat as a symbol to "strike fear into the hearts of criminals".
Chris O'Donnell returns as Robin and is the most successful at creating
a three-dimensional human being. While he began his Boy Wonder career in
the last film with unsure footing, by the middle of this one he has a
secure sense of  the sidekick.
The Batman mythos has an enormous stable of colorful and dangerous
arch-foes. It's easy to understand the filmmakers' (in this case Joe
Schumacher) temptation to showcase them. After all, with the way they
have chosen to present Batman, the bad guys are much more interesting.
Thus we come to another failing with the films. There are so many new
characters and sub-plots introduced that by the time all that happens,
there isn't much space for a movie.
Here we have Mr. Freeze, Poison Ivy, Bane, Batgirl as new characters.
Toss into the mix Alfred's deadly illness, Freeze's attempts to
resurrect his cryogenically preserved beloved wife, Ivy's
ecologist-gone-wrong crusade, Batgirl's leaving school and closet biker
babe life, Batman and Robin's bickering and half a dozen other story
elements and you get a film that is held together with a shoestring.
It's traditional to attract big names to play the Bat villains and this
movie is no exception. Arnold Schwarzenegger is a stand-out as the
frigid Mr. Freeze. With his blue flecked skin and bald head and booming
voice, Ahnold fits the role to a T.
Uma Thurman is less triumphant as Poison Ivy, the plant and snake venom
temptress with the deadly kiss. Thurman can be seductive and that is
what the role calls for, but all we get is cartoon allure. On the bright
side, she does have the best lines in the film, puns that they are.
The less said about Bane (Jeep Swenson), the better. In the comics,
Bane was presented as Batman's superior in strength and intelligence and
the only enemy to ever best the hero, breaking his back and putting him
into retirement for a year. Here he is a grunting chauffeur on steroids.
Even the animated version had more depth.
Alicia Silverstone as Batgirl is a throwaway character. Alfred's niece
who comes to stay in Wayne manor discovers the truth about the
happenings in the caves below and overnight becomes a super heroine.
Silverstone comes off as nothing more than a chubby spoiled high school
girl who always gets her own way. Oddly enough in the suiting-up scenes
with the traditional Bat close-ups on the chest, crotch and buttocks, it
is apparent that Batgirl's black suit isn't quite as anatomically
correct as are the men's. In the topsy-turvy world of Batman, men have
nipples and women don't.
As usual, the visuals are dynamic. Mr. Freeze's cold gun spreading ice
throughout Gotham is a highlight. The real star of the film continues to
be Gotham City itself. The architecture is spectacular. A city that
could exist only in Art Deco nightmares. The observatory held aloft in
the arms of an enormous statue is remarkable.
(Footnote: The direction that the Batman films have taken is probably
unstoppable. I'll never see _my_ Batman in the silver screen. In my
mind a younger Clint Eastwood is Bruce Wayne. It's not too late: the
current Eastwood would be perfect in a cinematic version of Frank
Miller's classic "The Dark Knight Returns". Only in my dreams.)
[This appeared in the 6/26/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
 Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]
-- 
mailto:mredman@bvoice.com

Title
Review for Summer of Sam (1999)
Summer is a magical time. Young children run themselves until exhausted every
day. School kids, free of the tyranny of schedules, discover what they really
want to do. Even responsible adults traditionally take time off the workaday
grind to kick back and have a real life.
In the best of all possible worlds, the season is a time of possibilities.
Hours reading a novel on the front porch swing seem well-spent. Days in the
woods away from the constant electronic hum of civilization are invigorating.
The opposite sexes in their abbreviated warm weather wardrobe are so...err, fetching.
And like almost everything, summer has its darker side. The sweltering heat
and humidity can be oppressive. On a bad day, everything feels dirty and
grimy. Tempers flare.
In 1977, New York city is having a summer of all bad days. The temperatures
are unbearable. A power blackout results in massive looting. The Son of Sam is
murdering innocent lovers and has the city frozen in fear.
For a group of Italian-Americans in the Bronx, it's a time of change. Ritchie
(Adrien Brody) returns to the neighborhood after a few months living uptown
with spiked hair and a bad British accent. Hairdresser Vinny (John Leguizamo)
struggles with his desire to be faithful to his wife Dionna (Mira Sorvino),
but repeatedly fails.
As the summer wears on and the murders mount up, paranoia takes center stage.
Women are wearing blonde wigs to throw the killer off track and everyone looks
at their neighbors with suspicion.
The guys start drawing up a list of possible suspects. The priest down the
street is a little odd. Even Reggie Jackson almost makes the list. And
Ritchie? Well, Ritchie's been acting strange since he came back and no normal
person would have hair like that.
Director Spike Lee has a talent for presenting his characters as sympathetic
even with their flaws. Vinny wants to be a good husband, but has bought into
the "whore or Madonna" view of women. He hungers for adventurous sex but can't
bring himself to approach his wife with the idea so he turns to extramarital
affairs. Dionna believes it is her fault he isn't interested in her. (In the
nineties she would have recognized that as co-dependency, the fashionable
psychological defect of the decade.)
Ritchie just wants to play rock and roll, but to buy a guitar he works as a
male prostitute. He looks like a dangerous tough guy, but underneath there's a
gentle side. When he falls in with local "bad girl" Ruby (Jennifer Esposito),
there's genuine affection. During their first time together, she starts to
perform a particularly intimate act on him and he tells her it's not necessary
- they can just spend time together.
At the core of the film is the relationship between Ritchie and Vinny. Friends
since childhood, their camaraderie takes some twists and turns during the long
hot summer, culminating in a Biblical allegory.
Lee has some touches of genius. During the beating of an innocent victim, the
participants discover their error and slowly drift away mostly wordless. It
seems so _real_. His use of varied film stock works to pull us right in. He
has the seventies down, from discos to Plato's Retreat.
But he falters occasionally. Other than the main four, the characters aren't
very well developed and sometimes slip into cliche. When Lee appears in a bit
part as a television reporter, we are pulled out of the film as we recognize him.
The director's biggest risk is showing David Berkowitz (Son of Sam). Although
those scenes are effective in themselves, the film would have worked better if
we had seen only the results of his actions, not him.
There's something undeniably authentic about this film and, considering the
events of the past weeks, hits a little too close to home for comfort.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and would like to
commend the family of Won-Joon Yoon and the Korean Methodist Church for a
subtle yet courageous demonstration of the unity of all people in their
full-page thank-you announcement in the "Herald Times". The message closed
with a quote from Starhawk, a practicing Wiccan.)
[This appeared in the 7/15/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Patch Adams (1998)
Poster boy for co-dependency needs patching
Mediocrity is a pox on civilization. In our heavily consumer oriented society,
there is an enormous demand to churn out "stuff." What would happen to our
economy if we didn't feel the need to have more things? To make us buy more,
businesses need to produce a ton of product. The sheer volume of items
necessitates that most of them are of dubious quality.
The film industry is like any other. In order for studios to survive, they
have to make money. The prevailing attitude is that more films equal more
profit. 
Some movies obviously exist only to put wares on the screen and to do that,
less talented people are used. There aren't enough great directors and actors
to create the number of films necessary. For some reason, it's never crossed
anyone's mind that the real equation is quality films = more profit.
Often, mediocre films are more of a pain for the audience than the horrendous
ones. At you can have a good time making fun of bad movies.
I'm not suggesting that "Patch Adams" was tossed out just to rake in the
bucks. My guess is that someone was asleep at the wheel. It features an
accomplished actor and a potentially engrossing story, but it's as dull as
could be.
Hunter "Patch" Adams' (Robin Williams) desire to become a doctor has an
unusual genesis. Checking himself into a mental institute after a suicide
attempt, he discovers that he can help the other patients by clowning around. 
Patch could be a poster boy for co-dependency. He explains that he likes
devoting himself to others because then he doesn't focus on his own problems.
He decides that he wants to be a physician, leaves the place and a couple of
years later enrolls in the Medical College of Virginia.
As a med student, Patch's antics at the school's hospital catch the attention
of his soon to be arch-enemy, straight-laced Dean Walcott (Bob Gunton). The
dean is so opposed to the goofiness that he wants Patch kicked out of school
although he's one of the top students. He writes in Patch's academic file that
he shows "excessive happiness."
I walked into the film knowing little about its history and wondered about its
odd mechanical pacing. There also seemed to be no reason that it is set in the
early seventies. Then it struck me. It must be based on a true story. The
movie is an adaptation of a book by Hunter Adams who founded the Gesundheit
Institute, a free clinic.
Robin Williams is an amazing actor. While he is adept at dramatic roles, his
forte is over-the-top free spirits. That's what makes his failure here so
remarkable. Patch is exactly the character he should be best at, yet even the
scene where he and another mental patient are battling fierce imaginary
squirrels falls flat. Something holds him back.
Most of the rest of the cast is two-dimensional. For a film that champions
seeing patients as human beings, it's curious that the ones here are cardboard
characters. Peter Coyote as a man dying of cancer is refreshing because he
seems like a real person. Unfortunately he's in the film for only about two minutes.
The audience is blatantly lead by a ring in its nose from scene to scene.
We're not left to our own emotional decisions: we're hit over the head with
them. Shaved-headed children with cancer, an elderly woman whom Patch makes
laugh, a beautiful woman  who can't love because of her abusive history. When
a group of students fix up an old house to use as a clinic in the Andy Hardy
"Hey, let's put on a play! We can use the barn and my mom can make the
curtains!" mode, they laugh and roll around while painting each other.
There might as well be giant signs flashing: "Feel good now!" "Feel bad now!"
"Patch" is a good title for the film. It is a patchwork of every manipulative
scene you can think of. The full-of-life student fights stodgy establishment
types. There's a touching death. Then there's another. The film doesn't trust
us to get it the first time. The dean tries to kick Patch out and later he
tries again.
Worst of all is the final courtroom bit. Scary-looking old men sit in judgment
of a man who only wants to help people. The room is packed with Patch's
supporters. Williams makes a supposedly impassioned speech about the humanity
of all. It has as much emotion as his earlier statement "humans are the only
animal that kills members of its own species" contains truth.
Most of the blame must be placed with the director Tom Shadyac and
screenwriter Steve Oedekerk. Shadyac also directed the first "Ace Ventura"
movie. Oedekerk directed the second one. Need I say more?
The real Adams is to be admired for his devotion to treating patients as
people rather than diseases. The film has a number of worthy messages about
the state of the modern medical business with HMOs and managed care. The
"doctors are not gods" theme will resonate with a number of people, but it's
so poorly produced that no one will care.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years. After being
inundated with Y2K information, he thinks that Kevin Costner's "The Postman"
might have found a bigger audience had it been released late this year.
Redman@indepen.com will reach him...probably.)
[This appeared in the 1/8/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Jakob the Liar (1999)
Sometimes I think that our entire culture is dependent on illusions to
continue functioning. We have commonly held sets of beliefs that exist to
benefit the society but we are convinced they serve the individual.
Working an unfulfilling job all your life so you can pay the mortgage and
retire for five years before you die is a good thing. Security will make you
happy. It's the big lie that most of us buy into. It's a necessary mass
hallucination. Otherwise where would we find people willing to march off each
morning to spend their day in drudgery so we can increase the gross national product?
Most of our time is spent in the illusions we tell ourselves. We need them to
continue. Everything's going to work out fine. If we work hard at something,
we'll succeed. Smoke and mirrors.
Films are definitely illusion. We sit in a dark room and pretend for a while
what's happening in flickering images on a huge white wall is real.
Occasionally it's enlightening. Sometimes, entertaining. But it's never life.
Rather, it's the illusion of life to give us a brief respite from the
illusions of life.
Jakob (Robin Williams) finds himself in the illusion business. Held prisoner
in a walled-off Jewish ghetto in Poland near the end of World War II, he tells
his fellow inmates news from the outside. His stories are lies, but they fill
the community with hope.
As with any good fabrication, they contain an element of truth. During a
chance visit to a Gestapo office, he hears a news broadcast. The Russians are
pushing the Nazi troops back and are only 400 kilometers from the city.
When he tells a friend, the news spreads like wildfire throughout the ghetto.
In the true form of gossip, the story is embellished. Everyone believes Jakob
has a secret radio, an act punishable by death. He sees the effect of the good
news on morale and continues to relay news, but now it's all made up.
It works. The lies create faith. There are no more suicides because rescue is
just around the corner.
Some aspects of the film are well-crafted. The desperation of the people is
apparent as they are subjected to the cruelty of slave labor, starvation,
public  hangings and isolation. The cinematography is claustrophobic and you
feel the limited existence in the ghetto.
As real as some of the film is, it is never engaging. The horrors of the
Holocaust are there, but the story is not.
In order for illusion to work, it has to be invisible. By their nature, movies
are manipulative. Everything you see is designed to make you feel or believe
something. The best films do it without the audience even noticing. Unseen
smoke and mirrors.
When you see the emotional trickery, it doesn't work. That's the problem here.
During the opening credits, Jakob is running down the street chasing a page
from a newspaper blowing in the wind. But not only isn't it real, it doesn't
even look real. The paper isn't being blown by the wind, it's pulled by an
unseen cinematic string -- or it's stuck on the screen by a computer.
And it continues. We can see the artifice. An about-to-be-orphaned little girl
escapes a prisoner train as it moves through town and Jakob takes her in. The
doe-eyed child is convincing as a real person, but never explored. Her primary
function is to remind us that children suffer and we should feel sympathy.
It's too blatant to be effective.
It almost goes without saying that Williams turns in an outstanding
performance. Even in his less satisfying films, he's at least adequate. In the
better ones, he's remarkable.
Somehow his role feels like a betrayal. There are any number of actors that
could have done this role as well as he does. But there is only one Robin
Williams and what he can do is unique and wonderful. He doesn't do it here.
Although we don't need to blindly accept all the lies around us, some of our
illusions serve us well and allow us to continue. The ones we pay money for
should be more convincing.
(Michael Redman has been writing this column for a very long time. His
illusion is that he doesn't have any. Email your lies to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 9/30/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
This week's Y2K article: http://www.indepen.com/
Y2K archives: http://www.indepen.com/y2k.html

Title
Review for Executive Decision (1996)
The two faces that have been displayed in order to push this film are those
of Steven Seagal and Kurt Russell. This seems an unlikely combination.
Seagal's films have been in the vein of Schwarzenegger and Stallone: mostly
shoot-em-ups with little plot. Russell has done his share of the hyphenated
action-adventure genre, but usually lighter with more story.
The best news for me is that Seagal is not in this film. Well, he does have
about three minutes of screen time before he gets literally blown away. This
leaves terrorist intelligence expert Russell, a nervous design engineer, a
paralized bomb specialist and a couple of military commandos to save the day.
The second in command of an Arab terrorist group hijacks a 747 supposedly to
free his leader, recently kidnapped and in US custody. In fact he has a
grander plan to deliver Allah's lightning to the heart of Satan. The only
thing that stands between us and the destruction of the eastern seaboard is a
futuristic plan.
Seagal heads a unit that attaches an experimental plane remora-like to the
jet and plan to board it, wipe out the hijackers and live happily ever after.
Due to an unexpected development; Seagal and half of their equipment and team
never make it on board. In their place, Russell and Oliver Platt (the
engineer) accidentally end up on the airliner.
The plot is old (didn't Bruce Willis do this just a year or so ago?), but the
story, refreshingly new. While there are the expected big guns scenes, you'll
see more planning and computer work. With Seagal out of the tale, it becomes a
team effort rather than a one-man show. All the better.
With a few exceptions, the acting is first rate especially from Russell and
Platt. The action is energized due, no doubt, to direction from Stuart Baird,
editor on "Lethal Weapon" and "Die Hard 2". Same ole, but with a new lively
new slant.
[This appeared in the 3/21/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Stepmom (1998)
Once upon a time, back probably sometime before the invention of the wheel,
the way it worked was that a man and woman married, had children, stayed
together until one died and then maybe the survivor remarried. For those
too young to remember this prehistoric era, these were called nuclear families.
Then the nuclear family melted down. For a number of reasons -- lifespans
increased, life became easier and a "work partner" was less important,
expectations of remaining in love heightened, family members went their
separate ways during each day and grew apart -- divorce rates soared. The old
style family complete with the original mother and father is a rarity.
Now we have relationship units that would have been seen as oddities a few
decades ago. The most common of these are situations where children have "new"
mommies and daddies and "old" mommies and daddies. Just because this is
widespread doesn't mean it's easy. Although it's been going on for years,
people are still trying to figure out how it works.
Luke (Ed Harris), father of two children, has a new girlfriend, Isabel (Julia
Roberts). This doesn't sit well with his ex-wife Jackie (Susan Sarandon). Not
only is Isabel much younger, gorgeous and a fashion photographer, but she's
attempting to form a parental relationship with Jackie's kids.
The kids, Anna (Jena Malone) and Ben (Liam Aiken), don't take very well to the
new situation either. Anna tells her teacher that her parents are getting back
together. Ben promises his mom "I'll hate her if you want me to," and creates
a magic potion to cause Isabel to sleep for 1,000 years. Jackie actively
sabotages Isabel's efforts to bond even to the point of refusing to allow her
to take Anna to a rock concert and then taking her, herself.
The parents have important news for each other. Luke is going to ask Isabel to
marry him. Jackie has cancer and may be dying. The combination of these two
announcements changes the dynamics of the various relationships. Isabel
officially becomes a part of the family and Jackie wants to put everything in order.
Even with these motivations the two women bump heads over just about
everything. When Anna has problems with her junior high school boyfriend, the
mothers give opposite advice. Every time the women are together, sparks fly.
The movie begins at a snail's pace and takes a long time to reach speed.
Although it's important to take time to establish situations and characters,
the first half creeps by. By the latter half the story reaches its pace and
pulls you in. There are some truly well-done bits towards the end but it takes
a while to get there.
Director Chris Columbus attempts to create a film that touches the audience
and it works on some levels. Unfortunately many scenes come across as
manipulative rather than real. The old Motown songs sound great but they've
become a cliched cinematic shortcut. Movies where one of the main characters
has a fatal illness are often cop-outs for the more difficult task of
demonstrating real emotions. What if Jackie and Isabel had to co-parent
without the easy plot solution of cancer?
Although the film's focus is on the women, more screen time for Luke would
have made for a fuller look at the family. We don't know much about him other
than he seems to be a nice guy and cares about his children and the women. Oh
yeah, he is obviously very successful at whatever it is he does. He pays for a
spacious city apartment for him and Isabel and a luxurious country house for
Jackie and supports both women when neither works. He's also gone a lot, both
from the family and the movie.
Both women turn in top notch jobs. Sarandon is has a history of fine
performances and is one of the several actresses who have been casted as
sensual older women in recent years. As the baby boomers age, so do their film
stars. Fortunately now they continue to get juicy roles. Roberts has shown
that she is capable of doing good work and she does so here.
Harris has a warm presence and comes across as a real person with what little
time he has.
The kids are a mixed bag. Malone seems like a real person but rarely exhibits
more than sadness or anger. Aiken is the proverbial cute as a button, stealing
every scene that he's in. He looks like a living Japanese anime cartoon
character and is difficult to resist. It's too bad that he is about as
three-dimensional as those cartoons. Ben's extreme cuteness provides comic
relief but detracts from the authenticity of the film.
Some aspects of the movie are very effective. Isabel and Jackie's evolving
relationship feels authentic. It doesn't progress in the stereotypical linear
fashion that we see in less accomplished films. They dislike each other, grow
a little closer, backslide and then get closer again. Something like real life.
There is some unexpected dialog. When Luke finds out that Jackie has cancer,
he gives her the all-too-common line, "It should have been me instead of you."
But then she nods in agreement.
This film gets inside you. Some of it is real and you'll cry. But after you
think about it, you'll feel guilty about responding to some of the cheaper
manipulation. It didn't have to be that way.
(Michael Redman has written this column for, oh, about 23 years or so and
wonders why the older man and younger woman combination is so popular in
Hollywood films today. Email theories to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 12/30/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Beautiful Girls (1996)
Barely scrapping by playing at a NYC piano bar, Timothy Hutton returns to his
Massachusetts hometown for a couple of weeks. On the surface, he's coming home
for a high school reunion, but since this is a movie, you know that he's
really looking for some major life decisions.
A fairly "small" film, this sports an impressive ensemble cast including Uma
Thurman, Rosie O'Donnell and a bunch of actors that you've seen before but
can't quite place. Commendable jobs all around; they seem like real people.
Hutton arrives at his past and is greeted by his spirit-dead father,
terminally goony brother and old high school chums. All of his old buddies are
engaged in the snow removal business and most are in the midst of a
relationship crisis. The perfect stuff for a comedy about people in the
twenties angst.
He meets and falls for the new next door neighbor: a beautiful intelligent
lively girl who is obviously taken with him. The problem is that she is only
13. Unconsummated (no, it's not _that_ type of movie), their relationship
builds and neither knows what to do with it. Star-crossed lovers with no where
to go.
So Hutton is gaga over a barely-teen, one of his buddies is two-timing his
girlfriend with a married old flame, another's girlfriend is sleeping with a
meat cutter ("and she's a vegetarian!"). Things are a mess.
The beautiful stranger in town for a few days is both a delight in the film
and one of its minor downfalls. Her character is fun to watch. Even more
entertaining is observing the guys falling over themselves trying to impress
her. Like the Lone Ranger, before she leaves, she solves most of the problems
and sets everyone onward with their lives. The ending is a bit too pat.
Everything is tied up with a neat little bow.
Rosie O'Donnell is a stand-out in her limited screen time with her brash
personality and "tell it like it is" pronouncements.
Structured somewhat like a "Diner, A Few Years Later", this feel-good story
is a good time, but ends a little too nice.
[This appeared in the 2/22/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Birdcage, The (1996)
This remake of "La Cage aux Folles" features a gay couple pretending to be
straight in order to pull the wool over the eyes of their son's future
in-laws. The couple (Robin Williams and Nathan Lane) are about as archetypal,
or as the less kind might put it  stereotypical, gays possible. Williams owns
a nightclub featuring drag queens where his partner performs as the featured
star. They live above the club in what could not possibly be mistaken as a
heterosexual abode.
Williams is excellent as should be no surprise. Gene Hackman as right-wing
potential father-in-law is refreshing in one of his few comedic roles. The
real star is Lane. His attempted transformation from one of the most obviously
gay men in the world to the straight-shooting uncle is hilarious.
Perhaps it is a personal failing on my part, but the crying and screaming drag
queen faux high drama just grates on my nerves and the first few minutes of
this film are filled with it. Luckily (for me at least), it doesn't last long
and the rest of the story focuses on the relationship between the men, their
son and the deception.
The question of stereotypes is a touchy one. These guys personify the
homophobic gay image. You can almost hear the swishing. If you think that they
are supposed to be representative of every gay man in the world, you'll be
outraged. But if you can accept the view is that this is a movie about gay
individuals, you'll love it. Your choice.
[This appeared in the 4/25/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
The night skies have always held a fascination for mankind. One of the
ultimate unknowns, that's where gods lived and where we look to for signs as
to how to proceed with life. Various heavenly bodies and their configurations
signify favorable or adverse conditions. Comets were often thought to be ill omens.
In the first of this summer's destruction-from-above films ("Armageddon" with
Bruce Willis opens later) one particular comet indicates the most sinister
omen you could imagine. It's about to strike the Earth and wipe out all life
on the planet.
High school student Leo Biederman (Elijah Wood) is peering through his
telescope one night at an amateur astronomy outing and finds a glow in the sky
where there wasn't one before. When a professional examines the information,
he discovers the bad news - just before he has his own fatal impact with an 18-wheeler.
A year later television news reporter Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni) is hot on a
story about a White House sex scandal concerning a woman named Ellie. Through
a web-search and dumb luck, she discovers that the actual word is "ELE",
Extinction-Level Event. Abducted by G-Men for a secret meeting with President
Beck (Morgan Freeman), she does an amusing word-dance attempting to find out
what is going on without revealing that she knows little.
Beck believes that she is about to break the story and is forced to go public
with the upcoming disaster. But not to worry, he explains, everything is well
in hand. A team of astronauts is about to take off in the "Messiah", the
largest spaceship ever built, to nuke the Mt. Everest-sized comet and save the world.
Veteran astronaut Spurgeon "Fish" Tanner (Robert Duvall) is the odd man out
on the team. The rest believe that the oldster is only included on the trip
for the PR factor. He thinks that the only experience they've had is on flight
simulator video games.
Several months later, the Messiah reaches the comet to blow it to pieces.
Since this is only half way through the movie, no one in the audience has any
expectations that this plan will succeed. If it did, this would be one of the
shortest disaster films in history and we wouldn't be able to see the huge
tidal wave wipe out New York as shown in the previews.
Back on the home planet, the President tells the nation that there's been a
glitch, but we have back-up plans. And if all else fails, we're constructing a
huge "Ark" cave where a million people along with animals and plants will wait
out the two years of darkened skies after the comet's collision. Our way of
life will survive. Meanwhile, everyone should just go about their normal lives.
The film follows three groups of people: the astronauts, Lerner and
Biederman. The reporter is coming to grips with her personal anguish. Her
parents (Vanessa Redgrave and Maximilian Schell) have just divorced and her
father has married a woman half his age. Young Leo is smitten with a classmate
and wants to get her to the cave where she will survive.
Falling into the "Towering Inferno" syndrome, this movie attempts too much in
too short a time. None of the characters are fleshed out and it's a real
struggle to care about whether they live or die. All the cinematic short-cuts
of manipulative teary-eyed good-byes in the world can't make us involved if we
don't know the people.
What could have been fascinating sub-plots are left uninvestigated. Tanner's
conflict with his fellow astronauts disappears into nothingness. A million
people living in the Ark and how they deal with that situation begs for more
screen time, but we never even see the inside of the caves.
This is one of the few instances where television would be the superior
medium for a special effects film. There's too much to tell. It's tailor-made
for a multi-hour mini-series.
Oddly enough, we never see most of the action. Most of the big outer space
excitement is missing. As we watch Lerner's broadcast, the signal is disrupted
and all we get is a computer simulation. When Titan missiles are launched
towards the comet, we learn of the result from the President's speech rather
than seeing it. The punchlines are gone. For a $75 million film, it seems _small_.
Admittedly there are a few impressive effects scenes. The astronauts on the
surface of the comet is the high point of the action-oriented events. The huge
tsunami wiping out the east coast isn't bad.
The acting is adequate, but with a cast of A-list actors, you would expect
more. Far too many people are under-used and you are left wondering who they are.
The film missed the big story. How would most people react if they knew they
were about to die? Beck tells them that they should continue as usual, paying
their bills and going to work. I don't know about you, but if I know that life
is coming to an end in a few months, those credit card bills are going to have
to wait.
You'd expect that such an announcement would provoke mass hysteria, but
there's very little of it in the film. In the real world, emotions would be
running high. Some people would choose to party the last days away, others
would be rioting in the streets and still others would be making peace with
their lives. There's a song out now about the day they cured AIDS and the
writer sleeps with half a dozen people on that day. With the end of the world
in sight, you'd think that sex would be one thing on at least some people's
minds. There's no sex, no mass destruction, no panic. Everyone in the movie
takes the low-key moral high ground. Admirable but not realistic.
Director Mimi Leder ("The Peacemaker", "ER") has the right idea. People in
the midst of disaster are more interesting than the disaster itself. "Titanic"
proved that. But it doesn't work here. The cast is too big and the time too limited.
"Deep Impact" has its heart in the right place. There's just not enough of
that heart.
(Michael Redman has been writing this column for over 23 years and if he hears
of a comet heading towards his house, he's planning on partying like it's
1999. Email party invitations to redman@bvoice.com.)
[This appeared in the 5/14/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Nixon (1995)
        While there may be some question concerning how much of Oliver Stone's film
is truth, there can be no debate that it is one hell of a movie. Richard Nixon
was an enigma to his friends and family as well as to the country and Stone
shoves our face in his version of the answers.
        The acting is as dynamic as you would expect from Anthony Hopkins, Joan
Allen, Powers Boothe, James Woods and dozens of others including an
unexpectedly strong, albeit minor, appearance by Larry Hagman. The sets feel
authentic. The era seems right. Nixon's life flashes before our eyes...
        And flash is what it does. Like Stone's "JFK", the film is a patchwork of
remarkable vignettes. Filmed in numerous formats -- color, black and white,
extremely grainy, over-exposed  -- the pseudo-documentary approach invades our
minds and becomes history.
        What a chore this must have been to direct and edit. What scenes to film in
which of the numerous film types? What hallucination to include in which
flashback inside which other flashback? The final result is such an assault on
the senses that those decisions may not have mattered. The choice to construct
the film in this manner might be only the crucial one. Weighing in at over
three hours of visual onslaught, Stone's image becomes ours almost involuntarily.
        In Nixon and "JFK", Oliver Stone presents our history as mythology.
Even if the warrior is fatally flawed, it is still the story of a hero's
struggle. As evil as many people believe Nixon to have been; according to
Stone, the president thought he was fighting the noble fight. Beaten down time
after time, Nixon picked himself back up to slay more dragons.
        The Kennedy assassination and Watergate are perhaps the defining moments of
our nation's history in the last half of this century. The events that became
legends created the American mood for decades. Each of those few minutes of
history changed the country's collective soul dramatically.
        Kennedy is viewed as the knight in shining armor shot down as he was saving
the country. The great hope of the liberals destroyed before he could fulfill
his destiny. The lesson for the country? The good die young so don't try.
        Watergate was the downfall for the conservatives' hero. Even sleazy
politicians fail. Nixon's lesson for us? The people in charge lie. Don't trust anyone.
        The reality that Kennedy wasn't completely noble and Nixon, not totally
depraved doesn't much matter. The truth of history is academic; the myths are
what stir the country. 
[This appeared in the 1/4/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Sense and Sensibility (1995)
Based on Jane Austen's book and adapted by Emma Thompson (who also stars),
this is a tale of romance in the England of horse-drawn carriages and country manors.
Occasionally there is talk of "women's films" and "men's films": movies that
are aimed at one gender or the other. Most of the time these designations are
over-stated and the films are usually equally enjoyable by both. Every once
and a while there appears a story that resonates much more with one sex: some
buddy films, "The Bridges Of Madison County" and others. "Sense And
Sensibility" is definitely a women's film.
Not being of that particular gender, much of the film meandered by for me. I
didn't participate as the women of the audience audibly voiced their approval
or lack thereof as each new man entered the lives of the all female family.
However I could appreciate the story, overly-long as it is, the competent and
often inspired acting and the grand English countryside.
The plot involves a family with three daughters who are forced to move from
their mansion to a beautiful cottage on a rambling estate when the father
dies. The two older daughters fall in love with suitors and spend a lot of
time wandering through fields. Then one of the...zzz...zzz...oh, something
happens and the family works harder to get the daughters married off. But it
turns out that...zzz...zzz...something else happens and everyone cries.
It's truly a beautiful and touching film, but male readers should take a
woman friend to tell them how wondrous it is and so that they can find out
what happened when they dozed off.
[This appeared in the 2/1/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Out-of-Towners, The (1999)
To quote a cinematic sage from years ago: I'm mad as hell and I'm not
going to take it anymore!
Perhaps it's just my recent choices of films, but all I've seen during
the past few weeks has been dreck ("Mod Squad", "Cruel Intentions") or
well-crafted but dismal ("Affliction", "8mm").
Desperate for a good time in the theater, I chose what appeared to be
a sure thing. A re-make of a film that I enjoyed years ago, this time
staring Steve Martin, Goldie Hawn and John Cleese. All personal
favorites. How could it go wrong?
Procrastinating writing this column, I stole some time to drink a
couple of beers and dance to Buckwheat Zydeco in a hot sweaty
bar. Walking home in the chilling but invigorating spring rain, I was
struck by the fact that fun still exists.
And that's what this film doesn't have: fun.
Henry (Martin) and Nancy (Hawn) Clark are in the midst of their
mid-life crisis. Their youngest child just left home and the nest is
empty. He's been fired from this advertising job. In a desperate
attempt to save his career, he's heading to New York for an interview.
Everything goes wrong. Their plane is diverted to Boston. They miss
the train to the city. Once they reach Manhattan, the Columbus, Ohio
couple are strangers in a strange land. They're mugged. Their credit
card is declined at the hotel. They have no place to stay and no
food. You know the drill.
Unfortunately everything goes wrong with the film too. Martin is one
of the best comedic actors alive, but he doesn't connect. The timing
is off and the jokes are old and tired. Remarkably Hawn fails at her
ditzy blonde role, a persona she has built a career upon. Their
chemistry is non-existent. In scenes that could be from Warner
Brothers cartoons, the usually over-the-top actors are oddly hesitant.
The storyline is one disconnected episode after another. Any scene
could be dropped and the tale would make as much sense. In fact,
nearly all the scenes could be eliminated and it would be a better
film. I spent most of the movie drumming my fingers on the armrest
waiting for something humorous.
To be fair, there are a few bits that work. After Henry is slipped a
hallucinogenic in jail, he dances down the streets to "Age Of
Aquarius".  That's funny for about 15 seconds. The few moments Cleese
is on-screen are hilarious, but ten minutes don't make a movie.
So that does it. I'm not wasting my time writing another column until
I see a film that's fun. Or until next week's deadline arrives --
whichever comes first.
(Michael Redman has written this column for well over 23 years and he's
thinking about spending more time dancing.)
[This appeared in the 4/8/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
TITANIC DEFINATELY NOT A DISASTER FILM
People tend to drift through their lives living their parent's dreams until
they experience a major personal crisis, connect with an inspiring mentor or
become so filled with desperation that they are moved to change their path.
Rarely do all three happen at once. Even more rarely do they happen as
dramatically as they do to Rose Calvert on the Titanic.
Director James Cameron ("Aliens", both "Terminator"s), in the biggest gamble
of his career, has come out on top again. At $200 million, "Titanic" is the
most expensive film ever made and you can bet that both Cameron and the studio
were holding their collective breath when the movie opened. Now they can
inhale again: it's a winner.
The tale begins in present time as a salvage crew is searching the wreckage
miles beneath the ocean surface looking for the legendary 56 karat Heart Of
The Ocean blue diamond. They attract the attention of 101 year-old survivor
Rose (Gloria Stuart) who flies out to their ship. Most of the film is a
flashback as she tells her story.
The 17 year-old Rose (Kate Winslet) boards the ill-fated "unsinkable" vessel
with her fabulously wealthy fiancee Cal Hockley (Billy Zane) and their
entourage on their way to America for her fate as a member of the moneyed
crowd. Before he died, her father lost the family money and her mother has
effectively sold her into slavery to Hockley to maintain their status. It
doesn't take long to discover that he is an overbearing controlling rich boy
insistent on getting his own way. Her future looks filled with cash but no joy.
Several decks, below in steerage, is the penniless artist Jack Dawkins
(Leonardo DiCaprio), a drifter who won his ticket in a poker game minutes
before the ship sat sail. Late that night Jack charms Rose away from the edge
where she is going to kill herself rather than face her life. 
After a stuffy party on the upper level that Jack attends as a reward for
rescuing Rose, he takes her to an all-out blast below where the Irish
immigrants are partying up a storm. The die is cast: she can see where the
passion is. Later as he is sketching her nude wearing the diamond, the sexual
tension drips off the screen.
Wisely Cameron has chosen to make Jack and Rose the focus of the film. As
magnificent as the re-creation of the Titanic and her sinking are, they are
the back-drop to the real story. Unlike other disaster films where the effects
are the star, here we have two human beings.
By all accounts, the depiction of the events is remarkably historically
accurate. Although the main characters are fictional, the account is right on
target. The ship looks so real that you would swear that you are there
witnessing the early morning of April 15, 1912. Some of the underwater footage
of the wreck are authentic. The film crew spent a few weeks diving with a
specially designed camera. Cameron built a 775 foot replica of the Titanic,
accurate even down to the carpet from the manufacturers of the original. And
then he sank it.
The sinking itself will delight fans of action films. The hundreds of
computer-generated shots pay off and couldn't look more real. (Oddly enough,
the only scenes that seem artificial are the too-smooth long shots of the ship
underway before the disaster.) The movie brings home the deaths of 1500 people
out of 2200 aboard. The overwhelming spectacle as the behemoth goes under is
breath-taking. Yet in the forefront of it all are Jack and Rose.
There are horrific situations aboard, mostly because of the ship's management.
Only half as many lifeboats exist as are needed because they wanted to avoid a
cluttered look. As the ship goes down, the poorer passengers are locked down
below until the affluent board the boats.
An hour after the Titanic disappears beneath the water, the crew of the
lifeboats (some of which are only half-filled) finally attempt to rescue
survivors. The image of the boats rowing through a sea of frozen corpses
bobbing in their lifejackets is one that will stay with you a long time. The
catastrophe is made real, no longer just a historical event.
The only major problem I have with the film is the physical appearance of the
two leads. Both are supposedly in their late teens, but Rose could pass for 30
and Jack looks almost pre-teen. DiCaprio's youthful allure works against him.
He looks a bit too unruffled for his role. Luckily the film is long (well over
three hours) enough that the flaw disappears as the you become involved with
the couple.
To nit-pick, it is beyond me why the filmmakers would show one of the world's
most recognizable paintings (Picasso's "Les Demoiselles d'Avignon") as being
on the ship. It was obviously not and the appearance jars the audience out of
the movie momentarily.
There are rumors of an over-five-hour version to be released on laser disc.
This is one of the very few films that I would be willing to spend an entire
afternoon with and I can't think of much higher praise.
The tears at the end of the film are almost unavoidable. Several scenes are
guaranteed to bring feelings to the front. My daughter walked into the
restroom afterwards and the place was filled with sobbing women. Especially
effective is the panning of photos of incidents in her life that the elderly
Rose keeps with her when she travels. Her life has been full because of Jack.
Rose's encounter with Jack changed her as have events in our all of our lives.
The emotions that the audience feels are there because everyone can identify
with lost loves and many carry those wounds with them forever. Some thrive and
others sink and, as on the Titanic, the band plays on.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 22 years and wishes everyone
a joyous holidaze. Redman@bvoice.com will get the electrons to him.)
[This appeared in the 12/24 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana. Michael
Redman can be reached at redman@bvoice.com ]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Lost World: Jurassic Park, The (1997)
Steven Spielberg's sequel to "Jurassic Park" signals the beginning of
the big bang summer films. Unfortunately it also begins the season of
major disappointments.
It turns out that the dinosaurs n the original were breed elsewhere and
shipped to the theme park. Now there is a battle for control of the
island where the beasts have roamed free for the past four years. The
grandfatherly corporate big wig John Hammond (Richard Attenborough),
having had a change of heart, wants to let the lizards roam free. His
greedy capitalist pig nephew Peter Ludlow (Arliss Howard) has taken over
the company and decides to bring them to San Diego for a mainland
Dinoland.
Hammond calls in the expert in chaos theory from the first film Ian
Malcolm (Jeff Goldblum) to head up a four-person team to document life
on the island to sway public opinion so that the prehistoric creatures
can stay where they are. Malcolm, no fool he, declines the offer, but
heads for terrorville anyhow to convince his current significant other,
paleontologist Sarah Harding (Julianne Moore) that she is in the wrong
place at the wrong time.
Once in the land of the very large predators, bad turns to worse as
Malcolm discovers that his teenage daughter Kelly (Vanessa Lee Chester),
who was never mentioned in the first film and just happens to be black,
has stowed away. Continuing the trend towards disaster, the evil company
has sent a team to round up dinosaurs in rodeo style.
That's about as much of a plot as we get. There's a lot of destruction,
human-eating and loud screams on the island. A T-Rex is shipped back to
the mainland and then there's even more destruction, human-eating and
loud screams.
As you might expect, the effects are stupendous. The stegosauri and tiny
piranha-raptors are awesome (in the pre-eighties meaning of the word).
Everything looks even better than it did in "Jurassic Park".
One of the problems with the original was that the dinosaurs were more
real and interesting than the human cardboard cut-outs with the
exception of Jeff Goldburg. The same is true here, but even Goldblum
succumbs to the blandness.
After an amusing scene where a yacht accidentally discovers the island,
the first clue that we're in for trouble comes in a brief but seemingly
eternal scene with Malcolm and Ludlow. Goldblum hems and haws through
the conversation leaving the audience to wonder whether Malcolm had a
lobotomy or Goldblum just slept late and forgot to memorize his lines.
Where is the cocky Ian who was the only redeeming person in the
original?
The plot is full of holes and the people, remarkably stupid. 
Harding, who has studied dinosaurs for years, hangs out petting a baby
stegosaurus while its parents are heading towards them. She is oblivious
to any danger. Then she hijacks a baby T-Rex to set its broken leg,
little suspecting that mom will come looking for her kid. And then
she wears her dinosaur blood-soaked jacket as they try to make their way
through a land of critters with the best sniffing ability in the world.
She must have gotten her degree from the Institute Of Really Dumb Things
To Do.
Even the velociraptors are out of character. In the first movie, they
were the perfect killing machines: intelligent and hunting in organized
packs. Here they eat backpacks and fight with one another as their prey
saunters off.
If someone can explain to me exactly what happened on the ship carrying
the T-Rex to San Diego, the film might make a little more sense, but I
don't have much hope.
If you want to catch some extraordinarily realistic dinosaurs, see this
at the matinee, but be prepared to be unamazed at the rest of the film.
During the first movie, the audience screams were in terror. Here
they're also in terror, but aimed at the script. I suppose it should be
expected since it's a sequel. I can only think of a couple of things
that are better the second time.
[This appeared in the 5/29/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Donnie Brasco (1997)
In the late seventies, the FBI was determined to bring down the mob and
sent one of their own into the middle of it, underground with little
support. Living with the crime bosses for six years, agent Joe Pistone
(code named "Donnie Brasco" and played by Johnny Depp) forms an
unexpected deep friendship with his mentor Lefty (Al Pacino).
Lefty is the opposite of the romantic vision of organized crime that we
have seen often on the big screen. His personal problems (cancer, a
junkie son) weigh heavy on his mind as does the fact that he is stuck in
a middle level mafioso job passed by for promotion. He's devoted his
life to his job and the family and knows that his career is going
nowhere. In many ways he is no different than any other aging work-a-day
stiff understanding that he is at a dead end. Of course, for Mafia
employees, "dead"end has an entirely different meaning.
It is no shock that Al Pacino is grand in his untypical downbeat
gangster role. And it has become apparent that it should no longer be
any surprise that Johnny Depp turns in a fine performance. Refusing to
be typecast in the pretty-boy role that was his in the throw-away
television series that was his public launching, Depp has given skilled
exhibitions in a wide variety of parts. Moving beyond the hip boy, here
he is a bit older and a bit wiser.
[This appeared in the 3/20/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for Perfect Murder, A (1998)
In times of crisis people are driven to desperate measures. Of course what
constitutes a crisis differs from person to person. What may be a disastrous
situation for one, may be seen as a challenge to another. As Deepak Chopra is
known to say, "It's not the ride, it's the rider." Unfortunately
clear-thinking is not always the reaction to problems.
Wall Street wheeler dealer Steven Taylor (Michael Douglas) is a man with
troubles. He's sunk his money in illegal financial activities and it's blown
up in his face. In a matter of days he will lose it all.
His wife Emily (Gwyneth Paltrow) is a highly-placed UN interpreter and is not
happy with her life either. Her marriage is cold and unfulfilling. Unknown to
her, her new lover David Shaw (Viggo Mortensen) is not only a painter, but an
ex-con with a history of bilking wealthy women of their money. Emily is a
prime target: she's worth over $100 million.
Steven's solution to his predicament is to offer David half a million to kill
his wife. The artist accepts and the movie is underway.
Drawing from Frederick Knott's play and loosely based on Hitchcock's Dial
M For Murder, this is all-too typical of summer releases. All style and no
substance. And there's really not much style. Director Andrew Davis (the
accomplished Witness and best-forgotten other films) has made exactly
the wrong choices at almost every turn.
Douglas and Paltrow have both shown us that they are skillful actors in
previous films. Mortensen showed promise in the past. Here all three are
walking uninterestingly through their roles with oddly waxen faces. The only
person who shows any sense of life is David Suchet as New York Detective
Mohamed Karaman. He's only on-screen long enough to make you think that there
might be a likable person in the film and then he disappears.
The first concern of a suspense film is to create suspense. Surprises are
important. In this movie the audience keeps waiting for something to happen.
And nothing ever does. Nearly every event is telegraphed in advance. Close-up
on this object or that action and it's easy to guess what's going to happen.
As the film plods towards its inevitable conclusion you keep expecting a plot
twist to make the movie worthwhile. It's a hopeless quest.
The story doesn't make much sense. Steven's wife is loaded. Even with
unfriendly relations, you'd think that he could have talked to her about his
difficulty rather than deciding to kill her. When he does decide on the dire
plan he makes an unreasonable choice. If you were going to hire someone to
kill your wife, would your first choice be her lover? No matter how sleazy he
is, I would think there might be a chance that he would turn down the
opportunity. Why would Steven plan the murder as a break-in in their
apartment? Why not just take her out as she was walking to David's loft in a
bad neighborhood?
While deciding among the numerous summer films, you might do well to skip
this one. You'll find more suspense than this movie offers by watching the
Weather Channel.
[This appeared in the 6/18/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for There's Something About Mary (1998)
        Every once in a while you meet a member of the opposite sex with whom you
establish an instant fascination. Who know why it happens? Cosmic fate?
Soulmates? Pheromones? Recognition of a potential dysfunctional relationship?
Whatever it is, one look and you're lost in their eyes, ready to follow to the
ends of the Earth and make remarkably stupid choices in the name of love.
        And whatever it is, Mary has it in abundance. The guys are lined up down the
block just for a chance to be with her. The trouble is that they're mostly
sleazy lying lowlifes. None of them are who they pretend to be.
        In 1985 high school loser Ted Stroehmann (Ben Stiller) finally hits it lucky.
Mary Jenson (Cameron Diaz), the local teen beauty, has asked him to the Senior
Prom after he stuck up for her mentally challenged brother Warren (W. Earl
Brown). True to form, Ted's fortune reverts to usual on prom night.
        Making a pit stop in Mary's bathroom, Ted has an unfortunate accident. In a
scene guaranteed to make every man in the audience cringe, he catches a
sensitive part of his anatomy in his zipper. Mary's father comes in to help
him and is so astonished at the severity of the situation that he invites her
mother in for a peek. In Marx Brothers style, a policeman crawls in through
the window and a fireman joins the party. The last that Ted sees Mary is as
he's being dropped by the paramedics on the way to the hospital.
        Seventeen years later, Ted is still bewitched and hires Pat Healy (Matt
Dillon), a would-be detective to track down the object of his desire. When Pat
locates her in Florida he falls for her and lies to Ted about her condition.
According to him, she's put on some tonnage, is the wheelchair-bound unwed
mother of four by three different men and is on her way to Japan as a
mail-order bride. In real life, she's one hot babe.
        When Ted learns the truth, he's in the sunshine state to discover Pat
romancing Mary. The private eye has been spying on her to discover her image
of the perfect man and attempts to present himself as that being. He's not
doing such a great job. She is intrigued by Nepal so he tells her that he owns
a condo in Nepal. She is concerned for the less fortunate (her best friend
walks with braces, she feeds an old homeless man and spends time with her
brother and his friends) and he explains that his greatest joy in life is
working with "retards". Naive Mary believes it all - a _condo_ in Nepal?
        Ted tries to win Mary. Pat tries to win Mary. Every other guy in the film
tries to win Mary.
        What is it about her? Obviously one of the "something"s is Mary's habit of
wearing thin clingy clothing while forgetting her underwear. If anyone's gaze
happens to make it up to her face, there's a winning smile and liquid eyes. On
a less physical level, she's charming, giggly, kind-hearted and full of life.
No wonder every male is falling all over himself.
        This pretty much describes an intriguing but fairly traditional romantic
comedy. What sets this film off from the others is that it is directed by
Peter and Bobby Farrelly. Responsible for the tasteless (and even worse,
unfunny) "Dumb And Dumber", they bring their distinctive style to the genre.
        The film is filled with low-grade vulgar bathroom humor. No group escapes the
opportunity to be the butt of jokes. Gays, the physically and mentally
challenged, dogs, Blacks, old women: they all get their chance.
        The astonishing thing is that, if you can leave political-correctness at the
door, it's are often hilarious. The Farrelly brothers are not content to show
us a bit and allow us to laugh at it. They go on and on with it until it's
crammed down our throats. Pat accidentally kills a small dog, attempts to
revive it, and the scene is, to put it mildly, stupid. But as it continues far
past a reasonable amount of time, you'll be rolling in the aisles embarrassed
that you find it laughable.
        When Ted is "cleaning his pipes" before a date with Mary, the incident is
crude, offensive and uncomfortable. Despite the audience's best intention, it
also gets the biggest laugh of the picture, destined to be talked about for
months and possibly inspire new hairstyles.
        For every vulgar scene that works, there's one that definitely doesn't. When
Mary's braced friend Tucker (Lee Evans) drops his keys and attempts to pick
them up for seemingly hours, it's cruel and not humorous. And then they do it
again. 
        Ted gets a fishhook caught in his mouth and it's just a waste of footage. The
30 year-olds as high school students are a groan. Ted's friend Dom (Chris
Elliott) develops a face covered with boils. That's supposed to be humorous.
It's not.
        The film would be a disaster without such a stellar cast. Stiller has a
talent for comedy as evidenced by his 1994 Emmy for writing Fox's "Ben Stiller
Show". Dillon, playing against type, does well as the trashy Pat. His
pencil-thin mustache is a riot. Elliott is always comical and gets a chance to
strut his stuff. Even the smaller part of Mary's leather-skinned neighbor
Magda (Lin Shaye) is well-casted.
        Singer Jonathon Richman walks out of the scenery occasionally as a Greek
chorus with songs commenting on the current status of the plot.
        Brown as Mary's brother is a stitch. He is the star of every scene that he's
in. Fortunately most of the humor surrounding his disability involves laughing
with him rather than at him.
        Then there's Cameron Diaz. The film's title is right: there's something about
Cameron. With her allure and fresh style, she's headed for the big time.
        The film is not for everyone. It requires abandoning all sense of decorum. If
you have an inner 14-year old boy, you will find parts of it great fun. If you
don't, stay home and watch that documentary on the migratory habits of some songbird.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and admits that his
inner child hasn't quite made it to 14 yet. Email tasteless stories to redman@bvoice.com)
[This appeared in the 7/23/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Thinner (1996)
As I write this, it's a rainy night with severe wind gusts and only two
evenings away from Halloween: Stephen King atmosphere. It'd be
appropriate to talk about King's new film and how frightening it is.
Yeah, it'd be appropriate, but it ain't gonna happen.
Films from King supernatural horror tales haven't done so well in recent
years. There hasn't been a well-crafted one since....well, since before
some of you were born. King movies, a genre unto themselves, started out
with great promise, but over the years "Carrie" turned into "Children Of
The Corn". He's had more luck with "Stand By Me" and the psychological
thrillers "Misery" and "Shawshank Redemption".
"Thinner", based on the novel originally released as written by "Richard
Bachman", attempts to combine the two Kings for an occult thriller. It
almost succeeds for a short while, but rapidly deteriorates into another
schlockfest. The film's beginning draws you in and then takes a wrong
turn to go where almost every Stephen King movie has gone before.
Attorney Billy Halleck (Robert John Burke) lives the good life as a
distinguished member of the good ole boy network, complete with wife,
daughter and supposedly happy home life. He's fighting a losing battle
with his 300 pound weight while continually stuffing one thing after
another into his mouth. This all changes when Halleck runs into and
kills an old gypsy woman as he and his wife engage in an activity that
got Hugh Grant arrested.
His legal buddies rule the death accidental, but the ancient Gypsy king
isn't going to let him get away with killing his daughter and puts a
grisly curse on the lawyer. At first he is thrilled as the pounds melt
away, but then panics as he continues to lose weight no matter how much
he eats. He is literally wasting away. Desperate, he turns to a local
mobster for help and they both hunt down the band of Gypsies.
The major problem with the film is that there is not one sympathetic
person in the entire story. The main character, Halleck is initially the
one we identify with as the accident leads to his tremendous misfortune,
but as the film wears on (and it does) he turns into a vengeful dolt.
Even his loving wife is unmasked as a scheming liar.
The movie isn't helped by its perpetuation of the racist depiction of
Gypsies. They're easily the most interesting characters in the film, but
It makes you wonder how a people could survive when all of its members
are whores, killers and thieves. If this were any other minority group,
they'd be up in arms, but Gypsies probably don't go to the movies,
right?
[This appeared in "The Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana,
10/31/96. Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Title
Review for Twelve Monkeys (1995)
Terry Gilliam's latest is a slam bang science fiction tour de force. Drawing
from the same deep swirling pool of inspiration that he did for "Brazil", the
former Monty Python member has another winner  at least for some of us.
Like most of his films, this is one of those `love it or hate it's. Some will
find it brilliant, dark but dazzling. Others will find it tedious, dark but
dazzling. 
I've heard the plot referred to as confusing by some, but to anyone who's
well-versed with time travel story lines, the themes are familiar. Bruce
Willis is incarcerated in a hell hole of a prison in the future where the
entire human population lives underground because of a deadly virus that
covers the planet surface. `Volunteering' (more like being chosen by a giant
grab-a-toy-with-the-claw machine) to be sent into the past, he gets a chance
at freedom.
His mission is to return to 1996 and find a pure strain of the virus so the
scientists of the future can return the people to the surface. Their time
travel device, like many of the futuristic artifacts (which look as if they
were borrowed from Brazil), isn't exactly high tech and only gets him to
the right time after sending him first to 1990 and then W.W.I. During his stay
in 1990, he is thrown into a mental institution where he meets Brad Pitt.
Finally making it to the right time, he finds that Pitt is head of the animal
rights group Army Of The 12 Monkeys, the organization thought to be
responsible for unleashing the virus.
Bouncing back and forth from the future to our time and back again, Willis
follows clues from incomplete historical records trying to find the virus only
to discover that he, himself is the cause of most of the clues. 
Come to think of it, the plot is somewhat convoluted, but in the end
everything makes sense. Well, almost everything. The real key to the ending is
the insurance salesperson sitting next to the red-haired scientist on an
airplane. Which time period is she from?
There has been much talk about how this is a new groundbreaking role for
Willis. In truth, it's not. He plays the same character that he has for years:
tough guy beaten down time after time only to rise back up, bloody and broken,
to go after the bad guys once again. The difference here is that he is even
better at it than ever before. Willis may only play one role, but he's got
that one down cold.
The surprise is Brad Pitt. Looking nothing like the Fabio clone from previous
films, he is masterful as the insane prisoner turned ecoterrorist mastermind.
Maybe he's more than just a pretty face after all.
[This appeared in the 1/17/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Hanging Up (2000)
If you'd like to make a call, please hang up and try again
What is the poet said about humans and rodents and how their plans usually
gets screwed up?
The distance between how a project looks in our head and how it acts in real
life is often so vast that even the best ideas can't make the leap. We spend
hours and hours working out the scheme, detailing the minutia and then it
just doesn't work.
Not surprisingly our expectations and hopes are so high that we can't even
see that it's not working...for a while at least. We want the thing to be
good so it looks good to us. Until the slow realization of reality sinks in.
That's exactly what happens with "Hanging Up". It sounds great and has all
the elements to be a wonderful movie. I expected and wanted to enjoy it. But
then chaos theory set in. A butterfly flaps its wings in Japan and the film sinks.
Eve (Meg Ryan) has a full life running her own business and taking care of
her family, but her obsession is caring for her dying alcoholic father
(Walter Matthau). Her self-absorbed sisters Georgia (Diane Keaton) and Maddy
(Lisa Kudrow) aren't much help. Georgia carries on a love affair with her
cell phone while publishing her women's magazine (entitled, what else,
"Georgia"). Maddy's life revolves around her soap opera role.
This all must have looked so good on paper. What an ultimate "chick flick"!
Screenwriter Nora Ephron has a string of hits. Keaton, who also directs, has
good instincts and her directoral efforts have earned prestigious awards.
The casting of the women was genius. All three have at least partially built
their careers on playing the same scattered but appealing hot babe. It's not
a stretch to imagine a younger Keaton in "When Harry Met Sally". Or a
younger Ryan fitting in with the cast of "Friends". Keaton and Ryan both
captivate the screen in most of their roles and Kudrow isn't too annoying in
small doses.
Matthau has spent half of his life playing crotchety old men and he does it
better than anyone. No one else can so convincingly lie in a hospital bed
yet still have the energy to grab asses.
There are a few touching moments. Dad comes home drunk during a birthday
party and everyone in the audience feels Eve's pain and embarrassment.
When absent mother (Cloris Leachman) explains she left the family because
motherhood just didn't take and Eve returns home, your heart sinks. You know
she's going to take her mother's place in the family and the emotional
deadend that leads to. Her relationship with her father is the one
convincing aspect of the film, although you would think that sometime during
the past 10 years she would have run into one of those thousands of books on codependency.
What goes wrong? Just about everything. The actors are all more than
adequate but with the exception of Ryan and Matthau, no one really connects
with each other. Rarely do the women come across as sisters. Maddy and
Georgia aren't fully fleshed-out characters. None of the men are anything
other than place-holders. Matthau is great, but he's merely a cartoon.
The script contributes little towards creating real people. Most of the time
the conversations fall flat even when supposedly passionate. The story
("I've devoted my life to my father and now he's dying") has the potential
for a deep look into the human psyche and connecting with a large number of
the audience but seldom gets beyond superficial.
The film isn't horrendous. The dangers of being electronically and/or
emotionally overly connected and at everyone's beck and call 24 hours a day
says something to the modern American. The actors are fun to watch and some
of the scenes work well. Occasionally the humor hits home.
Unfortunately none of it clicks together as a whole. Bits and pieces, but
not a satisfying film. Oddly enough, for a movie that supposedly deals with
how we relate to each other, what we have here is a failure to communicate.
(Michael Redman has written this column since before the dawn of time and
has to confess that, for possibly the first time, his favorite film of last
year was nominated for an Oscar. Comments about American Beauty can be
sent to redman@bluemarble.net.)
[This appeared in the 2/24/2000 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bluemarble.net.]

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
Like other popular media, movies often reflect the mood and concerns of the
public. During the fifties, science fiction was a thinly disguised warning of
the communist threat. Recently we've seen numerous films dealing with the
supernatural and the afterlife, mirroring desires for a life more fulfilling.
A theme for years has been the threat of big government and more specifically
lately, the erosion of personal rights. Since Watergate, more and more people
are convinced that every government official is lying. The right points to
Waco and Ruby Ridge as evidence that the Feds are out to get us. The left says
that new powers given to law enforcement continue the slide down the slippery
slope to fascism. The "roving" wiretap law provides for phone taps at any
residence or business that the suspect ever walks into. Drug laws allow
permanent property confiscation without a trial.
Robert Clayton Dean (Will Smith) has always disputed his wife's (Regina King)
belief that our rights are being sold out. He's sure that it's only the
criminals who have anything to fear. Now he's beginning to think that maybe
Carla is right. Someone powerful is out to get the DC labor lawyer. His credit
cards are cancelled. There are eavesdropping bugs planted everywhere he goes.
Tracking devices are all over his clothes. He's wanted for murder. Newspaper
headlines proclaim an affair with an old girlfriend. Something's going on and
he doesn't have a clue.
What Dean doesn't know is that during a chance encounter with an old friend,
he became the unwitting owner of a mini-disk slipped into his shopping bag.
Shortly afterwards he sees his friend lying dead in a city street, his body
being searched by a small army. The disk contains evidence of the murder of a
US congressman by a rogue black ops section of the National Security Agency (a
top secret organization referred to only somewhat inaccurately in the past as
"No Such Agency").
NSA official Thomas Brian Reynolds (Jon Voight) who engineered the
assassination will stop at nothing to retrieve the disk and he has all the
latest electronic spy gizmos at his disposal. Satellites beam high resolution
videos and a truck filled with cool high-tech equipment sees and hears everything.
Dean's wife kicks him out of the house after reading of his supposed sexual
indiscretion. He's fired from his legal firm. With no one else to turn to, he
contacts his college girlfriend, Rachel Banks (Lisa Bonet). She's been the
go-between for him when he needs the services of an underground surveillance
expert known only as "Brill" (Gene Hackman). Brill is his only hope for survival.
The movie is a variation of the wrongly accused man on the run plot, but it's
presented with a high-energy assault on the senses. There's no time to
consider going for popcorn or even to think when the screen attacks your eyes.
The team of producer Jerry Bruckheimer and director Tony Scott (both
responsible for "Top Gun", "Beverly Hills Cop II", "Crimson Tide") doesn't
give us a break in this hyper-active suspense film.
The acting is generally top-notch. Hackman is always a delight and hits his
paranoid character perfectly. It's unfortunate that he doesn't have more
screen time. The subtle references to another film ("The Conversation") where
he played a surveillance expert is intriguing to those that remember the
earlier role. This could almost be the same person 25 years later.
Smith again demonstrates his increasing appeal as a leading man. Here he
convinces us that he's just an ordinary guy caught in circumstances beyond his
control. Some of the comedy bits fall a little flat, but they're soon forgotten.
The rest of the main players do their job admirably but one of the best
aspects of the film is the team of techno-geeks. They're the usual computer
nerds you've seen in other films. Slovenly, looking like they're 14, pushing
lots of buttons and shouting gobbley-gook, this time they're the bad guys.
Especially entertaining is Jack Black.
There are a couple of things that make little sense. The NSA creates a 3-D
image from a surveillance camera in a lingerie shop. It's very doubtful that
the store has enough cameras to furnish the information needed for that. A
scene when Brill and Dean stop to argue in between trains in a coal yard is
questionable. If there were a bunch of bad guys with big guns after me, I
think I'd be running and leave the discussion for later. A few other scenes
would leave the audience wondering about the logic -- if there were an
opportunity to wonder.
The pace is a bit frantic even for an action-adventure film. A little more
time spent on characterization would have been welcome, especially with Brill
and Carla. This isn't exactly a thinking-man's film, then, but they don't all
have to be.
The theater was packed on the day I attended. Of course the new "Star Wars"
trailer shown before the film didn't hurt the turnout. For the first time in
memory, people are paying to see a preview. Luckily the movie that follows is
almost as entertaining. (The preview, by the way, looks dazzling.)
Think you're being overly-suspicious about those odd noises on your phone?
Maybe you are. Or perhaps, as the cut-line for this film says, "It's not
paranoia if they're really after you."
{Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and he's pretty sure
that someone, somewhere is keeping track of everything he says. He's beginning
to suspect that it might be secretly located at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman. Conspiracy theories can go
to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 11/26/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Mask of Zorro, The (1998)
The old adage "You can't go home again" is often especially true of one's
early childhood havens. Things tend to be smaller, less fascinating and not
quite as profound as memory would indicate.
Perhaps Zorro is one of those youthful memories best left alone. Out of the
several versions of the swashbuckling hero, Disney's Guy Williams was mine.
Hours were happily spent in front of the television watching the hero of old
California make his enemies look like fools. The current film pales in the
_recollection_ of those shows, although probably not compared to the actual
programs themselves.
Based loosely on Johnston McCulley's 1919 magazine serialization which was
brought to the screen a year later, this movie features two Zorros. We are
introduced to the first, Don Diego De La Vega (Anthony Hopkins), in 1812
during his last adventure. The evil governor Don Rafael Montero is ready to
execute innocent men to draw out his arch-foe. Zorro rides in, saves the men,
fights off an army, poses dramatically a number of times and escapes.
But all is not well. Montero discovers his secret identity and invades De La
Vega's home. During the battle, Zorro is captured and his beloved wife killed.
The governor then takes De La Vega's young daughter Elena to raise as his own.
Skip ahead twenty years. Montero returns from Spain with the grown Elena
(Catherine Zeta-Jones) and a plan to buy California from Mexico. Upon hearing
of this, De La Vega, languishing in a squalid prison, escapes. In a tavern he
runs into bandit Alejandro Murrieta (Antonio Banderas) who had befriended him
as a child.
Murrieta is seeking revenge against Captain Harrison Love (Matt Letscher) for
causing the death of his brother. Love is Montero's partner in his depraved
plan. The older Zorro takes on this young outlaw and trains him to be the new
masked avenger.
The film is a return to a simpler lighter adventure reminiscent of "Raiders
Of The Lost Ark". There's no dark brooding Bruce Wayne. It's all played for
action and laughs. The problem is that the action is listless and the laughs, forced.
The sword fighting is mostly filmed in medium shots resulting in a flat
experience. The scenes are formulaic and repetitive. Each fight looks like the
last. Zorro runs to the left and finds a group of soldiers. He runs to the
right and finds a group of soldiers. He runs back to the middle and fights
them all at once. Fifteen minutes later he does it again.
The comedy is played broadly and over and over. The young Zorro's problems
with his horse are slightly humorous the first time. The second and third are
less so.
Hopkins is the highlight of the film. His aging mentor is witty and
appealing. Banderas fares less well, but does what he can with the limited
role. Zeta-Jones certainly has a screen presence. Her sword fight with
Banderas which doubles as foreplay is a joy at least until it goes on too long.
Other viewers might find the recent Zorro dazzling. Me, I think I'll stick
with my memories.
[This appeared in the 8/6/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Edge, The (1997)
This is the tale of survival in the wilderness: men against bear. No, wait,
it's really about of two rivals for the same woman. No, no, the real story is
a man's discovery of his unknown inner resources. Hold on, it's "Grizzly
Adams" but with big town socialites.
It's truly all of these things and this is a prime example of the whole being
lesser than the sum of the parts. 
Although the Canadian Rockies scenery (standing in for the film's Alaska) is
magnificent, in typical David Mamet form, the movie could be a filmed play.
There are only two main characters (three, if you count the bear) and the
supposed focus in on the interaction between them.
Bookwormish billionaire Charles Morse (Anthony Hopkins) decides to go on
location with his trophy wife, super model Mickey (Elle MacPherson) to Alaska.
His hidden motive is to find out if the ultra babe is making time with her
photographer Bob Green (Alec Baldwin).
This rapidly takes a back seat when a plane with the billionaire (but not his
wife - this is not "Gilligan's Island"), the photographer and his assistant
crash lands in the wilderness, miles from civilization. Now survival is all
that matters and when a man-eating Kodiak bear shows up, the rivalry is all
but forgotten.
As the two stars and the "other guy" emerge from the wreckage, it's
reminiscent of the original "Star Trek" series when the Kirk, Spock and Scotty
beams down to a new planet with an unnamed crew member. You know that it's
just a matter of time before you hear "He's dead, Jim" and there's no question
who the statement is about.
Luckily for the group, Morse has a photographic memory and even better, he's
just been reading a book on how to survive when lost in the wilds. Before you
know it, there's a compass made from a paper clip, navigating by the stars and
talk of making a fire from an ice lens. All this from a guy who describes
himself as having no imagination.
Much has been made as to this film being the story of the triumph of the
thinking man over nature. While this is certainly a portion of what is going
on, other aspects of the human condition are just as important to survival.
The high point of the movie is two men fighting a monstrous bear armed with
only sharpened burnt sticks and a plan. While they do have a blueprint for
their battle, it would never work unless they reach down inside to come up
with the primal energy for the combat.
There's a good film hidden inside of this mish-mash. For a few minutes before
the bear battle until about a half hour afterwards, a mini-movie exists that,
had it been all there was, could be highly recommended.
Unfortunately before that point there are far too many scenes of "Oh no, we're
going to die!" "No, we're not. We have to push on." Then a different person
flips out and another pulls him together. And then it happens again and again.
We get the message the first time. It might be realistic, but not everything
that could possibly happen has to end up on film.
Later in the film as the confrontation between Morse and Green heats up, the
movie falls apart. Not much is believable and, even worse, we don't care.
Hopkins is a fine actor and his presence is almost enough to carry the film.
Almost. His reluctant hero is credible and the transformation meaningful. The
film would have worked better if he had to struggle alone.
Baldwin is usually at least adequate in his roles, but doesn't do well with
what is admittedly a character without much to offer. It doesn't help that the
adversarial relationship between the men is much less interesting than when
they work together.
The rest of the actors have mere bit parts. MacPherson has shown some talent
in other films, but here her function is the same as the mountains: something
nice to look at.
The big star of the film is the extraordinarily beautiful scenery, but that's
not enough to make it work. It would be nice to also have a plot that held our interest.
[This appeared in the 10/2/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
Is there anyone left who trusts what the government tells them? As we prepare
to exit the 20th Century, we live in a nation of people who believe that there
is a conspiracy behind every door. What has Bill Clinton really done? Where
did AIDS actually come from? Did we fight the last few wars for the oil
industry? Is everything going to collapse on January 1, 2000? And then there's
always that lone gunman thing.
Why do we think that there's a hidden truth behind the public statements? 
Millennium Fever has something to do with it. That we no longer have the
Soviet Union as the Evil Empire to blame everything on and have turned on
ourselves factors into it. Of course the fact that we've found out that our
government makes a habit of lying to us doesn't help matters.
It's no wonder that one of the most popular television series is one that
plays into the belief that we can never know what is going on around us.
Mulder and Scully are stand-ins for us as they attempt to get at the truth
each week. And it's as we fear: the truth is out there but it's unknowable,
wrapped in plots within plots within plots.
At the end of last season, the FBI unit devoted to investigating the
unexplainable had been closed down. Without the X-Files, Fox Mulder (David
Duchovny) and Dana Scully (Gillian Anderson) are sentenced to solving mundane
crimes. The film picks up shortly afterwards as they fail to prevent an
Oklahoma City-like bombing. In the process of analyzing the situation, they
discover clues that lead them back on the alien invasion conspiracy trail.
It's almost impossible to talk about what happens during the film without
giving away too much. It's safe to say that somewhere between 35,000 BC north
Texas and 1998 Antarctica we do find out whether there are aliens and who's
behind the conspiracy. Unless it's all another red herring.
There are two very different audiences for the film: the 20 million fans who
follow the series and movie-goers who aren't familiar with it. "X-Files" big
daddy Chris Carter (writer, producer, creator) has stated that he wants the
movie to satisfy both. In some ways he has succeeded, however it falls a bit
short for either.
I can't imagine someone who hasn't watched the television show understanding
some of the scenes. The Cigarette-Smoking Man (William Davis) is probably a
mystery to them. (The conspiracies are so deep that many of the characters
don't even have names, but are referred to as the [Something-Something]-Man.)
The three conspiracy buffs have a walk-on that will make fans smile, but
others will be puzzled. Mulder and Scully's relationship makes sense to the
novice, but is much more interesting to those that know their history.
On the other hand, aficionados have to sit through a few scenes that they
already know by heart. Major characters have bit parts because there are too
many of them to explain to the newbies. Others are left out entirely.
So what is this exactly? It's a two-hour between-the-seasons episode with a
big budget. It doesn't tell us everything that we want to know, but there are
some major revelations. It changes the relationship between the two agents.
Not only are there more hints that they may be heading towards more than just
friendship, but now one of them knows that the other was right all along.
If there's a problem with the movie for devotees, it's that there's not
enough amazement. It's a good episode, but not a remarkable one. While it's
fun to watch, you won't leave the theater feeling much differently than you
did on Sundays at 10:00 when the weekly shows were over.
There are many unanswered questions. Why are the members of the conspiracy
involved in what they are doing? What do they have to gain? What do the corn
fields have to do with anything? Why do Texans react complacently when a
biohazard containment operation sets up camp next door?
Although the "X-Files" takes advantage of our national paranoia, I find it
difficult to believe that everything is a conspiracy. In my experience it's
difficult to keep a secret if more than one person knows about it.
(This Michael Redman is the same person who started writing this column 23
years ago. That's his story and he's sticking to it. Send your favorite
conspiracy to redman@bvoice.com. We won't tell anyone.)
[This appeared in the 6/24/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
Finding the courage to face life full-on is a difficult task. Summoning up the
audacity to fall in love is a harder job. If you're a total jerk like Melvin
Udall is, the odds are even more against you.
Melvin (Jack Nicholson) is a successful romance author who is just the
opposite of what you would expect someone in that profession to be. A solitary
man hidden away in his New York apartment with no human interaction and not
even a hint of ever having been in a passionate relationship, he avoids the
outside world as much as possible.
His obsessive-compulsive disorder rules his life as he uses several different
bars of soap to wash his hands and refuses to step on a crack on the sidewalk.
(There's a great scene when he has to cross a floor made of mosaic tiles --
_very_small_ mosaic tiles.)
Melvin has some great lines. When his publisher's receptionist asks him how he
writes women so well in his books, he responds "I think of men and I take away
reason and accountability." Don't get him wrong, he's not merely a misogynist.
Setting his sights higher than that, he's also a homophobe, racist,
anti-Semite, xenophobe, animal-hater and intensely dislikes people who talk in
metaphors. When we first meet him, he's busy dumping a neighbor's dog down the
garbage chute. He's an equal opportunity bigot.
He does venture outside his apartment every day to eat breakfast at a local
cafe. Melvin is such a grouchy curmudgeon that waitress Carol Connelly (Helen
Hunt) is the only one willing to wait on him. And she's none too happy about
it. 
When Carol doesn't show up for work, Melvin's routine is shot and he's
determined to do something about it. Tracking down her address, he shows up at
her place begging her to come back to work so that he can eat breakfast. The
fact that she's a poor single mother caring for a chronically ill son doesn't
appear to phase him, he wants his food.
Much more upsetting is that his gay artist neighbor Simon Bishop (Greg
Kinnear) is brutally attacked during a robbery. This doesn't upset Melvin much
("Don't worry, you'll be back on your knees in no time") but when he is
bullied into taking care of Simon's dog, his life is turned topsy-turvey.
Melvin is sequestered because he's afraid of what's out there on the other
side of his apartment door. He has to make sure it's ritualistically locked
three times to keep the world on its proper side. When he brings the dog home
he reluctantly grows fond of it, talking to it and taking it everywhere he
goes. This little crack in his emotional armor opens him up.
Hiding behind his need for Carol to return to work so she can serve him, he
pays for a specialist to treat her son. He even develops a friendship with
Simon. 
All three people are heavily damaged. Melvin has retreated from life in his
apartment. Carol has devoted herself to her son, convinced that she has to
give up her life for him. Simon is estranged from his parents and his friends
disappear when he is hospitalized and his money runs out. A more unlikely trio
to form relationships, you'd rarely see.
And in the midst of it all, there are some wonderful moments. Melvin is
hilarious in his grouchiness and touching as he attempts to be nice. "You make
me want to be a better man," he tells her. One of the best aspects is that
even as he opens up, he is still a curmudgeon.
Carol, afraid that his monetary contribution to the wellness of her son hides
a hidden agenda rushes over to his apartment in the rain to explain in no
uncertain terms that she will never sleep with him. It only takes her a second
to realize that she is delivering that statement while looking as if she just
left a wet t-shirt contest.
There's hardly anything left to say about Jack Nicholson. I don't remember
ever seeing him in anything less than a stellar performance and his
over-the-edge Melvin is no disappointment. Nicholson may be the best actor
working today.
Hunt does a commendable job matching Nicholson's energy. She isn't afraid to
be seen as something less than a babe and her portrayal of exhausted run-down
Carol struggling with seemingly overwhelming obligations is top-notch.
Their on-screen chemistry is a bit odd. Each does a wonderful job with the
character, but together, there's something a little off. It's a minor problem:
they do work well together, but that missing element is what prevents this
from being a four-star film.
Director James L. Brooks ("Terms Of Endearment", "Broadcast News") has a movie
that is picking up awards by the bucketsful (nominees for all the top Golden
Globes, winners from the National Board Of Review, inevitable Oscars) and has
a winner on his hands.
"As Good As It Gets" isn't exactly the quality that the title says, but it's
pretty darn close.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 22 years and as soon as he
finishes this one, he's off to an annual 12 Night celebration typically held
in freezing weather during a snowstorm. This year it's in the sixties and
raining. That wacky El Nino.)
[This appeared in the 1/8/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Wag the Dog (1997)
As the American public has become increasingly aware in recent years, politics
is mostly smoke and mirrors. The truth of a situation is less important than
the spin and there's so much spinning in Washington DC it's a wonder the city
stays in the same location day after day.
It's 11 days before the election and the President is in trouble. He's accused
by a teenage "Firefly Girl" of pressing the flesh a bit too literally in the
Oval Office. It's time to do something...anything...about it.
Enter Conrad Bream (Robert De Niro), a "fixer" of the highest magnitude.
Bream's take on the situation is that they need something to distract the
press until after the vote. What could be more important than the Chief
Executive's sexual indiscretions? How about a war with, oh maybe, Albania?
Not a real war of course, but a media creation to distract the public. To pull
off the hoax, Bream and White House aid Winifred Ames (Anne Heche) enlist
Hollywood producer Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman). Motss is into it: this will
be his greatest accomplishment.
Bream starts off by ordering a leak that the President's extended stay in
China has nothing to do with deploying the new B3 bomber. Not only that, but
there is no B3 bomber. When told by staffers that there really is no B3
bomber, he replies "Of course." Deny it and everyone will be convinced that it exists.
The "war" jumps into production with a battle scene shot on a studio stage
complete with digitally dubbed village backgrounds, gun fire, flames and a
little white kitten in a peasant girl's arms. A planned media event for when
the President does return to the country requires rain. When they find out
that there will be no rain in Washington, the plane is diverted to Florida so
he can give his coat to an Albanian mother thanking him for fighting the
terrorists. Nothing is left to chance.
When they do run into problems, Motss takes it in stride. "You think this is
hard?" he explains, "Try a 10:00 am pitch meeting coked to the gills and you
haven't even read the treatment. That's hard. This is easy." He's in charge.
The opposition catches on to the ruse and announces that the war is over.
"Over?" the producer shouts, "This war isn't over until I say it's over!"
The film drives home the power of television. Bream's reply is "The war is
over. I saw it on television." The public swallows the deception with a spoon
and the Firefly incident is safely buried .
The three take their project as far as it will go. Motss wants to nominate the
President for the Nobel Peace Prize because he brought peace to the war-torn
country. When reminded that there is no war, he explains "All the greater accomplishment."
His crew of experts works towards the illusion. The songwriter (Willie Nelson)
creates a "We Are The World" clone to promote patriotism. The Fad King (Denis
Leary) hatches a scheme to get the public involved. After all, you didn't
really think that those yellow ribbons for the hostages happened because of a
groundswell of grass roots support, did you?
The acting is exceptional. Hoffman and De Niro bounce off Heche's naive
politico admirably. The two actors have an easy friendship on screen that is
an absolute pleasure to watch. This is the first time that they have appeared
together (except for one scene in "Sleepers") and the chemistry is apparent.
In another review I mentioned that Jack Nicholson may possibly be the best
actor working today. If that's not true, Hoffman and De Niro are certainly
candidates for the throne.
Woody Harrelson turns in a well-done although small "Billy Bob" performance.
Peppered throughout the film are other clever cameos. Especially worth
watching is the duet between Nelson and Pops Staples.
Director Barry Levinson ("Tin Men", "Rainman") does an amazing job with David
Mamet's script (also credited to Hilary Henkin although Levinson insists that
Mamet wrote every word) considering that the film was made with a minuscule
budget ($15 million) and shot in only 29 days.
When the crew accidentally ran into President Clinton while filming, he asked
what the movie was about. In true form, the actors lied to him.
To pick nits, the introductory explanation of what the title means is
unnecessary and demeaning to the audience. We get the idea. It's also a
problem that the scheme would never actually work unless the United States
were completely isolated from the rest of the world. Are there no reporters
sent to Albania to cover the war? If you can force yourself to get past this,
everything else falls into place.
The final three minutes are a brave gambit. They completely change the mood of
the film and are sure to anger some viewers. It took me quite a while to
decide how I felt about the scene, but I finally understood that it added a
needed element to the film.
The message of the film is frighteningly accurate. In politics, it doesn't
matter what really happens, it only matters how it is handled. Whether the
President did indeed molest the girl is never answered because it is
irrelevant. In Washington the truth of Clinton's sexual activities isn't
really addressed. The important thing is how each sides handles the
accusation. Political news is often no more real than the most recent episode
of "Seinfeld".
(Michael Redman, after over 22 years of writing this column and much more
experience watching the comings and goings of politicians, no longer believes
anything. Email lies to redman@bvoice.com.)
[This appeared in the 1/15/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Broken Arrow (1996)
John Travolta has come a long way since his "Saturday Night Fever" days. His
latest films have shown a depth undreamed of during his disco period. (Of
course, just about anything would be depth compared to disco.) The evil
criminal genius character in this film isn't exactly a step forward.
He and Christian Slater are Air Force buddies but their relationship takes a
turn for the worse when Travolta decides to kill his friend and steal nuclear
weapons. His plan is to ransom the bombs for a zillion bucks and get back at
the military for passing him over for promotion at the same time.
Slater survives, teams up with the film's babe factor, a park ranger, and
sets out to stop the nefarious plot. From then on, it's a shoot-em-up with big guns.
In truth, Travolta isn't bad in his role, but the character, like the rest of
the film, isn't believable. Supposedly he has the entire scheme plotted out
and every possibility dealt with. For a genius, he doesn't do so well. Not one
of his plans works.
Luckily for the future of the to-be-bombed Southwest, Slater falls into every
possible piece of luck. Ejected from a stealth bomber into the Utah desert, he
is rescued by the park ranger. In that same vast wasteland, he somehow locates
Travolta with little trouble. Every time that he is left behind, he again
locates his prey easily. Remarkably enough, armed with only a pistol, he
defeats an army of bad guys and their big modern military stuff.
There are impressive bits: grand explosions, scenes from "Close Encounters",
sound effects from "Star Wars", a truck chase from "Indiana Jones" and even
music reminiscent of "Twin Peaks". Admirable pieces of a jigsaw puzzle that
don't make a complete picture.
As mentioned in previous comments about "Sense And Sensibility", there are
movies that are obviously aimed at one sex or the other. This is decidedly a
guy film, just not a very good one.
[This appeared in the 2/15/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Title
Review for Seven Years in Tibet (1997)
Hollywood has a history of concentrating on a contemporary political topic for
a short time then rapidly moving on. This year's cause celebre is Tibetan
freedom and as usual, the tale of an exotic people is seen through the eyes of
a westerner. "Seven Years" will be followed in short order by Martin
Scorsese's "Kundun", another film about the Dalai Lama.          
In 1939, given the opportunity to climb Nanga Parbat in the Indian Himalayas,
obnoxious self-centered Austrian Heinrich Harrer (Brad Pitt) jumps at the
chance and abandons his pregnant wife. The expedition doesn't go well for the
Olympic medal-winner when the team fails to reach the summit. Then, before
they can try again, World War II breaks out and they are rounded up by British
troops and sent to a POW camp near the Indian-Tibetan border.
After several abortive escape attempts by the lone wolf, he reluctantly joins
a group plan and finds himself outside the barbed wire. Because he is
obviously superior to the rest of the escapees, he heads out on his own. He
hopes to make his way through Tibet to China, meet up with the Japanese troops
and eventually get back home.
Days later, fellow mountain-climbing prisoner Peter Aufschnaiter (David
Thewlis) chances upon Harrer as the arrogant adventure is starving and
vomiting in the wilderness. The two form an uneasy alliance and continue their
trek towards the mysterious nation.
Sneaking into the country that forbids entry to all outsiders, the two
eventually get to the holy city of Lhasa. Harrer attracts the attention of the
young Dalai Lama who grants him an audience. The teenage spiritual leader is
interested in western ways and asks him to teach knowledge of the distant
world. Forging a friendship, the two learn from each other until Harrer is
forced to flee the country during the Chinese onslaught of the early fifties.
The film is exquisitely beautiful and epic in scope. The Argentinean Andes
serve as a stand-in for the Himalayas because the Chinese government refused
permission to film in Tibet, but are no less majestic. The mystical city is
visually captivating. The esoteric costumes and setting are beyond reproach.
According to Mike Leonard's interview in the "Herald Times" with Thubten J.
Norbu, the Dalai Lama's older brother, the Winter Palace is "extraordinarily
realistic." Bloomington resident and retired IU professor Norbu and another
brother were responsible for bringing Harrer to the attention of the Dalai
Lama. Unfortunately this aspect of the story is not in the film as Norbu
refused to allow his depiction when the producers would not provide him with
any assurance of how he would be presented. Their sister plays the holy mother
in a cameo appearance.
Pitt is satisfactory in his role, but never completely engages the audience.
The most interesting aspect of the film -- his conversion to selflessness --
is glossed over and we are expected to just accept it. Every story depends
upon change in the lead character and more time spent with that transformation
would help to flesh out the tale. The recent revelation that Harrer was not
only Nazi but a member of the SS before his imprisonment would have made his
conversion even more dramatic, but that detail was withheld from the filmmakers.
Although Harrer's saga is enticing, director Jean-Jacques Annaud ("The Bear",
"Quest For Fire") could have eliminated some of the adventurer's solo deeds
and looked more at the relationship between him and the Dalai Lama.
Much more captivating is Jamyang Jamtsho Wangchuk as the 14 year old Dalai
Lama. Successfully combining the curiosity and energy of an adolescent boy
with the ancient wisdom of the reincarnation the Buddhist God of Compassion,
the young actor is easily the star of the film. The decision to humanize the
Dalai Lama rather than portray him as somber holy man is a wise one. Anyone
who has been in his presence can attest to his sense of humor and easy-going ways.
The film is guilty of some political heavy-handedness especially in the scene
of Chinese generals stomping through a sand mandala. Moments before, the
spectacle as soldiers in staid uniforms march through the flowing robes of
horn-blowing Buddhist monks is subtle and much more effective in demonstrating
the differences between the invaders and the peaceful Tibetans.
It is interesting to observe the ebb and flow of popular icons. During the
sixties, Chairman Mao was upheld as a hero by the American culturally elite.
Now he is the villain as attention is focused on the Chinese occupation of
Tibet.         There is no excuse for the murder of over a million Tibetans and the
destruction of 90% of the monasteries by the Chinese and it is obvious that
Tibet deserves its independence. However history has taught us that
over-simplification results in inaccuracies and very un-Buddhist-like
polarities. One would hope that the champions of Tibetan freedom don't make
this mistake.
The film accomplishes many rare feats. It is majestic, entertaining and at the
same time will undoubtedly aid in the mobilization of western sentiment for
the liberation of Tibet. With the notoriously short attention span of the
popular media, we can only hope that the focus lasts long enough to manifest change.
(Michael Redman, veteran of over 22 years of these film columns, is busy
bringing in his plants in the face of freezing weather. At least he is busy
thinking about it. Mredman@bvoice.com is the eaddress to send clever comments.)
[This appeared in the 10/15/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]
-- 
mailto:mredman@bvoice.com

Title
Review for Affliction (1997)
One of the most frightening occurrences in nearly every adult's life happens
in front of the bathroom mirror. While shaving or applying lipstick, you'll
catch a glimpse out of the corner of your eye. One of your parents is staring
at you from behind the glass.
Most people's childhood memories of their parents are of ancient people in
their thirties or forties. When the child reaches that age, his self-image is
rarely that...then there's that vision in the mirror.
While we may be fated to look like our parents, we don't have to become them
if we don't want to. Most of the time, though, DNA isn't all that's replicated
in children.
Small town cop Wade Whitehouse (Nick Nolte) hates his abusive alcoholic father
Glen (James Coburn), yet every day Wade becomes more and more Glen. Although
the broken-down man is on his last legs, he dominates his son's life.
Wade is stuck in a dead-end job in a dead-end town. He's primarily a school
crossing guard and his other part-time job consists of running errands.
He's destroyed two marriages to the same woman. His young daughter assures him
that she loves him, but doesn't want to spend time with him.
Wade's one place of refuge is with girlfriend Margie (Sissy Spacek), a
waitress at the local diner. He's unconsciously working on sabotaging this
relationship, himself.
He sees a chance to change all of this when a wealthy visiting union official
is killed deer hunting. It's ruled a hunting accident, but Wade uncovers clues
that it might be a mob hit.
Until the end, it's uncertain whether it was an accident or Wade is onto the
truth. Maybe he's finally gone off the deep end. It's possible he's created
this drama to take his mind off his own desperation.
The film is less about the mystery than it is about Wade. It paints a vivid
portrait of a man struggling with overwhelming personal failures. To top it
all off, he has a toothache that won't stop.
Nolte is astonishing in the role. He transcends "Nick Nolte" and becomes Wade.
It's no wonder that he won New York Film Critics and National Society of Film
Critics awards and was nominated for an Oscar.
The casting of Coburn is inspired. The two look and act enough alike that it's
easy to believe they are related. His Supporting Actor Oscar is well-deserved.
Screenwriter/director Paul Schrader is in touch with males on the verge of
madness. His scripts for "Taxi Driver" and "Raging Bull" lead directly into
this one.
The film is filled with chilling scenes. As in Fargo, the town is
constantly snow-covered. Released widely during the first week of spring when
the audience is yearning for warmer weather, the movie is a reminder of the
long hard winter just past.
Some events are archetypal of dysfunctional families. Brother Rolfe (Willem
Dafoe) who escaped by leaving town, denies childhood incidents ever happened.
Glen seems to have been abused by _his_ father. After Wade pulls a man over
the cafe counter and pins him down, he holds his daughter telling her, "It's
all right. That didn't happen. That didn't happen."
Wade sits at his parents kitchen table calmly drinking a glass of whiskey.
Through the window his father's ramshackle barn burns in a field of bleak
white. The scene is eerily unsettling and says it all.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and is growing
increasingly weary of dismal films no matter how well crafted they are. He's
currently looking for something in the light-hearted adventure genre.
Suggestions to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 4/1/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Title
Review for Speed 2: Cruise Control (1997)
Just when you had seen Lost World and thought that the summer crop
couldn't get any worse, this abomination comes along to prove you wrong.
The sequel to the big hit of 1994 will go down in cinematic history as
the big bomb of 1997. Reuniting director Jan De Bont (who also did
"Twister") and Sandra Bullock, the film is missing Keanu Reeves and any
semblance of excitement. Not known for his tremendous acting talent,
turning down this one may have been the high point in Reeves' career.
Annie (Bullock), having broken up with her cop lover acquired at the end
of the original movie because he was a daredevil, is now hooked up with
a new policeman, Alex (Jason Patric). The trouble is that Alex isn't the
mild-mannered beach patrolman that he said he was, but rather a member
of the Los Angeles SWAT team. This doesn't make her happy.
In order to prove his love, he takes her on a relaxing romantic
Caribbean cruise. Surprisingly enough, there are plans afoot to make the
vacation anything but restful. Also on board is John Geiger (Willem
Dafoe), the designer of the ship's computer guidance system. Geiger is
frenzied because the company fired him when they discovered that he
contracted fatal copper poisoning while working for them.
His plan is to take over the ship and run it into something that will
explode. Now there's an action-filled plot for ya.
But there's no action here, much less an interesting plot. Most things
move at slow motion (odd for a movie titled "Speed"). Even when the
action heats up, it's just formulaic pap. The first film worked despite
the two-dimensional characters because it pulled in the audience with
its thrill-a-minute energy. This one leaves you waiting for the
excitement. And waiting. And waiting.
Bullock may have run into a dead end here. After attaining "star" status
with the original, she has turned out one dog after another. Her
performance as Annie has even less spark than usual and that's a dismal
assessment. It's astonishing that she can command a high salary and that
situation can't last much longer.
Dafoe could have made the film tolerable. His history is filled with
fine performances and he usually plays the twisted psycho expertly.
However Geiger is the dullest crazed evil villain ever seen on the
silver screen. Even the leeches used to treat his illness don't add a
spark.
Patric is almost adequate, but the chemistry between him and Bullock
doesn't exist. The scenes with the two of them drag on worse than the
rest of the film.
The saying used to be "Speed kills", now it's "Speed bores".
[This appeared in the 6/19/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]
